<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89620-0015 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.6-20-89.f2.A1014</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 117 / Tuesday, June 20, 1989 /Rules and Reglations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of the Secretary</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">24 CFR Parts 812, 813, 885, 912 and 913</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. R-89-1418; FR-2476]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="91">RIN 2502-AE47</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Loans for Housing for the Elderly or Handicapped; Section 202; Projectsfor Nonelderly Handicapped Families and Individuals</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of the Secretary, HUD.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>Section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 authorizes HUDto provide direct loans for the development of projects to serve elderlyor handicapped families and individuals. Section 202 was amended by section162 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987 (Pub. L. 100-242,approved February 5, 1988) to ensure that the section 202 program willmeet the special housing and related needs of nonelderly handicapped familiesand individuals. The revised program authorizes a new type of project assistancepayment to replace assistance payments made under section 8 of the UnitedStates Housing Act of 1937. This final rule implements the new program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATE: </T2>This rule is effective on August 4, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Margaret Milner, Office of Policy,Financial Management and Administration, Room 9106, Department of Housingand Urban Development, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20410. Telephone(202) 755-3287 or 755-8135. The TDD number is 755-6781. (These are nottoll-free numbers.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="84">Information Collection Requirements</ITAG>The information collection requirements contained in this rule have beensubmitted to the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) for review underthe Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980 and have been assigned OMB controlnumbers 2502-0044, 2502-0187, 2502-0267 and 2502-0371. Public reportingburden for this collection of information is estimated to include the timefor reviewing instructions, searching existing data sources, gatheringand maintaining the data needed, and completing and reviewing the collectionof information. Information on the estimated public reporting burden isprovided under the Preamble heading <T3>Other Matters. </T3>Send comments regarding this burden estimate orany other aspect of this collection of information, including suggestionsfor reducing this burden, to the Department of Housing and Urban Development,Rules Docket Clerk, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Room 10276, Washington DC20410 and to the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, Office ofManagement and Budget, Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">Background</ITAG>Section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 authorizes HUD to provide directloans for the development of projects to serve elderly or handicapped familiesand individuals. In previous years, projects selected for section 202 loansalso received commitments for rental assistance payments under section8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937. To improve the direct loanprogram and to better serve the special housing and related needs of nonelderlyhandicapped families and individuals, section 162 of the Housing and CommunityDevelopment Act of 1987 (Pub. L. 100-242, approved February 5, 1988) (1987Act) amended section 202. Section 162 includes a new type of assistancepayments to replace section 8 assistance payments made in connection withsection 202 projects for handicapped families and individuals. Projectsfor elderly families will continue to be processed under the original section202/8 program and will receive section 8 assistance.On November 2, 1988 (53 FR 44288), HUD published a notice of proposed rulemakingto implement the new program. HUD received 38 comments to the proposedrule. These comments are summarized below.<ITAG tagnum="84">Procedural Matters</ITAG><T3>Issuance of Final Rule. </T3>Several commenters warned that HUD mustact immediately to issue a NOFA and obligate funds by the end of the fiscalyear to avoid what they considered to be an ``illegal sequestration'' ofFederal funds. The Department is taking every step possible to ensure thetimely obligation of program funds by the close of the fiscal year.<T3>Compliance with the Federal Advisory Committee Act. </T3>Section 202(h)(3)(A)provides that in adopting standards and procedures for allocating fundsand processing loans and assistance payments for the program, HUD shallensure adequate participation by representatives of the disability communitythrough the provisions available under the Federal Advisory Committee Act.The proposed rule announced HUD's intention to establish and consult withan advisory committee in accordance with FACA requirements in the developmentof the final rule.Commenters genreally supported HUD's formation of an Advisory Committeeto assist in program development. Commenters, however, suggested that membershipin the committee should include: representatives from high-cost urban areas;individuals familiar with prices under the existing cost containment guidelines;Sponsors; industry trade associations; and development team members (includingconsultants, architects, attorneys and contractors).On January 24, 1989 (54 FR 3541), HUD published its notice of intent toestablish an Advisory Committee under FACA. This notice provided that themembership of the committee would include members of the disability communityand persons who have been involved in the provision of housing for handciappedpersons. While the committee did not include all of the specific interestssuggested by the commenters, HUD is confident that the experience and expertknowledge of the committee members was sufficient to ensure the developmentof distinct and appropriate standards and procedures for the new programand that these standards and procedures adequately reflect the differencesbetween such housing and housing for elderly families developed under section202.On March 21, 1989 (54 FR 11573), HUD announced that the Advisory Committeewould meet on April 7, 1989 at HUD headquarters to review the Department'srules for the new program. The review included a discussion of the publiccomments, a presentation by the architect of the group home design on whichdevelopment cost limits will be based, and a discussion of the FY-1989funding schedule and procedures. The meeting was open to the public. Therecord of the proceedings is available to the public for review and copyingat the Office of the Rules Docket Clerk.The comments and suggestions raised by the committee are discussed in thepublic comment section below.<T3>Prototype Demonstration.</T3> Section 202(h)(3)(B) of the Act providesthat the Secretary may, on a demonstration basis, determine the feasibilityand desirability of reducing processing time and costs for housing forhandicapped families and individuals by limiting project design to a smallnumber of prototype designs. In the preamble, HUD stated that it wouldannounce the prototype requirements in a separate notice if it decidesto pursue the demonstration, and encouraged comments addressing the demonstration.Many commenters supported the demonstration as long as the use of suchdesigns is voluntary. Commenters recommended various procedures for expeditedprocessing of such projects and made suggestions regarding prototype design.HUD is continuing to examine the feasibility of developing the prototypeprogram. If a demonstration is conducted, these comments will be consideredin drafting prototype requirements.<T3>Organization of final rule.</T3> The final rule is substantially reorganizedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="15">_The final rule organizes the provisions applicable to the section202/8 program (currently Subparts B and D) into one Subpart B. (The currentsection numeration is retained to avoid confusion).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_The new programs, originally proposed as Part 885, Subpart G, isnow added as Subpart C.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Under the final rule, many of the proposed definitions are applicableonly to the new handicapped program (</ITAG><T3>e.g.</T3>, definitions for ``agreement to enter into project assistancecontract'', ``annual income'', ``assisted unit'', ``project assistancepayment'', ``PAC'', etc.). Generally, these definitions are applicableto the PAC contract and management. A related rule to add HAP contractand management regulations for the section 202/8 program is currently pendingissuance as a final rule. (See proposed rule published December 9, 1987,52 FR 46614). When that rule is issued, similar definitions will be addedto Subpart B.<ITAG tagnum="15">_Section 202/8 provisions have been revised to delete references thatare solely applicable to the handicapped program. (For example, acquisitionwith or without moderate rehabilitation is applicable only to group homesfor the non-elderly handicapped and all references to such housing havebeen deleted from Subpart B.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Public Comments on Regulatory Provisions</ITAG>I. PolicyA. <T3>Flexibility of approach.</T3> Commenters argued that the proposed regulationsare inconsistent with new directions in the field of mental health whichemphasize: integration into the communty; supportive services tailoredto the individual's needs and available over the long-term and withoutregard to where the individual lives; and consumer choice with regard tohousing and service programs. To better serve these goals, the commentersargued that HUD should: (1) Provide supports that are attached to individualsnot to specific housing (<T3>e.g.,</T3> one commenter suggested that handicapped individuals beprovided with Section 8 Certificates and Housing Vouchers); and (2) permitgreater integration of handicapped individuals into the community (suggestionsincluded lower limitations on project size, the development of small scatteredsite developments, and the development of projects that include units forhandicapped and nonhandicapped families.)The emphasis of the new program is primarily on the range of services providedto handicapped families, the opportunities for independent living and participationin normal activities, and access by the handicapped families to the communityat large and to employment opportunities. Consistent with this emphasis,the final regulations endeavored to promote the integration of handicappedindividuals into the community to the extent consistent with the statute.HUD notes that many of the proposed changes are not permissible under thesection 202 program (<T3>i.e.</T3>, the provision of Section 8 Housing Vouchers or Certificatesand the development of housing and related facilities that are intendedto be occupied, in part, by nonhandicapped families).The Advisory Committee generally supported the Department's policies onthe section 202 program and recognized that the section 202 program isonly one component addressing the comprehensive housing needs of handicappedpeople. However, the committee strongly recommended that the Departmentuse all of its programs to provide a full spectrum of housing opportunitiesfor this population.B. <T3>Purpose and policy (andSection; 885.1). </T3>Proposed andSection; 885.1(a)describes the general purpose of the section 202 program and states thatsection 202 projects shall provide necessary services. While the provisionof meal and nutritional services is not prohibited under the program, thelist of permitted services in this section did not include food services.In response to a commenter's request, meal and nutritional services havebeen added to the list of illustrative services.C. <T3>Definitions (andSection; 885.5)_</T3>1. <T3>Borrower and Sponsor. </T3>Under the proposed rule, PHAs may not participateas Sponsor or Borrower. Two commenters supported such participation byPHAs because non-profit corporations may not have the capital, reservesand experience to meet the stringent requirements of the new program. Thecommenters also noted that new construction money for public housing unitsis virtually non-existent, and that this change would provide PHAs withan avenue for obtaining such funds.The definitions of Sponsor and Borrower have not been amended. Every appropriationsact since 1976 has limited participation in the section 202 program tononprofit organizations. (See Department of Housing and Urban Development_IndependentAgencies Appropriation Act, 1989 (Pub. L. 100-404, approved August 19,1988) which provides that commitments for direct loans under section 202shall be available only to qualified nonprofit sponsors.) Should Congressdecide to revise this policy of 13 years, HUD will make appropriate changesto its regulations.One commenter argued that there is no need for a separate Borrower corporation.The final rule does not incorporate this comment. The requirement for aseparate Borrower corporation was originally imposed in the section 202/8program to permit the participation of religious organizations, consistentwith the requirements of the First Amendment of the Constitution. The requirementwas extended to all Sponsors in recognition of other requirements that,in practice, compelled the formation of separate Borrower. These includeprohibitions against the Borrower engaging in any other business or activityor incurring any liability or obligation not related to the proposed project.2. <T3>Handicapped family. </T3>The proposed rule defined handicapped familyas: (1) Families of two or more persons the head of which (or his or herspouse) is handicapped; (2) the surviving member or members of such a familyliving in an assisted unit with the deceased member of the family at thetime of his or her death; (3) a single handicapped person between the agesof 18 and 62; or (4) two or more handicapped persons living together, orone or more such persons living with another person who is determined byHUD to be essential to their care or well-being.One commenter argued that the definition of handicapped family should beexpanded to include families with children with disabilities. The proposeddefinition reflected the definition of elderly or handicapped family containedin section 202(d)(4). Under this statutory definition, a family would notqualify as a handicapped family because it includes children that are handicapped.In order to ensure that single handicapped persons will be admitted tohousing assisted under the new program, numerous commenters urged HUD tochange references to ``handicapped families'' or ``families'' to ``thehandicapped'' or to the ``persons with handicaps''. Under the proposeddefinition, a single handicapped person would qualify as a handicappedfamily. The definition has not been changed. However, since the title ofthe new subpart for the program may be misleading to single handicappedindividuals, it has been retitled.Additionally, the final definition of handicapped family has been revisedto provide that single handicapped individuals must be over 18 years old.(The proposed rule required that such individuals be between 18 and 62years of age.)3. <T3>Handicapped person or individual. </T3>HUD adopted the definition ofhandicapped person or individual contained in section 202. Several commentersurged HUD to adopt the definition of handicapped person contained in section504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 794). The commenters argued:(1) The section 504 definition would help the Department to avoid the overlynarrow admission criteria applied in the section 202/8 program (<T3>e.g.</T3>, the exclusion of mentally handicapped and developmentallydisabled persons from elderly section 202 projects); (2) nothing in section202 requires the definition of developmentally disabled person to excludeothers with disabilities; and (3) the use of the section 504 definitionwould ensure a consistency of approach among the various agencies.HUD's regulation implementing section 504 prohibits discrimination againstqualified individuals with handicaps. While the definition of individualwith handicaps is broader than the proposed definition of handicapped personor individual, the section 504 definition of ``qualified individual withhandicaps'' recognizes that persons with handicaps may be denied benefits,such as occupancy of a dwelling unit in a HUD-assisted housing project,on the basis of failure to meet basic requirements that govern eligibilityfor admission, care or service. The preamble to the section 504 regulationspecifically addressed commenter's arguments objecting to the exclusionof handicapped persons from elderly housing under the section 202 program.At 53 FR 20218-19, HUD stated, ``For example, in a section 202 projecta person is ineligible for housing for elderly persons if the person doesnot meet the age requirement for admission to the program.'' The proposedchange has not been made.HUD has consistently denied applications for projects solely for personswho are alcoholics or drug addicts. In recognition of this policy, theproposed rule stated that alcoholism and drug addiction are not includedwithin the definition of chronic mental illness. HUD is concerned thatthe language of the proposed rule could be misinterpreted to permit theexclusion of individuals otherwise qualified for admission to a project,based solely on their status as alcoholics or drug addicts. A handicappedperson suffering from alcoholism or drug addiction may be excluded froma project based on behavior that would exclude any other individual, evenif the behavior is related to the person's drug addiction or alcoholism(<T3>e.g.,</T3> the illegal sale or use of drugs).Borrowers must make decisions on each applicant's qualifications on a case-by-casebasis during the course of ordinary eligibility determinations. BecauseHUD believes that the language in the proposed rule might have misled someBorrowers into excluding all persons suffering from a drug addiction orfrom alcoholism without an examination of each individual's qualificationsfor the program, the language excluding alcoholism and drug addiction fromthe definition of chronic mental illness has been deleted. A new provisionhas been substituted stating that a person whose sole impairment is alcoholismor drug addiction will not be considered to be handicapped for the purposesof the section 202 program. To assure the availability of this discussionto interested persons in the future, it will be codified as an appendixto the final rule.As a related matter, the final rule revises definitions of disabled personcontained in Parts 812, 813, 912 and 913 to reflect changes made by section170(c) of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1987 (Pub. L. 100-242,approved February 5, 1988). The 1987 Act amended section 3(b)(3)(A) ofthe United States Housing Act of 1937, which defined person under a disability.The 1987 Act deleted the reference to disabilities as defined in section102 of the Developmental Disabilities Services and Facilities ConstructionAmendments of 1970, and substituted references to developmental disabilitiesas defined in section 102(7) of the Developmental Disabilities Assistanceand Bill of Rights Act.4. <T3>Housing and related facilities. </T3>Existing section 202 regulationsdefine housing and related facilities as rental or cooperative housingstructures. One commenter asked whether the acquisition of newly constructedor rehabilitated condominium buildings would be permitted under the program.Another commenter was concerned that the proposed rule would prohibit thedevelopment of projects on scattered sites.<T3>Recently constructed </T3>condominium or cooperative buildings willnot be approved for acquisition (with or without moderate rehabilitation)under this program. Facilities for such a project must be at least threeyears old (see definition of housing and related facilities). Similarly,it is highly unlikely that a recently constructed condominium or cooperativebuilding would qualify as a substantial rehabilitation project. Substantialrehabilitation of a project involves the improvement of the condition ofthe property from a deteriorated and substandard condition to a good condition.Relatively few newly constructed condominium or cooperative buildings shouldbe in this condition.HUD recognizes that the use of scattered sites (<T3>i.e.</T3>, small projects developed on separated sites involving asingle project number) will promote the integration of handicapped individualsinto the community. Nothing in the rule would preclude the developmentof such projects. However, the acquisition of individual units in a condominiumor cooperative building as a scattered site project would not be permitted.Experience in the section 202 program has demonstrated that the provisionsof governing condominium and cooperative documents (By-Laws, Articles ofIncorporation, Covenants, etc.) often conflict with HUD's program requirementsand the regulatory agreement. Unless a substantial percentage of the unitsin the condominium or cooperative are purchased, the Sponsor is powerlessto effect changes to the documents or to prevent changes in these documentsthat would conflict with HUD's requirements.The existing definition of ``housing and related facilities'' excludesall intermediate care facilities. Section 885.710(b)(4)(vii) permits thedevelopment of intermediate care facilities funded by the Health Care FinancingAdministration and serving the mentally retarded and persons with relatedconditions (ICF). Such facilities may be developed if the Sponsor demonstratesthat the proposed project will primarily provide housing rather than medicalfacilities, is or will be licensed by appropriate State agencies, and willreceive funding from sources other than HUD for the costs of the intermediatecare. The definition of ``housing and related facilities'' has been revisedin this final rule to permit the development of such intermediate carefacilities.5. <T3>Acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation. </T3>Under theexisting definition of acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation,the cost of moderate rehabilitation included within development cost maynot exceed the higher of 15 percent of the loan amount or $3,000 per unit.Since group homes are considered to be a single unit under this rule, the$3,000 per unit restriction has been eliminated in the final rule.II. Application Procedures and Program RequirementsA. <T3>Allocation of authority (andSection; 885.702). </T3>The proposed rulefor the section 202 handicapped program did not require a specific allocationto nonmetropolitan areas. By contrast, 20 to 25 percent of available fundsmust be allocated to nonmetropolitan areas under the section 202/8 program.Numerous commenters supported the elimination of the nonmetropolitan areaallocation. Several others argued that the final rule should reflect thesection 202/8 allocation requirements. These commenters argued that thepreamble incorrectly implied that only large metropolitan areas offer adequateservices for the disabled. Commenters suggested that if the need in nonmetropolitanareas within an allocation area is insufficient (as demonstrated by noor few applications), the regional office could reallocate unused fundsto metropolitan areas.Contrary to the allegation contained in the comments, the Department didnot base its decision on any perceived inadequacy of services within nonmetropolitanareas. Rather, HUD found that the emphasis of the program is primarilyon the range of services to be provided to handicapped families, the opportunitiesfor independent living and participation in normal activities, and accessby handicapped families to the community at large and to employment activities.The Department determined that it is in the best interest of the programto fund the highest ranked applications serving these goals without regardto the location of the project in a nonmetropolitan or metropolitan area.The final rule does not preclude nonmetropolitan areas from participationin the program. Moreover, if the applications from such nonmetropolitanareas receive high ranking, it is possible for projects in nonmetropolitanareas to receive awards totaling more than 25 percent of the allocatedfunds.Under the proposed rule, the allocation of loan authority to allocationareas would be based on a formula that weighs the relative needs of thearea as reflected in available Census data. Because Census data is updatedevery ten years, one commenter urged HUD to consider more current statistics.While HUD would prefer to use updated data in the allocation of funds,there is no reliable nationwide source of population data available forsuch an update. The final rule continues to provide for the allocationof loan authority based on available Census data.One commenter observed that the amount of funding to be provided is notaddressed in the proposed rule and that the program will assist the developmentof housing only if there is sufficient funding. As provided in andSection;885.705, HUD will make an annual announcement of funds availability inthe <T4>Federal Register</T4> based on the annual appropriations made by Congress.B. <T3>Application contents (andSection; 885.710). </T3>The commenters raisedthe following issues regarding the application content requirements.1. <T3>Narrative description. </T3>Under proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(4),the Sponsor is required to submit a narrative description of the projectincluding:<ITAG tagnum="15">_A description of the development method to be used (andSection; 885.710(b)(4)(ii));</ITAG>A description of the number and type of structures, the number of stories,and the number of units by size (independent living complexes) or the numberof bedrooms (group home) (andSection; 885.710(b)(4) (iii), (iv), and (v));A demonstration of compliance with cost containment and modest design requirements(andSection; 885.710(b)(4)(vi));A demonstration that proposed ICF facilities for the mentally retardedand persons with related conditions will primarily provide housing ratherthan medical facilities, will be licensed by appropriate State agencies,and will receive funding from sources other than HUD for the cost of intermediatecare (andSection; 885.710(b)(4)(vii)).Commenters stated that responses to these requirements will depend on thesite and design of the project. Since site and design information is notrequired until fund reservation, commenters argued that the submissionof this information at the application stage would be meaningless. Commentersurged HUD to defer the submission of this information and to permit theSponsor to certify that it is aware of, and will comply with, the variousprogram requirements.While this information may be subject to modification once the site isselected and the project design is finalized, HUD requires approximatedata at the application stage in order to determine the proper amount ofthe fund reservation, to ensure that the proposed project is likely tomeet the proposed occupancy requirements and project requirements, andto ensure that the Sponsor is aware of all program requirements, has analyzedtheir effect on the planned project, and has presented a thorough, well-developedproposal. These requirements have been retained.Commenter thought that the retention of these requirements would foreclosechanges when the site is obtained and the design is finalized. For example,commenters feared that the Sponsor would be bound to use the developmentmethod identified in the application. HUD will permit Sponsors to makechanges if the change will not increase the fund reservation, conflictwith the program requirements, or substantially alter the proposed projectconcept. For example, a proposed new construction project could be changedto substantial rehabilitation or acquisition after the site is selected(since the fund reservations would be the same). On the other hand, a proposalto change from an independent living complex to a group home, or a proposalto change the project occupancy requirements would substantially alterthe project concept and would not be allowed.2. <T3>Project occupancy requirements. </T3>Proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(5)(i)stated that the Sponsor must propose project occupancy requirements thatlimit occupancy to one or more of the following groups: the chronicallymentally ill, the developmentally disabled; or the physically handicapped.The Advisory Committee supported the Department's policy of developinghousing for specific disability groups.Several commenters supported limiting tenancy in small group living arrangementsto specific disability groups. These commenters, however, argued that suchlimitations should not apply to larger housing projects developed withsection 202 funds. The commenters suggested that HUD's regulations mustbe clarified to state that people with disabilities are eligible to livein highrise and garden projects of more than 24 units developed for personswho are elderly and disabled. These comments address well-settled occupancyrequirements for section 202/8 projects. Changes to such requirements arebeyond the scope of this rulemaking.3. <T3>State and local plans and policies. </T3>Under proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(5)(ii),the Sponsor must demonstrate that the proposal does not conflict with Stateor local plans and policies governing the development and operation offacilities serving handicapped individuals meeting the proposed projectoccupancy requirements. The purpose of the requirement was to ensure thatproposed projects using State or local funds for the provision of serviceswill not conflict with State and local funding requirements. For example,if a project will receive State funding for services in connection witha group home for the developmentally disabled, and State policies prohibitthe funding of group homes serving more than four persons, HUD will rejecta group home application proposing to serve a greater number of residents.If no State and local service funding will be provided for the project,however, the project will not be required to adhere to State funding requirements.The final rule clarifies this requirement. The requirement is relocatedin the final rule to andSection; 885.710(b)(6) (supportive service plan description).One commenter feared that States may use this requirement to provide apreference to certain types of projects rather than reflect the actualneeds of their handicapped population. The final rule recognizes that Stateand local funding agencies may have certain prerequisites for the provisionof service funding. The rule would not foreclose a project that conflictswith the policies of State and local funding agencies if that project willreceive all service funds from other sources.Commenters noted that State and local funding sources will be reluctantto state that the project complies with local plans and policies withouta review of architectural and site plans. The commenter asserted that thisrequirement is more appropriate at the conditional commitment stage. Therule recognizes that at the application stage, it may be impossible todetermine that a project will ultimately comply with State and local requirements.The rule merely requires a threshold demonstration that the project, asproposed in the application, does not conflict with these requirements.One commenter suggested that HUD should require a proposed project to supportthe goals and objectives of the State developmental disability plan. HUDdoes not believe that it is appropriate for the Department to go beyonda determination that the project does not conflict with funding policiesthat are in effect. Our objective under the section 202 program is to providehousing to meet the specific needs of handicapped families and individuals.This objective is not necessarily linked to goals and objectives of a Statepolicy making body such as the State developmental disabilities councilwhich may change its goals and priorities from year-to-year.4. <T3>Supportive service plan description. </T3>Proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(6)contained requirements for a service plan description.(a) <T3>In general.</T3> Several commenters objected to the supportive serviceplan description requirement. These commenters noted that Sponsors willnot know who will reside in the project before the housing is ready foroccupancy. Since services must be developed based on individual need, thecommenters argued that it will be impossible for Sponsors to forecast whatservices must be provided. The Advisory Committee expressed similar reservations.Initially, HUD notes that the requirements for the submission of a serviceplan description are similar to the requirements that were imposed on Sponsorsof projects for chronically mentally ill individuals under the existingsection 202/8 program. These requirements have worked well in that programand HUD intends to continue to apply them in the new program for handicappedindividuals. Moreover, HUD notes that the commenters have misinterpretedthe purpose of the service plan description. It is not intended to requirethe submission of individual plans for specific residents. Rather, theplans should describe the range of services to be provided for residents.HUD has made minor revisions to the text of the final rule to clarify thispoint.Another commenter emphasized that HUD should promote the provision of flexibleand ongoing support to individuals, rather than the provision of such supportin connection with facilities. The commenter argued that when an individualno longer needs the intensity or types of support attached to a facility,that individual must not lose his or her home when support needs change.Under HUD's rules, the supportive services are not ``attached'' to thefacility. A plan is required to assure that residents are not placed intoa community without the necessary support to live in the setting. Thereis no HUD requirement that residents participate in particular services.Instead of a plan description, a commenter would permit Sponsors to providecertain assurances for the provision of services. The provision of a serviceplan description containing the elements described in the proposed regulationis a statutorily imposed application requirement. The suggested certificationscannot be substituted.(b) <T3>Funding.</T3> The final rule at andSection; 885.710(b)(6)(ii) requiresthe Sponsor to submit evidence of funding sources for supportive servicesthat will be provided for compensation, including State and local fundsavailable to assist in the provision of such services, or evidence of commitmentto provide the supportive services from agencies that will not be compensated.Numerous commenters supported the emphasis on the supportive service fundingmechanism, provided that HUD recognizes the degree to which various Statesare unable to commit their funds to projects that are not in operation.The commenters suggested that HUD should not give a preference to a projectlocated in a State that is able to make such commitments over projectsin States that cannot make commitments.HUD recognizes that public bodies generally are unable to make long-termcommitments for support of services linked to a project that is not yetoperational. They can, however, indicate whether funding is anticipated,given the availability of appropriations. In those States where, becauseof fiscal or other constraints, the State indicates that funds cannot bemade available for services, the Sponsor must secure and provide documentationof other funding sources to meet the anticipated needs of residents. Thereis no penalty for having private, as opposed to public, funding sources.Another commenter supported the requirement for supportive service programs,but argued that the programs must be <T3>provided with</T3> sufficient funds through State, Federal and localallotments to secure their success. Funds for providing the assured rangeof services cannot be included in the computation of the project assistancepayment under the section 202 housing program (see section 202(h)(4)(B)).The extent to which other governmental funds are available to assist theprovision of services is beyond HUD's jurisdiction.One commenter argued that the regulations do not maximize and enhance Stateinitiatives for the development of housing for persons with special needs.The commenter argued that States should be able to use section 202 fundsin combination with other State capital funds to develop a variety of integratedhousing options. Under the current statutory authority, section 202 fundscan be used only for direct loans to nonprofit Sponsors. States can anddo use capital funds to develop complementary types of housing to ensurethat handicapped citizens have a variety of housing options to meet varyinghousing needs.(c) <T3>Review.</T3> Several commenters asked how HUD, an agency whose primaryresponsibility is financing housing rather than service delivery, is qualifiedto evaluate the service plan description. Commenters suggested that HUDinvolve the disability community in the process. Other commenters arguedthat decisions regarding the necessity of services must be left to theBorrower. Another urged HUD to develop guidelines and evaluation criteriafor the service plan description.HUD will determine if the supportive service plan description is directedto the needs of the individuals with the type of disability the projectproposes to serve and demonstrates that the Sponsor is able to provideor assure the provision of the proposed services. HUD intends to evaluatethe service plan for the appropriateness of services in relation to theobjectives of the section 202 program, the quality of the management planfor providing or coordinating the provision of supportive services includingthe capability and commitment of the service provider, and the strengthof the funding sources for the supportive services that will be providedfor compensation. HUD will supplement its own experience in the evaluationof supportive services by including the appropriate State agency with regardto the proposed project occupancy group in the review of the applicationfor fund reservation. The State agency's comments will be considered inthe preparation of HUD's analysis of the service plan description.5. <T3>Effective demand.</T3> Proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(7) required theSponsor to provide evidence that there is an unmet need for the proposedhousing in the area to be served by the project and that this need is likelyto continue throughout the term of the project. This provision has beenrevised for clarity in the final rule to require evidence of an effectivedemand for the proposed housing.A commenter noted that section 202 development has created a surplus ofunits in some areas. The commenter suggested that the final rule requirethe Sponsor to coordinate its application with the local PHA. Under thecommenter's proposal, any current PHA unit availability or vacancy ratesless than 95 percent in elderly or handicapped apartments would be reasonsfor disapproval of the application.Public housing units in the area to be served by the project representonly a portion of the supply of housing units for handicapped individuals.Since PHAs' past participation in the provision of handicapped housinghas been limited and because the current availability of PHA housing forthe elderly may not be relevant to the demand for handicapped housing,HUD has not included a requirement for PHA participation in the applicationprocess. HUD will continue to conduct its independent review of the marketdemand for projects by considering the availability of all units to servethe needs of the proposed occupancy group.6. <T3>Other applications. </T3>The section 202/8 program limits the numberof units for which a sponsor may apply. The proposed rules for housingfor handicapped families did not include this limitation. Numerous commenterssupported the absence of the unit limitations_if HUD assures that therewill not be an over-concentration of units with one Sponsor or in one application.Under andSection; 885.710(b)(8), the application would include a statementwhether the Sponsor or any affiliated entity is planning to submit otherapplications during the fiscal year. HUD will use this information andother data submitted by the Sponsor to determine whether the Sponsor hassufficient financial and management capabilities to carry its proposedprojects through to completion. This will avoid an overconcentration ofunits in one Sponsor. The project size limitations (see andSection; 885.720)will ensure that there will not be an overconcentration of units in oneapplication.7. <T3>Sponsor abilities. </T3>A commenter argued that proposed andSection;andSection;885.710(b) (14), (15), and (17) should be consolidated with other similarrequirements.The proposed requirements are identical to requirements currently containedin the section 202/8 program. Each of these requirements, while askingfor information that is similar to other submission requirements, servesa distinct purpose, as follows:_Proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(14) requires a description of any otherhousing projects or medical facilities sponsored, owned or operated bythe Sponsor. The purpose of this exhibit is to permit the assessment ofthe Sponsor's ability to provide housing services._Proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(15) requires a description of the Sponsor'spast or current involvement in any programs, or of its provision of services,other than housing, that demonstrates its management capabilities and experience,including a description of the Sponsor's experience in contracting withminority business enterprises or minority groups. This requirement addressesthe Sponsor's experience in the provision of services other than housing.This provides important information to assist in the evaluation of Sponsorswith no previous experience as housing providers. The final rule has beenrevised slightly to emphasize this point. (The commenter also claimed thatthis requirement duplicated information required in the service plan description.However, the service plan description merely describes the services tobe provided in connection with the project, and does not address the Sponsor'sability to provide such services.)_Proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(17) requires the submission of a descriptionof the Sponsor's ability and willingness to sponsor and to assist the Borrowerto develop, own, manage and provide appropriate services in connectionwith the proposed housing. This addresses the Sponsor's commitment to assistthe Borrower to carry the program through to long-term operation.A commenter argued the description of the Sponsor's management abilitiesand experience in contracting for services with minority enterprises shouldbe deferred until the conditional commitment stage. This information isnecessary to determine whether the Sponsor has demonstrated its capacityand commitment to assist and carry the project through to long term operation(a technical review criterion under andSection; 885.750(b)(1)(i)(A)); todetermine the extent to which the Sponsor has demonstrated this capacity(a ranking criterion under andSection; 885.750(c)(1)(i)); and to determinethe degree to which the application supports minority enterprises (a rankingcriterion under andSection; 885.750(c)(1)(ii)). The proposed change has notbeen made.Finally, a commenter suggested that HUD develop a list of specific questionsunder each of these requirements, rather than rely on a Sponsor-generatedformat. Due to the various levels of experience and commitment that Sponsorsmay bring to the program, HUD does not believe that the sought informationcan be obtained through the suggested method.8. <T3>Consultant's certificate. </T3>Proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(20) requiredthe Sponsor to submit the housing consultant's certificate and contractif consultant services were used. This requirement has been changed toreflect current HUD practice. The final rule requires the Sponsor to submitthe housing consultant's resume and a copy of the proposed consultant'scontract. A copy of the contract executed by the Borrower and an Identityof Interest and Disclosure Certification signed by the consultant willbe required with the request for Borrower eligibility.9. <T3>Intergovernmental review.</T3> Proposed andSection; 885.710(b)(21) requiredthe Sponsor to demonstrate that it has submitted copies of the applicationto the State single point of contact (SPOC) for intergovernmental review.Commenters suggested that HUD defer intergovernmental review until theconditional commitment stage. HUD is required to consult with the Stateand local officials as early in the program planning process as is reasonablyfeasible to explain specific plans and actions. This section is unchangedin the final rule.The proposed rule required the submission of the application to the SPOC.A commenter noted that the cost of such a submission would be approximately$200. HUD did not intend to require Sponsors to submit the entire applicationpackage to the SPOC. Rather, Sponsors are required to submit all informationrequired by the applicable State. Generally, the submission may be limitedto a brief synopsis of the application. The final regulation has been clarified.III. Program RequirementsA. <T3>General.</T3> One of the major obstacles to the development of housingfor handicapped families under the section 202/8 program was the requirementthat HUD conduct a detailed architectural and cost containment review ofall projects. The detailed reviews often delayed the construction of housingand, in many cases, unduly limited the flexibility of the project design.To remedy this problem, the proposed rules modified the design review.Cost containment was to be achieved through the establishment of developmentcost limits for projects and the application of certain cost containmentand modest design standards applicable to all projects. In addition tothe cost containment requirements, certain specified requirements (<T3>i.e.,</T3> HUD's minimum property standards, accessibility requirements,group home requirements, project size limitations, and site and neighborhoodstandards) were imposed.Commenters generally supported the elimination of the detailed review.However, several commenters felt that HUD's review should be more limitedthan that proposed. These commenters argued that some of the program requirementsmay be contrary to State and local requirements. The commenters urged thatthe architectural and cost containment review should be limited to reviewfor compliance with minimum property standards. Commenters' specific concernswere whether HUD could dictate whether garages may be provided, how manybathrooms may be provided, and how square footage should be allocated.HUD continues to believe that the requirements imposed in the rules arethe minimum necessary to ensure that projects provide an acceptable environmentfor handicapped residents. To HUD's knowledge, none of the specificallyimposed requirements are in conflict with State and local requirements.In most cases the specifically imposed requirements exceed State and localstandards.With regard to the commenter's specific concerns, we note that if the projectfalls within the established development cost limits, HUD will impose noprohibition against the provision of garages. Similarly, the square footagerequirements and bathroom requirements for group homes are minimum standardswhich may be exceeded as long as the project falls within the establisheddevelopment cost limits. (These minimum standards were developed basedon HUD's experiences with the development of group homes, a review of availablepublications addressing such matters, and a survey of group home standardsestablished in 22 States.) While HUD will establish limitations on thenumber of bathrooms in units for independent living complexes as a costcontainment measure, these limitations may be exceeded under certain circumstances(see andSection; 885.725(d)).Other commenters suggested that HUD establish abbreviated design reviewsfor certain types of projects (<T3>i.e.,</T3> projects that do not exceed 115% of the minimum square footagerequirements for group homes). HUD's review requirements are intended toexpedite development to the greatest extent possible and, as noted above,to impose the least intrusive design requirements. Consistent with statutoryrequirements that the program be designed to meet the special housing andrelated needs of nonelderly handicapped families, HUD does not believethat it can further truncate the procedures. The Advisory Committee urgedHUD to emphasize the quality of the project design, rather than to focussolely on cost containment, and concurred in HUD's determination that designreview should not be further reduced.Specific issues regarding each of the program requirements are discussedbelow.B. <T3>Project standards (andSection; 885.717).</T3> This section provided thatall projects must comply with minimum property standards; established minimumgroup home standards; and included accessibility requirements.1. <T3>Minimum group home standards.</T3> Proposed andSection; 885.717(b) statedthat each group home must provide a minimum of 290 square feet of pro ratedliving space for each resident, including a minimum of 80 square feet foreach resident in a shared bedroom and a minimum of 100 square feet fora single occupant bedroom; at least one full bathroom for every four residents;space for recreation at indoor and outdoor locations on the project site;and sufficient storage for each resident in the bedroom and other storagespace necessary for the operation of the home.Several commenters, while supporting the group home project standards,argued that the final rule should clearly state that the group homes standardsare a <T3>minimum,</T3> and encouraged HUD to permit local flexibility abovethese minimums. The proposed rule is sufficiently clear on this point.The proposed rule states, for example, that <T3>at least</T3> one bathroom is required for each four residents. Thiswould not prohibit a Sponsor from providing more bathrooms, if necessaryfor the residents served. The minimum standards, however, assure that theSponsor did not do so at the expense of reducing bedrooms to an unacceptablesize. No revision has been made in the final rule.The Advisory Committee was concerned that the minimum square footage requirementswould not ensure that bedrooms are fully accessible to persons in wheelchairs.The committee urged HUD to impose minimum square footage requirements forbedrooms that are required to be accessible. Commenters suggested othermethods to ensure accessibility. (<T3>E.g., </T3>commenters suggested that this section should be revisedto state that the minimum square footage requirement is exclusive of closetspace.)The proposed revisions have not been included in the final rule. Initially,HUD notes that the revisions are unnecessary in light of andSection; 885.717(c)(1)which requires compliance with Uniform Federal Accessibility Standards(24 CFR Part 40)(Subpart A)(UFAS). Moreover, the proposed revisions wouldnot always serve the commenter's purposes since the amount of space requiredto ensure wheelchair accessibility will vary with such factors as the shapeof the bedroom, the amount and location of furniture, and the number andlocation of closets and doors.One commenter objected to the reference to shared bedrooms. The commenterstated that the regulations must <T3>ensure </T3>that each resident in group homes has a private bedroomand is afforded a minimum amount of privacy. In some programs, double occupancyin bedrooms is considered to be a benefit. In other projects, private bedroomsmay promote a program goal. HUD does not choose to limit Sponsor flexibilityin this matter. The reference to shared bedrooms has not been eliminatedfrom the regulation.2. <T3>Accessibility requirements (andSection; 885.717(c)).</T3>_(a) <T3>Compliance with Federal requirements. </T3>The proposed rule requiredcompliance with UFAS and section 504 regulations (24 CFR Part 8). One commenterrecommended that the final rule should require all units to be fully accessibleto ensure compliance with section 504 and the Fair Housing Amendments Actof 1988. The final rule has been revised to refer to HUD's regulationsimplementing section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 794)(section 504), as well as the Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. 3601-3619).For new federally assisted housing, unless HUD prescribes a higher percentage,section 504 requires that at least five percent of the total dwelling unitsor at least one unit in a multifamily housing project (defined as a projectcontaining five or more dwelling units), whichever is greater, be madeaccessible for persons with mobility impairments and that an additionaltwo percent (but not less than one unit) be accessible for persons withhearing or vision impairments (see 24 CFR 8.22). (24 CFR Part 8 was addedby a final rule published June 2, 1988 (53 FR 20238).) These sections havenot, as yet, been included in the bound version of the Code of FederalRegulations). Conformance with sections three through eight of UFAS (AppendixA to 24 CFR Part 40) is sufficient to make the dwelling unit accessible(see 24 CFR 8.32).With respect to alterations to existing housing, section 504 requires thatif the alterations are substantial (<T3>i.e.</T3>, if the cost is 75 percent or more of the replacement costof the completed facility, and the project has 15 or more units), the requirementsapplicable to new housing apply. With respect to other alterations to existinghousing, section 504 requires that alterations to dwelling units and commonareas be made accessible to and usable by individuals with handicaps tothe maximum extent feasible. Unless HUD prescribes a higher percentage,once five percent of the dwelling units in a project are readily accessibleto and usable by individuals with mobility impairments, no additional dwellingunits are required to be made accessible (24 CFR 8.23). Finally, section504 requires that existing housing programs be operated so that, when viewedin their entirety, they are readily accessile to and usable by individualswith handicaps (24 CFR 8.24).The Fair Housing Act sets forth accessibility requirements which applyto all new ``covered multifamily dwellings'' for first occupancy afterMarch 13, 1991. ``Covered multifamily dwellings'' are defined as buildingsconsisting of four or more dwelling units if the building has at leastone elevator, and ground floor dwelling units in other buildings consistingof four or more dwelling units. (A final rule implementing the Fair HousingAct was published January 23, 1989 (54 FR 3232).) The accessibility requirementsfor these new covered multifamily dwellings require that public and commonuse areas be readily accessible to and usable by handicapped persons, thatdoors be sufficiently wide to allow passage into and within all premisesby persons in wheelchairs, and that individual dwelling units contain fourfeatures of adaptive design (54 FR 3289-90). These requirements are, insome respects, more modest than the section 504 accessibility requirements,but they apply to a greater percentage of dwelling units in covered buildings.With respect to existing units, in contrast to section 504, the Fair HousingAct does not apply to alterations. However, it does prohibit people fromrefusing to permit handicapped persons to make reasonable modificationsto existing premises which are necessary to afford the handicapped personfull enjoyment of the premises. Such modifications are made at the handicappedperson's own expense.(b) <T3>Accessibility of dwelling units. </T3>Proposed andSection; 885.717(c)(3)provided that in projects for individuals with chronic mental illness,a minimum of 10 percent of all dwelling units in an independent livingcomplex (or 10 percent of all bedrooms and bathrooms in a group home),but at least one of each such space, must be designed to be accessibleor adaptable for persons with physical handicaps. Paragraph (c)(4) providedthat in projects for persons with developmental disabilities or physicalhandicaps, all dwelling units in an independent living complex (or allbedrooms and bathrooms in a group home) must be designed to be accessibleor adaptable for persons with physical handicaps. Commenters proposed thatthe standards set forth in paragraph (c)(4) should apply to all CMI projects.These requirements reflect the fact that the accessibility needs of thechronically mentally ill population are substantially the same as thoseof the population at large. The proposed accessibility requirement was,therefore, based on a percentage of units. (This is the same approach usedin accessibility requirements for dwelling units under section 504 andthe Architectural Barriers Act of 1968.) By contrast, physically handicappedand developmentally disabled populations have greater need for increasedaccessibility. It is important to note that 10 percent is a minimum. Insome circumstances more than 10 percent of the dwelling units must be madeaccessible. For example, if a project for individuals with chronic mentalillness has an elevator and meets the definition of ``covered multifamilydwelling,'' all units must satisfy the accessibility requirements containedin the Fair Housing Act. If the project does not have an elevator and meetsthe definitions of ``covered multifamily dwelling'', then the ground floorunits must meet the accessibility requirements in the Fair Housing Act.The final rule is adopted as proposed.One commenter urged HUD to clarify whether handicapped-accessible meanswheelchair-accessible. The commenter noted that Sponsors serving a specializedhandicapped population (<T3>e.g.</T3>, persons with visual or hearing impairments) have specificneeds that are not necessarily related to wheelchair accessibility. Thefinal rule has been revised to clarify that accessibility, as used in andSection;885.717(c) (2) through (4), means a project or dwelling unit that complieswith the Uniform Federal Accessibility Standards. These standards are notlimited to wheelchair accessibility, but rather specify features for peoplewith all types of disabilities that may affect the use of their environment.Sponsors serving populations with distinct needs may provide additionalspecial equipment or features. Such special adaptations are not appropriatefor a general program standard.The Advisory Committee expressed approval of the proposed accessibilityrequirements for projects serving different handicapped populations andurged the Department to develop design guidance for assuring that projectsprovide accessibility and usability for all disabilities as well as providingexamples of different ways of achieving accessibility. HUD is consideringthe provision of such guidance through administrative issuances.(c) <T3>Other accessibility proposals.</T3> Commenters urged the addition ofvarious other accessibility requirements. (<T3>E.g.</T3>, all dwelling units in buildings with elevators must be adaptableand at least one dwelling unit, but not less than 25 percent of the totalnumber of dwelling units in buildings without an elevator which have dwellingunits on the ground floor and which contain three or more units, shallbe adaptable.) HUD believes that the accessibility requirements in UFAS,the section 504 regulations, the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, andthe additional adaptability and accessibility requirements contained inparagraphs (c) (2) through (4) are sufficient to ensure the developmentof projects that will address the needs of the handicapped populationsto be served. No further revisions have been made.A commenter argued that the final rule should state that the need for costcontainment will not override accessibility requirements. The proposedrule permits only one exception to the prescribed accessibility requirements.Under paragraph (c)(4), projects for persons with developmental disabilitiesand physical handicaps may provide a lesser number of accessible and adaptablebedrooms and bathrooms if the project involves acquisition, the cost ofproviding full accessibility makes the project financially infeasible,less than one-half of the intended occupants are expected to have mobilityimpairments, and the project complies with the requirements of 24 CFR 8.23.HUD believes that this exception is necessary to permit the use of acquiredproperties. The final rule is unchanged.C. <T3>Project size limitations (885.720)</T3>. Proposed andSection; 885.720established maximum project size limitations of: 15 persons on one site(group homes); 20 persons on one site (independent living complexes forchronically mentally ill people); and 24 units per site (independent livingcomplexes for handicapped families in the developmental disability or physicallyhandicapped occupancy categories). HUD received comments supporting higherand lower limitations.Commenters supporting lower limitations argued that the proposed rule wouldencourage the development of institutions, rather than homes. The projectsize limitations reflect the Department's policy of encouraging the developmentof operationally feasible housing that ensures the integration of nonelderlyhandicapped individuals into the community. HUD emphasizes that the regulationsets maximum, not minimum, requirements. Thus, Sponsors are free to developsmaller projects within the regulatory constraints. For example, the Sponsormay propose a lower limitation if it believes that such a project willenhance the integration of handicapped individuals into the community orwhere other constraints such as State and local requirements apply.Commenters supporting higher limits focused on the independent living complexlimitations. Commenters argued that these limitations do not reflect thepopulation and density of larger cities; do not permit the best use oflimited funds; and may not permit the provision of needed housing for peoplewith physical disabilities. Two commenters noted that this change wouldnegatively affect those Sponsors who, based on past section 202 practices,have acquired sites that permit the development of up to 40 units.The reduction of the independent living complex size limitation was proposedin recognition of past marketing problems associated with larger projects.Upon reconsideration and with the Advisory Committee's support, HUD hasrevised the final rule to recognize that there may be circumstances wherelarger projects should be permitted. Accordingly, HUD will, on a case-by-casebasis, approve larger independent living complexes where the Sponsor demonstratesthat: a greater number of units is necessary for the economic feasibilityof the project; the project size is compatible with other residential developmentand the population density of the area in which the project is to be located;a project of the size proposed can be successfully integrated into thecommunity; and a project of the size proposed is marketable in the community.Under the section 202/8 program, project size limitations for independentliving complexes for handicapped families in the developmental disabilityor physically handicapped occupancy categories were stated as unit <T3>and</T3> household limitations. For example under the Announcementof Fund Availability for the FY-1988 section 202/8 program published April13, 1988 (53 FR 12270), these independent living complexes were limitedto 40 units per site and no more than 40 households could be served onany one site. For the purpose of this limitation, a household had the samemeaning as handicapped family, except that unrelated handicapped individualssharing a unit (other than a handicapped person living with another personwho is essential to the handicapped person's well-being) were counted asseparate households. Additionally to foreclose the development of independentliving complexes serving large numbers of single unrelated persons, largebedroom units (<T3>i.e.</T3>, units with three or more bedrooms) could only be developedto serve handicapped families consisting of one or two parents with children.This final rule clarifies that these same policies will apply to independentliving complexes developed for families in the developmental disabilityor physically handicapped occupancy categories. Consistent with the limitationon number of units, the number of households permitted on a site will beset at 24.The proposed rule would permit HUD to impose additional project size limitationsin the annual NOFA. Based on the difficulty of amending rules, severalcommenters recommended the deletion of the project size limitations inthe rule in favor of including all project size limitations in the annualNOFA. Commenters argued that this approach would enable HUD to respondquickly to predicted trends toward smaller residences. Another commenteropposed an annual announcement. This commenter feared that Sponsors obtainingsites in advance of the NOFA and in reliance on past year's limitationswould be harmed by the provision.HUD believes that the NOFA provisions provide HUD with sufficient flexibilityto respond to housing trends for handicapped individuals while providingSponsors with consistency over the life of the program. The final ruleis unchanged.D. <T3>Cost containment and modest design standards (andSection;885.725).</T3>The proposed cost containment and modest design standards included restrictionson amenities, limitations on unit sizes, and limitations on the cost ofconstruction of special spaces and accommodations. Many commenters supportedthis section. Specifically, commenters supported: (1) The exclusion from``amenities'' of durable materials to control or reduce maintenance, repairand replacement costs; (2) provisions that permit 10 percent of the constructionfunds to be used for special spaces and accommodations; and (3) provisionspermitting the Sponsor to pay for features that exceed the cost containmentand modest design features.Upon reconsideration, HUD has modified the list of amenities to permitfunding of space and mechanical hook-ups for washers and dryers in individualunits in independent living complexes based on their value in assistingpeople with mobility impairments to live independently. Washers or dryers,however, are included on the list of amenities that HUD will not fund.No other changes have been made to this section.Section 885.725(c) would permit HUD to approve projects that do not complywith cost containment and modest design standards under certain circumstances.A commenter argued that HUD should also expand this provision to permitthe approval of projects that do not meet the requirements of this sectionwhere exemption is necessary to comply with State and local requirements.As noted above, the minimum project standards and requirements meet orexceed all State and local standards that HUD was able to identify. Accordingly,HUD does not believe that a cost containment and modest design standardexemption should be included.E. <T3>Prohibited facilities (andSection;885.727).</T3> The rule prohibits commercialspaces, infirmaries, nursing stations, spaces dedicated to the deliveryof medical treatment or physical therapy, padded rooms, or space for respitecare or sheltered workshops. Other types of facilities such as cafeterias,dining rooms, community rooms, and other similar facilities are not foreclosed.One commenter argued that space for the provision of services to the residentsshould be permitted.The use of facilities for the provision of supportive services is not foreclosedunder the rule. For example, a community room may be occasionally usedfor counseling. The rule prohibits the provision of facilities that arededicated to such uses since these facilities would be contrary to theresidential nature of the housing and would create institutional surroundings.Several commenters argued that the rule should not prohibit respite carefacilities. The commenters argued that if short-term respite care is provided,the provision of permanent and more costly housing could be avoided. Ata minimum, commenters argued that such space should be permitted if theSponsor agrees to pay for the space and the additional operating costs.One commenter urged HUD to define respite care. Respite care seems to havetwo accepted meanings in the industry. These include: the temporary provisionof accommodations and services to an individual, and the provision of servicesto a resident designed to prevent institutionalization of the individual(such services include nursing care, physical therapy, etc.) Under eitherof the accepted meanings, respite care facilities cannot be provided inassociation with the program. Respite care in the form of temporary housingand services is excluded because section 202 is intended to provide permanenthousing for program beneficiaries (see section 202(c), which precludesthe use of section 202 projects for transient or hotel purposes definedas rental for any period less than thirty days.) The provision of spacefor respite care for the provision of services to prevent institutionalizationis prohibited for the reasons cited in the previous paragraph.The facilities prohibitions do not specifically address living space forattendants or caregivers (<T3>e.g.</T3>, semi-independent apartment and cooperative family arrangementswhere case monitoring personnel live in one of the apartments or with mentallyill individuals). Commenters suggested that the rule should not prohibitsuch facilities since live-in personnel may be necessary for independentliving and integration into community life. The final rule allows for theprovision of such facilities, as long as other program requirements aremet.F. <T3>Site and neighborhood standards (andSection;885.730).</T3> Proposed andSection;885.730addressed site and neighborhood standards. The proposed rule provided,in part, that projects may not be located adjacent to certain facilities(schools or day care centers for handicapped persons, workshops, medicalfacilities or other housing primarily serving handicapped individuals)or in areas where such facilities are concentrated. Some commenters arguedthat this provision would undermine the Department's goal of increasedhousing opportunities for persons with disabilities. These commenters proposedthat HUD study the impact of this provision before it is permanently appliedto the program. The cited prohibition has been applied to the section 202/8program since its inception and has been successful in discouraging theconcentration of handicapped individuals in areas. HUD does not believethat further study of this prohibition is necessary.The Advisory Committee and commenters encouraged HUD to permit waiver ofthis provision. In making a waiver determination, the committee urged HUDto consider the comparative advantages offered by an otherwise prohibitedsite over other available sites. A commenter would permit waiver whereSponsors have no other suitable site options. It is unnecessary to includea waiver provision since the prohibition, like other regulatorily imposedrequirements of the section 202 program, is subject to Part 899 which permitsthe Secretary, upon a determination of good cause, to waive nonstatutorylimitations. The Department can waive this prohibition on a case-by-casebasis and may take into consideration the factors cited by the committeeand by the commenter in determining if good cause exists.This proposed section stated that projects may be located adjacent to otherhousing primarily serving handicapped persons if the projects togetherdo not exceed the project size limitations of andSection;885.720(a). Onecommenter argued that the final rule should permit a group home and anindependent living complex to be combined in one project. The commenterasserted that such combinations would permit provision of short-term supportfor clients moving to greater independence. The rule does not foreclosesuch innovative programs where the program objectives are served and thegroup home and independent living complex are included in one application.However, where such projects are proposed, the project size requirementsof the independent living complex would apply to the project size as awhole, and the group home limitation would apply to the number of personsthat may reside in the group home portion of the project.The proposed rule merely cited the site and neighborhood standards containedin Parts 880 and 881. These standards have been specified in the finalrule and the citation to Parts 880 and 881 has been eliminated. In addition,paragraph (c), which addresses the acceptability of new construction sitesin areas of minority concentration and in racially mixed areas, is derivedfrom existing policies, but provides greater detail on how the standardsare to be applied.G. <T3>Prohibited relationships (andSection;885.735).</T3> Proposed andSection;885.735addressed prohibited relationships including conflicts of interest. Theproposed rule provides that management contracts (including associatedmanagement fees) entered into by the Borrower with the Sponsor or the Sponsor'saffiliate will not constitute a conflict of interest if no more than oneperson salaried by the Sponsor or management affiliate is on the Borrower'sboard of directors. A commenter asked why officers and directors of theSponsor may enter into management contracts with the Borrower, while officersand directors of the Borrower may not.Initially, HUD notes that the cited provision does not permit officersor directors of the Sponsor to enter into management contracts with theBorrower. This exception is only applicable to management contracts betweenthe Sponsor (or the Sponsor's nonprofit affiliate) and the Borrower. Asexplained in the interim rule amending the section 202/8 program that waspublished April 10, 1986 (51 FR 12308), this exception to the general conflictof interest prohibition recognizes: (1) That one of the ranking and ratingfactors used by HUD to evaluate applications is the management capacityof the Sponsor; (2) that permitting Sponsors with management skills tomanage section 202 projects is a longstanding HUD practice; and (3) thatmany Sponsors that are national organizations have salaried officers ordirectors. Consequently, many Sponsors have developed significant managementexperience. HUD believed that it would be inappropriate and contrary tothe best interest of the program to bar such Sponsors from entering intomanagement contracts.In response to commenters, the limitation on the number of salaried employeesor officers of the Sponsor that may serve on the board of a Borrower withwhom the Sponsor has a management contract has been increased from oneto two. Additionally, the prohibition has been clarified to state thatthese two members of the board must be nonvoting members. This is consistentwith the policy recently adopted for the section 202/8 program.This section also limits the housing consultant's participation in outsidebusiness ventures with other development team members. A commenter notedthat this provision, when combined with HUD's low fee maximums, will makeit difficult for Sponsors to find individuals to provide consultant services.To address this problem, the commenter proposed a higher fee schedule.HUD does not believe that higher maximum fees are needed in light of thenumber of consultants that are available to provide services to Sponsorsand Borrowers under the section 202 program under the current fee schedules.In any event, consultant fees are not established by regulation and, therefore,are not addressed in this rule.H. <T3>Other Federal Requirements (andSection; 885.740)_</T3>1. <T3>Davis-Bacon Act. </T3>Under proposed andSection; 885.740(d), the Davis-Baconwage rate requirements would apply to projects designed for dwelling useby 12 or more handicapped families. Several commenters argued that theDavis-Bacon Act wage rates exception should be extended to all projects,or to specific sizes of projects. The proposed changes are contrary toHUD's statutory authority and have not been included.HUD does, however, believe that the applicability standard stated in theproposed rule and the statute is ambiguous and has clarified this provisionin the final rule. The statute and the proposed rule stated that Davis-Baconwage rate provisions apply to projects ``designed for dwelling use by 12or more <T3>families</T3>.'' The final rule states that these provisions will applyto independent living complexes that contain 12 or more units and thatgroup homes are not covered. This determination is based upon the definitionof elderly or handicapped families contained in section 202(d)(4) whichprovides, in part, that elderly or handicapped families may include twoor more elderly or handicapped persons living together; and upon HUD'streatment of similar family thresholds as unit thresholds for Davis-Baconpurposes (<T3>e.g., </T3>CDBG-funded rehabilitation of personal care residences).HUD notes that the threshold will be easier to administer and avoids problemsassociated with attempts to determine whether units are designed for morethan one family.Numerous commenters argued that the Davis-Bacon requirements should belifted immediately for smaller section 202/8 projects that have not reachedinitial loan closing before the effective date of the final rule. The applicabilityof the Davis-Bacon wage rate provisions to section 202/8 programs willbe addressed in a separate rulemaking.2. <T3>Relocation assistance. </T3>When the proposed rule was published, HUD(with the Department of Transportation as the lead agency) was preparinguniform government-wide regulations for Federal and Federally assistedprograms implementing the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real PropertyAcquisition Policies Act of 1970 (42 U.S.C. 4601) (URA), as amended bythe Uniform Relocation Act Amendments of 1987, Title IV of the SurfaceTransportation and Uniform Relocation Assistance Act of 1987 (Pub. L. 100-17,approved April 2, 1987). Effective April 2, 1989, certain relocation assistancerequirements apply to programs and projects that involve acquisition, rehabilitation,or demolition and receive Federal financial assistance. The proposed rule(andSection; 885.740(e)) stated that the URA and the government-wide implementingregulations (49 CFR Part 24) would apply to the program. The final government-widerule was published on March 2, 1989 (54 FR 8912).HUD does not anticipate that the development of housing for handicappedfamilies and individuals will cause a significant amount of displacementsince relocation payments will be funded by the Sponsor and not from thesection 202 loan proceeds. To the extent that displacement may occur, thefollowing relocation provisions have been included in the final rule atandSection; 885.740(e):_The URA and government-wide implementing regulations at 49 CFR Part 24set forth relocation assistance requirements that apply to the displacementof any person (family, individual, business, nonprofit organization orfarm) as a direct result of acquisition, rehabilitation or demolition fora project assisted under this part._For projects involving applications that are submitted without evidenceof control of an approvable site, a displacement from the real propertyis covered by the URA if it occurs on or after the date that the Sponsorobtains control of an approvable site. For projects involving applicationsthat are submitted with evidence of control of an approvable site, a displacementfrom the real property is covered by the URA if it occurs on or after thedate that the application is submitted. Displacements occuring on or afterthese dates, however, may not be covered if: (i) The person has been evictedfor cause based upon a serious or repeated violation of the material termsof the lease or occupancy agreement and HUD determines that the evictionwas not undertaken for the purpose of evading the obligation to providerelocation assistance; (ii) The person moved into the real property afterthe date specified above, but received prior written notice of the expecteddisplacement; (iii) The person is an owner-occupant and has been informedthat the real property will not be acquired for the project under the threatof eminent domain; or (iv) The Sponsor (Borrower) determines that the displacementdid not occur as a direct result of acquisition, rehabilitation, or demolitionfor the project and HUD concurs in that determination._If a person is displaced from the real property before the date specifiedabove and either HUD or the Sponsor (Borrower) determines that the displacementwas a direct result of acquisition, rehabilitation, or demolition, theperson shall be eligible for relocation assistance as a displaced person._The Borrower (Sponsor) may, at any time, request a HUD determination whethera displacement will be covered by the URA and the implementing regulations._A displaced person's eligibility for relocation assistance is subjectto the requirements in 49 CFR Part 24.3. <T3>Floodplains. </T3>The proposed rule stated that all projects wouldbe treated as critical actions requiring consideration of the 500-yearfloodplain for the purposes of Executive Order No. 11988, Floodplain Management.This required HUD to comply with an eight-step public notification anddecision-making process to determine if sites located in a 500-year floodplainare acceptable.A similar provision was included in a related notice announcing changesto the Supportive Housing Demonstration Program and soliciting commentson those changes (see 54 FR 736, published January 9, 1989). A commenterto that notice argued that the floodplain requirement conflicts with section504 and the Fair Housing Act.Upon reconsideration, HUD has amended the floodplain requirements. Underthe final rule, only applications for intermediate care facilities forthe mentally retarded and individuals with related conditions (see andSection;885.710(b)(4)(vii)) will be treated as critical actions requiring considerationof the 500-year floodplain. The residents of these projects will be themost vulnerable of the handicapped population to be served by the program.Their handicaps are of such a nature that they may require continuous activetreatment programs and high staffing levels. HUD notes that projects forthe elderly under the section 202/8 program are not critical actions subjectto the 500-year floodplain requirements. Accordingly, HUD believes thatthere is a sufficient basis for a determination that intermediate carefacilities are likely to contain occupants some of whom may not be sufficientlymobile to avoid loss of life or injury during flood or storm events. HUDhas a proposed rule pending to provide an agency-wide floodplain regulation.When this rule is published, HUD will seek public comment on the scopeof the definition of critical action.IV. Selection of Applications and Duration of Fund ReservationA. <T3>Review of applications for fund reservation (andSection; 885.750). </T3>HUD'sreview of applications for fund reservation consists of three stages: preliminaryevaluation, technical review processing, and ranking.1. <T3>Preliminary evaluation. </T3>Preliminary review would include a reviewof the receipt, timeliness and completeness of the application, the eligibilityof the Sponsor and the project, and the supportive services plan. The proposedrule provided no opportunity for the submission of missing documents orto overcome defects in the original submission.A commenter urged HUD to provide an opportunity for Sponsors to providemissing documents and to overcome minor defects in the original submission.The final rule has been revised to permit the submission of erroneouslyomitted documents or exhibits. Under the final rule, if an applicationis determined to be missing documents, the Sponsor will be advised in writingof the omissions and that additions will be be accepted if they are receivedon or before a specified date, generally 10 calendar days from the dateof the request for additional information.One commenter urged HUD to provide sufficient time between training sessionsand application due dates to permit Sponsors to thoroughly review applicationsfor errors. The timing of the training sessions and the application duedates are addressed in the annual NOFA. HUD's NOFAs attempt to provideSponsors with the maximum amount of time for the preparation of applicationsconsistent with the constraints imposed by the annual funding cycle andthe need to provide sufficient time for HUD review and selection. 2. <T3>Technical review processing. </T3>HUD would perform a technical reviewof each application that is found to be acceptable under preliminary evaluation.Comments addressing specific aspects of technical review were addressedunder the related application requirements above.3. <T3>Ranking. </T3>HUD would assign a rating to each application that isfound to be approvable under technical review and rank all applicationsin order of their assigned ratings within each allocation area. Ratingpoints would be assigned based on several factors, including the Sponsor'sability to provide or facilitate the provision of the proposed supportiveservices to handicapped individuals meeting the proposed occupancy requirements.This ranking factor has been clarified. In the final rule, this rankingfactor will include the consideration of the Sponsor's experience servingminority handicapped persons.The ranking factors also included an assessment of the special needs (seeproposed andSection; 885.750(c)(1)(ii)). The special needs included in theproposed rule were those listed in section 213(d)(4) of the Housing andCommunity Development Act of 1974 that HUD believed were relevant to theprogram. (These included the degree to which the application supports minorityenterprise, involves a small research or demonstration project, or providesan innovative housing program or alternative method of meeting lower-incomehousing need.) Upon review of the section 213 special needs factors, thefinal rule has been revised to permit HUD to consider additional specialneeds including the degree to which the application meets unforseeablehousing needs, especially those brought on by natural disasters or specialrelocation requirements, and lower-income housing needs described in housingassistance plans.Commenters addressed the following issues with regard to the ranking procedure.(a) <T3>Site control.</T3> The proposed rule stated that HUD may assign additionalrating points to applications with satisfactory evidence of an approvablesite. The provision has been clarified in the final rule to provide thatHUD may assign additional points to applications that include satisfactoryevidence of control of an approvable site.This section was supported by the Advisory Committee. One commenter, however,argued that the assignment of additional points for approvable sites wouldpenalize projects serving persons with chronic mental illness since localzoning ordinances place fewer restrictions on the location of housing fordevelopmentally disabled and physically handicapped persons.In FY-1989, Congress directed HUD to fund 950 units serving deinstitutionalizedhomeless chronically mentally ill people. The announcement of funds availabilityfor FY-1989 stated that approximately 40 percent of the funds availablein each region would be designated for this population. Accordingly, projectsproposing to serve persons with chronic mental illness will not competeagainst projects serving other disability groups and, thus, should notbe adversely affected by this requirement during this funding cycle. Thepool of applications received this year will permit HUD to determine whetherit is substantially more difficult for such projects to present satisfactoryevidence of an approvable site. Future decisions to award additional pointsto projects with approvable sites will be based, in part, on this analysis.One commenter argued that HUD must develop a method to ensure that thesite is adequate to support the intended project. As noted in the proposedrule, in order to be awarded additional points under this criterion, theSponsor must submit the evidence described in andSection; 885.705(a). Theadequacy of this evidence is judged under the criteria described in andSection;885.705 (b) and (c).Several commenters thought that applicants providing site information shouldnot be penalized in the ranking processs if HUD does not approve the site.HUD does not intend to penalize such applications. If the site is not approvableand the Sponsor has indicated a willingness to develop the project on adifferent site, the project will be rated as if no site information wassubmitted.A commenter argued that HUD should require assurances that Sponsors willadhere to the proposal for which they receive extra points. It may be necessaryoccasionally to permit the substitution of a site following selection.This occurs from time to time in the section 202/8 program for the elderlywhen site control is required at the time of the application, and siteand architectural design are significant rating factors. Before a substitutesite will be approved, HUD will review the site to ensure that it wouldhave received an equal or better approval rating under the criterion forthe award of additional points.(b) <T3> Acquisition projects.</T3> The proposed rule stated that HUD may alsoassign additional points for group homes using acquisition as the developmentmethod. This provision was also supported by the Advisory Committee. Onecommenter complained that HUD, at the ranking stage, will not have costdata demonstrating that acquisition would be more cost effective than newconstruction.HUD's decision to permit the assignment of additional points for acquisitionprojects was not based solely on anticipated cost savings, but also uponthe time savings that are generally realized in the development of suchprojects. The provision of additional points for such projects would, thus,further the goal of expedited development.(c) <T3>Number of points to be awarded. </T3>A commenter asked how many additionalpoints will be assigned to applications with site control. If additionalpoints for satisfactory evidence of control of an approvable site (or forgroup homes using the acquisition method) are to be awarded, the announcementof funds availability will describe the maximum number of points that willbe awarded under the factor. For FY-1989, HUD intends to award up to 10points to applications with satisfactory evidence of control of an approvablesite. Applications receiving points for site control and proposing to developa group home by acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation willreceive up to five additional points.B. <T3>Duration of Section 202 fund reservations (andSection; 885.770).</T3>This section contained provisions for extension and cancellation of thefund reservation and for appeal of HUD decisions to cancel the fund reservation.The proposed rule provided that the duration of the initial reservationis 18 months and that extensions of up to 36 months may be obtained.One commenter argued that the duration of the fund reservation should beextended beyond the proposed 36-month period to reflect the actual experienceof projects in large urban centers. In enacting section 162 of the 1987Act, Congress found that the use of the section 202/8 program for the developmentof housing for nonelderly handicapped families was unnecessarily time-consuming(see section 162(a)(1)(F)). The procedures contained in the proposed rulewere designed, in part, to expedite development by improving the efficiencyof the process. HUD has reconsidered the proposed 36-month extension period.In light of the intent of the legislation to expedite the development ofhandicapped projects and the anticipated efficiency of the process underthe new rules, HUD will permit extensions of 24 months, the extension periodthat is currently allowed under the section 202/8 program. HUD notes thatprojects for handicapped people developed under the more time-consumingsection 202/8 procedures have reached initial loan closing in less timeand that 12 months is not an unusual period. HUD believes that projectsunder this new program should be able to reach initial loan closing withinthis 24-month time period.Some commenters asked HUD to explain what will happen if delays causedby zoning problems and other legal difficulties prevent initial closingby the extended time periods. If a Borrower is unable to complete the requiredactions within the time extensions provided under andSection; 885.770(a),HUD will issue a notice of loan cancellation. If the Borrower fails toappeal the cancellation notice, or if the appeal is disapproved, the fundreservation will be cancelled. If HUD Headquarters approves the appeal,HUD will issue a written notice indicating the extended duration of thefund reservation.C. <T3>Transition (andSection; 885.775).</T3> Under proposed andSection; 885.775,recipients of section 202/8 fund reservations for projects for nonelderlyhandicapped families would be permitted to request project assistance paymentsunder the new program if initial loan closing has not occurred. If theproject is eligible for assistance under the new program and is financiallyinfeasible with contract rents limited by section 8 FMRs (or the substitutionwould otherwise facilitate the development of the project in a timely manner),the request will be granted to the extent that funds are available.Commenters generally supported the transition provision. Several commentersurged HUD to facilitate the substitution of section 202/8 projects andto expand the scope of the transition provision. (For example, commentersargued the HUD should apply the new program to <T3>all </T3>previously approved section 202 reservations or should permitall Sponsors with such pipeline projects to elect the new program.) Othersurged HUD to seek additional authority from Congress to permit the transitions.Under current Appropriation Act restrictions, it is not possible to convertprojects with section 8 commitments to the new program without the lossof the section 8 fund reservation. Since no funds have been appropriatedfor assistance to previously selected projects, it is not currently possibleto implement the transition provisions. Given Federal budget constraints,the Department believes that it is appropriate to utilize reserved section8 funds as originally intended, rather than to seek new appropriations,HUD's Advisory Committee agreed with this position, but stated its strongsupport that HUD take further action to assure implementation of the transitionprovision.Some commenters sought clarification of the transition provision. For example,commenters suggested the HUD should fully describe how funds will be madeavailable and the procedures for review of transition applications. HUDwill clarify such procedures as appropriate when funds become availablefor this purpose.V. Direct Loan Processing Procedures A. <T3>Submission of site information (andSection;885.780).</T3> Under the proposedrule, the Sponsor is not required to submit site information until thefund reservation is issued. The fund reservation would include a deadlinefor the submission of this information. A commenter asked what actionsHUD would take if this deadline is not met. HUD will provide appropriateextensions of the deadlines set in the notice of fund reservation. However,failure to submit the information within the described time periods maybe an element in HUD's determination that the Borrower is not making satisfactoryprogress toward the start of construction, rehabilitation or acquisitionand may result in the cancellation of the fund reservation under andSection;885.770.Upon reconsideration, HUD has made three revisions to the site informationsubmission provision. These include:<ITAG tagnum="15">_The Sponsor is required to provide documentary evidence of site controlwith the submission of site information. The proposed rule provided forthe submission of site control information at the conditional commitmentstage.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_HUD has revised paragraph (c)(1) to reflect the requirements of section213(b)(1) of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974. Under thefinal rule, HUD is not required to forward applications involving 12 orfewer units for local government review and comment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Provisions governing HUD's review of the site information are revisedto state that HUD will consider the suitability of the site for its intendeduse.</ITAG>One commenter suggested that the final rule should require HUD to supplya site appraisal when it approves the site under andSection;885.780(d). Itis not feasible for HUD to perform a complete site appraisal before itapproves the site. While the final rule provides for site appraisal atconditional commitment, HUD will endeavor to perform the site appraisalas soon as possible following the submission of site information and beforethe conditional commitment stage.B. <T3>Request for direct loan financing (andSection;885.800)</T3>._1. <T3>Request for determination of Borrower eligibility.</T3> Simultaneouslywith the request for direct loan financing, the Borrower must submit arequest for determination of Borrower eligibility. Commenters addressedthe following requirements.(a) <T3>Board certification.</T3> Proposed andSection;885.800(b)(1)(i) requiredcertain certifications from officers and directors of the Sponsor and Borrower.This section has been revised slightly for clarity.(b) <T3>Composition of Board.</T3> Proposed andSection;885.800(b)(2)(iii)(E)stated that the Borrower's board must be composed of seven persons. A commenterargued that the size of the Board is irrelevant to HUD. Based on the paperworkburdens imposed by the appointment of each member, the commenter arguedthat the number should be left to State law and the Sponsor. HUD agrees.This provision has been eliminated from the final rule.(c) <T3>Sole purpose Borrower.</T3> Under proposed andSection;885.800(b)(2)(iv),the Borrower must demonstrate that it is not authorized to engage in anyother business or activity (including the operation of another rental property)or to incur any liability or obligation that is not related to the project.Numerous commenters suggested that the final rule should permit the Borrowerto operate other section 202 projects.The purpose of this provision is to give HUD sole claim to the assets ofthe Borrower corporation in case of default under the regulatory agreement;to ensure that the financial problems of one section 202 project will notaffect the financial integrity of another; and to limit the impact of aBorrower's financial problems to one section 202 project. The final rulehas been revised to clarify that the Borrower may not have engaged in anyother business or activity or incurred any liability or obligation thatis not related to the project, prior to the submission of the request fordetermination of Borrower eligibility.(d) <T3>Borrower eligibility.</T3> The Borrower is required to submit a requestfor preliminary determination of eligibility as a mortgagor on a form prescribedby HUD (andSection;885.800(b)(2)(vi)). One commenter was concerned that theform would contain additional eligibility requirements. HUD's form reflectsthe Borrower eligibility requirements contained in the final rule and willnot impose additional eligibility requirements. 2. <T3>Conditional commitment processing.</T3> Under proposed andSection;885.800(c)(3),the Borrower would be required to submit a statement describing any proposedmethods to be used in construction and rehabilitation that will promoteconstruction efficiencies. One commenter urged the deletion of this requirement,arguing that Borrower's submissions under this provision will be recitalsof the regulatory cost containment requirements. The Advisory Committeesupported the retention of this requirement.Compliance with cost containment requirements is one method of limitingproject development costs and is required of every project. The purposeof this provision is to encourage Sponsors and Borrowers to identify anduse other methods of limiting construction cost, such as new constructiontechnologies. Accordingly, the provision has been retained. Since suchinformation is relevant to the project selection process, this submissionwill be required in the application rather during conditional commitmentprocessing.3. <T3>Firm commitment processing.</T3> Under andSection;885.780(d), HUD wouldpermit a Borrower to submit a request for firm commitment without previousconditional commitment processing under certain circumstances. The AdvisoryCommittee supported the elimination of the two-stage commitment processingprocedures for most projects. Other commenters urged the elimination ofthe two-stage procedure where the original application included acceptablesite control information. (The commenters noted that Sponsors often havetrouble extending site options and that the two-stage commitment processwould unduly delay such projects.)Many elements are reviewed during conditional commitment processing. Theseinclude: Determination of Borrower eligibility, establishment of initialcontract rents, review of design, establishment of land value, review ofoverall project feasibility, and evaluation of the fair housing marketingplan. Accordingly, HUD does not believe that it is appropriate to allowfor one-stage processing as a general rule or to permit all projects withapproved sites to proceed directly to firm commitment.The final rule has been revised, however, to permit more projects to bypassconditional commitment. One of the major obstacles to the issuance of afinal commitment is the development of a project design that is acceptableto HUD on an architectural and engineering basis. The development of aproject design is a time-consuming process often involving a continuingseries of discussions between HUD architects and engineers and the Borrower.HUD believes that projects with designs that have been developed throughthis continuing design consultation can be processed on an expedited basis.Accordingly, the final rule has been revised to permit projects to proceeddirectly to firm commitment where HUD has issued written architecturaland engineering approval of preliminary design plans and specifications.At this stage, the Borrower will have filed for a determination of eligibility,established site control and received a site appraisal, and reached anagreement with HUD staff on the preliminary drawings.C. <T3>Operating cost standard (andSection; 885.807). </T3>Under proposed andSection;885.807, HUD would annually establish operating cost standards based onthe average annual operating cost of comparable housing for handicappedfamilies in each field office jurisdiction. The operating cost standardis used to determine the amount of project assistance reserved for a projectunder andSection; 885.755(a)(3) and to review the reasonableness of operatingcosts for the establishment of initial contract rents (andSection; 885.800(c)).Numerous commenters supported the elimination of the link between operatingcosts and FMRs, and between FMRs and rents.1. <T3>Costs included in the computation. </T3>Commenters warned that it isimperative that the operating cost standard permit adequate rents and drawa clear line between project expense (operation of the facilities) andprogram expenses (provision of supportive services to the residents).Under the proposed rule, operating costs were defined as administrativeexpenses (including salary and management expenses related to the provisionof shelter), maintenance expenses, security expenses, utility expenses,taxes and insurance, and allowances for reserves. Operating costs specificallyexcluded expenses related to administering, or managing the provision of,supportive services. These costs will take into account all necessary andreasonable costs of operating the project. The amount of the initial contractrents plus any utility allowances will be sufficient to meet the annualreasonable and necessary operating cost of the project plus the annualdebt service on the amount of the section 202 loan.Commenters asked whether operating expenses would include costs associatedwith professional management consultants during rent-up, the initial yearof operations and occupancy, and retraining periods when a Sponsor hasa turnover of trained personnel. Administrative expenses (including salaryand management expenses) are included in the computation of the operatingcost standard and may include the cost of a management consultant.Since the term ``operating costs'' is used elsewhere in the regulations(see andSection; 885.975), the final rule has moved the provision definingoperating costs from andSection; 885.807(b) to the definitions section forthe new program.2. <T3>Procedures for development of standards. </T3>One commenter suggestedthat the operating cost standards should be developed with industry participation.The commenter suggested that the Advisory Committee, Sponsors, and othermembers of the private sector could serve as resources. HUD intends todevelop the cost standards at HUD Headquarters based on information submittedby the field offices. Currently, HUD does not anticipate the participationof other entities.D. <T3>Amount and terms of financing (andSection; 885.810)._</T3>1. <T3>Development cost limit. </T3>Proposed andSection; 885.810(c) establisheda total development cost limit based on per unit cost limits (for independentliving complexes) and provided that cost limitations would be published(for group homes). Numerous commenters supported the elimination of thelink between the development cost limitations and FMRs.(a) <T3>Independent living complexes. </T3>Several commenters feared that theproposed per unit cost limitations for independent living complexes wouldnot cover development costs in some areas, particularly larger metropolitanareas. (Commenters argued that the per unit cost limits were suitable onlyfor multifamily buildings with no special features and do not reflect thecost of building and maintaining small fireproof elevator buildings forphysically handicapped residents in such areas). Commenters urged greaterflexibility in order to adequately reflect disparate development costs.Suggestions included: (1) The waiver of the limitations in central cityareas and other areas of high density, if the structure is designed economicallyand meets HUD standards; and (2) the inclusion of primary metropolitanstatistical areas of two million or more (or specific areas such as NewYork City) as high cost adjustment areas under andSection; 885.810(c)(3)(ii)(currently these areas include Guam, Alaska and Hawaii). One commenterurged HUD to develop independent living complex cost limits by using amethodology similar to that proposed for group homes (see discussion below).The Advisory Committee was also concerned that the unit cost limits wouldnot be high enough to fund construction for handicapped people and urgedHUD to review this issue carefully.After consideration of these comments, HUD has retained the proposed perunit cost limits for independent living complexes. The proposed limitsare based upon the same limitations prescribed under the section 202/8program and reflect the unit limitations of section 221(d)(3) of the NationalHousing Act. In FR-2445_Miscellaneous Revisions to FHA Single Family andMultifamily Mortgage Insuring Authorities; Section 202 Per Unit Cost Limitspublished March 18, 1988 (53 FR 8874), the section 202 per unit cost limitationswere increased and HUD's authority to raise the limitation in high costareas was increased from 75 to 110 percent. In that rule, HUD determinedthat these limitations sufficiently took into account design features necessaryto meet the needs of elderly or handicapped residents and reflect the costof providing features as required by section 202(i)(3). Given the factthat these limitations were recently found to be sufficient to supportthe objective of encouraging the construction and substantial rehabilitationof multifamily residences for lower income handicapped families, HUD willnot revise these limits in this rule. HUD notes that these limits havenot, as yet, served as an effective mortgage restriction since the amountof most section 202/8 loans was limited by the amount of debt service thatcould be supported under the applicable Fair Market Rents, rather thanthe per unit cost limit. (Indeed, the elimination of the FMR-imposed loanlimitation was one of the primary reasons for the enactment of section162). Further, HUD believes that the economic feasibility of projects inlarge metropolitan areas will be improved by the provisions of this finalrule which permit the development of independent living complexes thatexceed the project size limitations under certain circumstances (see andSection;885.720(c)).HUD intends to study the impact of these limits on development of independentliving complexes under the section 202 handicapped program during the initialyears of the program, particularly in light of commenters' allegationsregarding higher costs in some metropolitan areas. If the limits proveto be inadequate to ensure the development of satisfactory housing underthe program, HUD may make appropriate revisions and adjustments to thelimits in a later rule.(b) <T3>Group homes. </T3>Proposed andSection; 885.810(c)(2) provided that HUDwould periodically establish cost limits for various sizes of group homes.The cost limits would reflect those costs reasonable and necessary to developa project of a size that will accommodate the specified number of residents,and comply with HUD's minimum property standards, the minimum square footagerequirements, bathroom and recreational area requirements, cost containmentand modest design standards, and other design requirements applicable togroup homes. Commenters generally supported the development of the grouphome cost limit.A commenter was concerned that the group home limit would reflect onlythe minimum requirements prescribed under the regulations (<T3>e.g.</T3>, the minimum square footage requirements). This was not HUD'sintent. The final rule has been clarified to indicate that the cost limitwill reflect those costs reasonable and necessary to develop a group homeof modest design that, at a minimum, complies with the cited requirements.Commenters suggested that HUD's calculation should include adjustmentsfor: number of individuals that will be served; local characteristics suchas State and local building code requirements; the severity of the disabilitiesof the handicapped population proposed to be served; and regional costdifferences. HUD intends to include appropriate adjustments in the grouphome cost limits. The final rule has been modified for clarity.Some commenters asked whether specific design features will be consideredin the calculation of HUD's group home limits. These included live-in managers'units, staff offices and garages. The modest design currently under considerationby HUD includes a staff office and an efficiency apartment for staff, butdoes not include a garage. HUD notes that the modest design that it usesdoes not require a Borrower to provide all facilities included in the design,or preclude the provision of facilities that are not included in the design,as long as the minimum requirements of this rule are met and the costsof the project are within the group home limit. 2. <T3>Increased mortgage limits. </T3>Proposed andSection; 885.810(c)(3) includedprovisions for increased cost limits for group homes and independent livingcomplexes in high cost areas. The rule stated that the Assistant Secretarymay increase the cost limits by up to 110 percent in any geographic areaswhere the cost levels require, and may increase the cost limit by up to140 percent on a project-by-project basis. (Additional adjustments arepermitted for projects in Guam, Alaska and Hawaii.) HUD notes that the group home limitations will already be adjusted to reflectsuch factors as the disabilities of the handicapped population proposedto be served and State and local building codes. Accordingly, the Departmentdoes not anticipate that it will be necessary to grant increases to thecost limits for group homes on a project-by-project basis (<T3>i.e., </T3>increases between 110 and 140 percent). One commenter thought that this section did not clearly indicate whetherthe maximum limits under andSection; 885.810(c)(3) were 140 percent or 240percent of the published limits. The cited provision, which made only minormodifications to a similar provision contained in the section 202/8 regulations,adequately reflects HUD's decision to permit mortgages of up to 240 percentof the published limitation. (<T3>E.g., </T3>if the applicable published limit for an independent livingcomplex is $300,000, HUD may increase the limit to $630,000 based on thegeographic area modification, and to $720,000 based on the project-by-projectmodification.) The text of this rule is unchanged. Another commenter alleged that it takes approximately 60 to 90 days toprocess increased mortgage limit requests on a project-by-project basisunder similar section 202/8 regulations. The commenter asserted that thechief cause of this delay is design review. The commenter suggested thatHUD field offices should be authorized to approve up to the maximum limitswithout Headquarters review where a Borrower uses a design that complieswith cost containment requirements. Contary to the commenter's allegations, the duration of HUD Headquarter'sreview of requests is generally limited to two weeks. While HUD may laterdecide to delegate greater responsibility for such requests to the fieldoffices, HUD will continue to review requests at Headquarters during thefirst few years of the program. The consideration of requests at HUD Headquarterswill provide the most effective means of analyzing the appropriatenessof the development cost limitations during the first few years of programoperations. 3. <T3>Cost savings incentives. </T3>In the preamble, HUD stated that it wasconcerned that the proposed rule offered no incentive to keep costs belowthe maximum development cost limit. The Department suggested that the finalrule may allow Borrowers to retain some portion of the savings in a developmentcontingency account where the total development cost is less than the developmentcost limit. Several commenters endorsed a provision that would permit Borrowersto retain up to 50 percent of the cost savings for use for project-relatedexpenditures or to construct additional units of housing in the project.HUD also invited comments on awarding additional rating points to Sponsorswhose prior projects were developed within the development cost limits.A commenter did not believe that it is possible to prepare developmentcost limitations that adequately and fairly adjust costs between geographicareas and argued that this proposal, thus, may not result in the selectionof projects in communities that have the greatest need. HUD continues to believe that cost saving incentives may have merit forthe section 202 handicapped program. However, HUD is not prepared to implementan incentive at this time. In the initial years of this new program's operation,HUD intends to study the development cost limits for group homes and independentliving complexes to determine if they adequately reflect development costsof such projects. As HUD gathers information concerning the adequacy ofthe limitations and makes appropriate revisions, HUD intends to reconsiderthe cost saving incentive. The Advisory Committee supported the developmentof such cost saving incentives. 4. <T3>Mortgage amounts; acquisitions. </T3>Several commenters supported theelimination of the 25 percent reduction in mortgage amounts for acquisitionsand supported other provisions designed to encourage acquisition as a developmentmethod (see andSection; 885.810(d)). Section 885.810(d)(1) of the proposed rule stated that if a Sponsor isthe fee simple owner of property unencumbered by a mortgage, the maximumloan amount may not exceed 100 percent of the proposed cost of rehabilitation.Paragraph (d)(2) stated that if the Sponsor owns property subject to anoutstanding indebtedness that is to be refinanced with the section 202loan, the maximum loan amount may not exceed the cost of rehabilitationplus the portion of the outstanding indebtedness that does not exceed thefair market value of the land and improvements before rehabilitation. Onecommenter argued that this section encourages Sponsors who own propertyin fee simple to obtain mortgages in order to circumvent the intent ofthe program. When property to be rehabilitated is subject to an existing mortgage, theindebtedness is refinanced (up to the Fair Market Value) in order to bringthe property under a single mortgage held by HUD. To avoid the situationcited by the commenter, the mortgage credit review of the project includesan investigation of any outstanding indebtedness recently placed againstthe property to ensure that it was not created in an attempt to circumventthis section. 5. <T3>Loan interest rate. </T3>Proposed andSection;885.810(f) addressed thecalculation of the annual loan interest rate and the availability of anoptional interest rate. The proposed rule stated that if initial loan closingdid not occur within 18 months of the notice of fund reservation, HUD wouldcancel the election of the optional rate and use the annual loan interestrate for the loan. A commenter noted that the majority of projects do notclose within 18 months of the fund reservation and, thus, it will be extremelydifficult for most Borrowers to use the optional interest rate. The commenterurged HUD to eliminate the 18-month limitation. The loan interest rate provisions incorporated in the proposed rule wereidentical to those contained in the section 202/8 interim rule publishedon June 1, 1988 (53 FR 19899). In that interim rule, HUD noted that theexisting regulations permit the cancellation of the fund reservation ifit can be established that the Borrower is not making satisfactory progresstoward the start of construction, rehabilitation or acquisition; or ifconstruction, substantial rehabilitation or acquisition is not begun within18 months after the issuance of the initial fund reservation. (A substantiallyidentical provision is included in this final rule at andSection;885.770(a).)While section 202 does not provide an expiration date for the optionalinterest rate, HUD concluded that it would be contrary to the goal of encouragingreasonable progress toward project operation to permit the optional rateto apply to the duration of an extended fund reservation. While HUD announcedthat it would continue to provide appropriate extensions of time for fundreservations, it stated that it would not permit the Borrower to receivethe benefits of the optional rate during the period of the extension. Thefinal rule here adopts this same policy.<ITAG tagnum="21">(Note: A final rule on loan interest rate provisions for the section202/8 program was published on November 9, 1988 (53 FR 45265). The interimrule was adopted without change.)</ITAG>6. <T3>Announcement of loan interest rate. </T3>Under proposed andSection;885.810(g),the annual interest rate would be announced in the <T4> Federal Register </T4>and the optional interest rate would be madeavailable at the Borrower's request. One commenter argued that HUD shouldautomatically notify the Borrower of the current optional interest rate.HUD's current policy is to advise all Borrowers that are eligible to usethe optional rate whenever the rate falls below the statutory ceiling.(The statutory ceiling is currently 9.25 percent.) HUD does not believethat it is necessary to incorporate this practice into the final regulations.7. <T3>Minimum capital investment. </T3>Proposed andSection;885.810(h) wouldrequire Borrowers to provide a minimum capital investment of one-half ofone percent of the mortgage amount committed to be disbursed, not to exceed$10,000. This amount would be placed in escrow at the initial loan closingand held for three years following initial occupancy. A commenter suggestedthat HUD should release unexpended minimum capital investment funds atfinal closing. This change would provide an incentive to Borrowers to proceedto final loan closing. The purpose of the escrow account is to assure the Borrower's continuedcommitment to the development, management and operation of the project.Accordingly, HUD does not believe that it is appropriate to release unexpendedminimum capital investment funds at final closing. This position was supportedby the Advisory Committee. E. <T3>Loan disbursement procedures (andSection;885.820). </T3>Under the proposedrule, disbursements to the Borrower would be made on a periodic basis,in amounts not to exceed the HUD-approved cost of the portion of work completedand in place, minus an appropriate holdback. One commenter alleged thatprocessing of a loan disbursement takes three and one-half weeks and thatthis delay is difficult for small contractors. The commenter urged HUDto revise its procedures to permit Borrowers to draw down the entire amountof the loan at initial loan closing. Payments to the contractor would bebased on the percentage of completion certified by the HUD inspector. HUD is implementing a new procedure that will permit disbursements to bemade by wire transfer. This new procedure should be available within oneyear and is expected to reduce the processing time for loan disbursementsby one-half. In light of this new procedure and to ensure that disbursementswill not be made until work is completed, HUD has not made the proposedchange. F. <T3>Completion of cost certification (andSection;885.825). </T3>ProposedandSection;885.825(b) addressed required cost certifications at final loanclosing. In response to commenters, HUD has revised cost certificationprocedures to address the various responsibilities of Borrowers and constructioncontractors, including the availability of short-form cost certificationprocedures and the requirements for verification by an independent publicaccountant. Under the final rule: <ITAG tagnum="15">_Where the construction contract was a cost-reimbursement contractwith a ceiling price: (1) The Borrower must certify, on a form prescribedby HUD, as to the actual cost to the Borrower of the construction contract,architectural, legal, organizational, off-site costs and all other itemsof legitimate expense; and (2) the general contractor (and such subcontractors,material suppliers, and equipment lessors as HUD may require) must certify,on a form prescribed by HUD, as to the actual cost paid for labor, materials,and subcontract work under the general contract. The certificates mustnot include as actual costs any kickbacks, rebates, trade discounts, orother similar payments to the Borrower or to any of its officers, directors,or members. For projects with a mortgage of $750,000 or more, the certificatesmust be verified by an independent public accountant acceptable to thefield office. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">_Where the construction contract required the contractor to furnishall labor, materials, equipment and services required to construct andcomplete the project for a specified and firm fixed price, the Borrowermust submit a simplified short-form cost certification on a form prescribedby HUD, and no certification is required from the contractor. For projectswith a morgage of $750,000 or more, the cost certification must be verifiedby an independent public accountant acceptable to the field office. </ITAG>One commenter argued that cost certification requirements should be tiedto the amount of the construction contract, not the size of the mortgage.The purpose of the cost certification is to have verification of the totaldevelopment costs of the project including all items of legitimate expense,not only the amount of the construction contract. The final rule is unchangedon this point.   Another commenter suggested various revisions that would allow qualifiedconsulting firms to perform, and receive a fee for, the cost certificationfor projects with mortgages of under $750,000. The commenter would alsopermit payment of such a fee to the Sponsor where the Sponsor is able toperform this audit in-house. HUD will permit consulting firms to performsuch cost certifications on behalf of the Borrower. However, the fee forsuch services must be included under the consultation agreement. HUD willnot permit the consultant to collect a fee in addition to fees providedunder the consultation agreement for such services. Sponsors will be prohibitedfrom receiving such payments (see andSection;885.735, which addresses prohibitedrelationships). G. <T3>Additional provisions. </T3>In addition to the comments discussed above,commenters argued that HUD should follow additional procedures to expeditethe processing of applications and the development of projects. Suggestedprocedures included the establishment of management goals similar to thosethat have previously been imposed in the section 202/8 program, requirementsfor development conferences and adherence to development schedules by theBorrower and the HUD staff; and HUD supervision of the builder to ensurethe total compliance with plans and specifications. These suggested proceduresare already followed under the section 202 program and HUD intends to continueto use them under the new program for housing for handicapped people. HUDdoes not believe that these procedures must be incorporated in the regulations.VI. <T3>Project Assistance Contract</T3> There were no comments addressing andSection;andSection;885.900 through 885.930.VII. <T3>Project Management </T3>A. <T3>Responsibilities of Borrower (andSection;885.940). </T3>Proposed andSection;885.940described the Borrower's marketing, management and fiscal responsibilities.1. <T3>Marketing responsibilities. </T3>In response to commenters, HUD hasadded an additional requirement to the marketing responsibilities listedunder andSection;885.940(a). The commenters noted that surveys have demonstratedthat the number of homeless individuals with disabilities is larger thanpreviously reported. The commenters argued that it is important to identifythese individuals and provide them with permanent housing opportunities.Accordingly, the final rule requires the Borrower to provide a notice ofthe availability of housing to operators of temporary housing for the homelessin the same housing market. 2. <T3>Management responsibilities. </T3>The proposed rule provided that theBorrower is responsible for all management functions. A commenter suggestedthat where the Borrower wishes to self-manage, HUD should recommend a consultingarrangement for outside management expertise on a menu basis. The commenterbelieved that such arrangements would assist managers who lack experiencein business or accounting procedures. Subject to restrictions governing prohibited contractual relationships(see andSection;885.735) and HUD approval, the Borrower may contract witha private or public entity for performance of all or any part of its marketing,management and maintenance duties. While HUD will not recommend specificmanagement agents, nothing precludes the field office from providing alist of available management agents to Borrowers upon request. 3. <T3>User of project funds. </T3>Under andSection;885.940(e), the Borroweris required to maintain a project fund account in a HUD-approved depositoryand to deposit all rents, charges, income and revenues arising from projectoperation or ownership to this account. The proposed rule stated that projectfunds must be used for the operation of the project, to make required principaland interest payments on the section 202 loan and to make required depositsto the replacement reserve. The final rule clarifies that payments forrequired insurance coverage are for the operation of the project and maybe made from project funds. The proposed rule provided that any funds remaining in the project fundaccount following the expiration of a fiscal year shall be deposited inthe replacement reserve account under andSection;885.945. The final rulehas been revised to conform to the practices applied in the section 202/8program. Under the section 202/8 program, remaining funds are depositedin an interest-bearing residual receipts account. Withdrawals from thisaccount are made for project purposes and with the approval of HUD. B. <T3>Selection and admission of tenants (andSection;885.950). </T3>ProposedandSection;885.950 governed the selection and admission of tenants. 1. <T3>Exclusion of applicants. </T3>To be eligible for admission to a section202 project for handicapped families, an applicant-family must meet thedefinition of handicapped family, must meet project occupancy requirementsas approved by HUD, and must be a lower-income family. The preamble notedthat in addition to the admission requirements governing handicap and income,Borrowers would be permitted to develop and implement additional familyselection criteria. As an example, the preamble stated that a Borrowercould refuse to admit an otherwise eligible applicant, if the applicantis unable to live independently in the project without the support servicesthat he or she needs, but which are not available. Two commenters argued that this example is inconsistent with HUD's section504 regulation. The preamble to the section 202 rule reflected the proposedrule implementing section 504 which defined qualified handicapped person,in part, with regard to the person's capacity for independent living. Inthe final section 504 rule published June 2, 1988 (53 FR 20216), HUD droppedreferences to the ability to live independently from the definition ofqualified individual with handicaps. The definition was revised to focuson the capacity to comply with all obligations of occupancy either withoutsupportive services or with supportive services provided by persons otherthan the recipient. Thus, Borrowers must make a determination whether theapplicant can fulfill all obligations of occupancy. In a project that doesnot provide supportive services, it is irrelevant whether the obligationsof tenancy are met by the individual alone or with assistance that theindividual with handicaps arranges. Further, in making eligibility determinations,a presumption in favor of the individual's own assessment of his or hercapabilities is warranted in the absence of evidence to the contrary. A commenter suggested that HUD require Borrowers to notify local developmentaldisability councils when an individual with a developmental disabilityis excluded because of a lack of needed supportive services. While HUDagrees that such a requirement would assist the councils in identifyinggaps in services and support in local communities, the proposed requirementis one which is best implemented by the developmental disability councilson a local or State basis, rather than through a Federal requirement. 2. <T3>Income determination. </T3>A commenter stated that it is looking forwardto reviewing and commenting on a proposed rule implementing the new subsidymechanism. The commenter specifically hoped that the new subsidy mechanismwould eliminate burdensome documentation (<T3>e.g., </T3>monthly forms reporting minor changes in income experiencedby people who are irregularly employed or who work in sheltered or supportedemployment). The new subsidy mechanism is fully implemented by this finalrule and further comments are not being solicited. As to the commenter'sspecific questions regarding income determination, current procedures allowfor annualized income estimates for such situations, and establish standardsfor determining when interim adjustments to income calculations are required.The basic reporting forms for annual recertification that are used in othersubsidized housing programs will apply to this program. Under section 1619(b) of the Social Security Act, income that is providedas part of a plan for self-support may be excluded from a person's incomefor the purposes of determining SSI eligibility. Two commenters arguedthat HUD must exclude income covered under such an SSA plan when determiningeligibility and rent. Exclusion of such income is addressed in the rule.Under the final rule, the definition of annual income refers to Part 813calculations. Under andSection;813.106(c)(8)(ii), such income is excludedfrom the calculation.   3. Preferences. Two commenters made suggestions indicating that they believedthat section 206 of the Housing and Community Development Amendments of1979 (Pub. L. 96-153, section 206, 93 Stat. 1108 (1979)) as amended bysection 203 of the Housing and Urban-Rural Recovery Act of 1983 (Pub. L.98-181, section 203, 97 Stat. 1178 (1983) (preference requirements)) appliesto the section 202 handicapped program. (<T3>i.e., </T3>the commenters argued that HUD should specifically definesubstandard housing to include an individual living in inaccessible housingwhere he or she cannot use the bathroom or other facilities.)On January 15, 1988, HUD published FR-1597_Preference in the Provisionof Housing for Families Who Are Occupying Substandard Housing, InvoluntarilyDisplaced, or Paying More Than 50 Percent of Family Income for Rent (53FR 1122). This rule addressed preference requirements for most programs,including the section 8 new construction program. In a related final rulepublished May 4, 1988 (53 FR 15818), HUD added andSection; 885.7. Section885.7 stated that the preference provisions governing newly constructedsection 8 projects applied to projects assisted under Part 885.Because the section 202 program for handicapped families is not assistedunder any of the statutory authorities to which the preference requirementsare applicable, no preference provisions have been included under SubpartC. Because the preference requirements are applicable to projects receivingsection 8 assistance, preference provisions are included for section 202/8projects developed under Subpart B.C. <T3>Lease requirements (andSection; 885.965). </T3>Proposed andSection; 885.965addressed lease requirements. Paragraph (c) would permit the Borrower toenter the leased premises without advance notice if an emergency existsor the health or safety of a family member is endangered. Numerous commenterssuggested that the final rule require the Borrower to have objective evidenceupon which to base the decision to enter.The final rule has not been revised. The proposed rule required that theBorrower have reasonable cause to enter the premises. This reasonable causerequirement adequately balances the need to intercede on behalf of a personwho may be endangered against the family's privacy, and ensures that Borrowerswill have sufficient justification for the entry.One commenter noted that facilities for on-site managers or supervisorsare covered under the loan and should be subject to inspection along withthe apartments of tenants. The lease requirements of this section addressonly the relationship between the Borrower and the tenant. The regulatoryagreement between the Borrower and HUD will require the Borrower to maintainthe mortgaged premises in good and substantial repair and condition. HUDanticipates that Borrowers will include appropriate provisions in theiragreements with their managers and supervisors to assure that responsibilitieswith regard to the mortgaged premises are fulfilled.D. <T3>Adjustment of rents (andSection; 885.975). </T3>Adjustments of the contractrents are provided at andSection;andSection; 885.975. The proposed rule providedthat HUD would compute the contract rent adjustments based on the sum ofthe budgeted project operating costs and debt service, with adjustmentsfor vacancies, the project's non-rental income, and other factors. A commenteralso suggested that HUD should set a ceiling on operating costs after afive-year history of the project is established.HUD must ensure that contract rents reasonably reflect the total actualreasonable costs of developing and operating the project over the 20-yearterm of the project assistance contract. Accordingly, this proposal cannotbe incorporated into the final rule.<ITAG tagnum="84">Findings and Certifications</ITAG>A Finding of No Significant Impact with respect to the environment hasbeen made in accordance with HUD regulations at 24 CFR Part 50, which implementsection 102(2)(C) of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969. TheFinding of No Significant Impact is available for public inspection duringregular business hours in the Office of the Rules Docket Clerk, Officeof the General Counsel, Department of Housing and Urban Development, Room10276, 451 Seventh Street, SW., Washington, DC 20410-0500.This rule does not constitute a ``major rule'' as that term is definedin section 1(d) of the Executive Order on Federal Regulations issued bythe President on February 17, 1981. An analysis of the rule indicates thatit does not (1) have an annual effect on the economy of $100 million ormore; (2) cause a major increase in costs or prices for consumers, individualindustries, Federal, State, or local government agencies, or geographicregions; or (3) have a significant adverse effect on competition, employment,investment, productivity, innovation, or on the ability of United States-basedenterprises to compete with foreign-based enterprises in domestic or exportmarkets.In accordance with 5 U.S.C. 605(b) (the Regulatory Flexibility Act), theundersigned hereby certifies that this rule does not have a significanteconomic impact on a substantial number of small entities. This rule doesnot affect the amount of funds available under the section 202 program.Rather, the rule modifies and updates the program requirements to implementrecent statutory revisions designed to ensure that the program will meetthe special housing and related needs of nonelderly handicapped families.While the rule will modify the subsidy mechanism and the development proceduresfor the section 202 program, HUD does not believe that the economic impacton small entities will be substantial.The General Counsel, as the Designated Official under Executive Order No.12606_The Family, has determined that the rule will likely have a significant,beneficial impact on family formation, maintenance, or well-being. Theprogram is a benefit to families because it assists eligible handicappedfamilies to afford decent, safe and sanitary housing and services appropriatefor dealing with the specialized needs of the physically impaired, thedevelopmentally disabled, and the chronically mentally ill.The General Counsel, as the Designated Official under section 6(a) of ExecutiveOrder No. 12611_Federalism, has determined that the final rule does notinvolve the preemption of State law by Federal statute or regulation anddoes not have federalism implications. The rule provides for State andlocal participation in the selection of projects and provides for the impositionof State and local standards governing the development and operation ofhandicapped housing. While the rule encourages State and local governmentsto provide funds for the provision of supportive services for the handicappedin connection with section 202 housing, the rule to the maximum extentpossible defers to State and local policies with regard to service fundingdecisions.This rule was listed as item 962 in the Department's Semiannual Agendaof Regulations published on April 24, 1989 (54 FR 16708, 16730) under ExecutiveOrder 12291 and the Regulatory Flexibility Act.The Catalog of Federal Domestic Assistance program numbers is 14.157, Housingfor the Elderly or Handicapped.The collection of information requirements contained in this rule havebeen submitted to the Office of Management and Budget for review undersection 3504(h) of the Paperwork Reduction Act of 1980. The sections identifiedin the matrix below have been determined by the Department to contain collectionof information requirements. Information on these requirements is providedas follows:<ITAG tagnum="110"><C/>  <H1>Description of information collection </H1><H1>Section of CFR affected </H1><H1>Number of respondents </H1><H1>Number of responses per respondent </H1><H1>Total annual responses </H1><H1>Hours per response </H1><H1>Total hours </H1> <ITAG tagnum="1">Application submission, initial loan closing (2502-0267) <D>885.710, 885.815 </D><D>450 </D><D>1 </D><D>450 </D><D>27 </D><D>12,150.0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Request for projects exceeding size limits (2502-0267) <D>885.720 </D><D>10 </D><D>1 </D><D>10 </D><D>2 </D><D>20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Affirmative fair housing marketing (2502-0267) <D>885.740(a)(6) </D><D>450 </D><D>1 </D><D>450 </D><D>(\1\) </D><D>(\1\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Fair housing advertising and poster (2502-0267) <D>885.740(a)(7) </D><D>450 </D><D>1 </D><D>450 </D><D>(\1\) </D><D>(\1\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Davis-Bacon labor standards (2502-0267) <D>885.740(d) </D><D>450 </D><D>1 </D><D>450 </D><D>(\1\) </D><D>(\1\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Relocation assistance (2502-0267) <D>885.740(e) </D><D>450 </D><D>1 </D><D>450 </D><D>(\1\) </D><D>(\1\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Inspection for lead-based paint hazards <D>885.740(f) </D><D>10 </D><D>1 </D><D>10 </D><D>2 </D><D>20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Borrower's appeal of loan cancellation (2502-0267) <D>885.770(b)(2) </D><D>10 </D><D>1 </D><D>10 </D><D>(\1\) </D><D>(\1\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Request to substitute Subpart B assistance payments for Subpart C assistancepayments <D>885.775 </D><D>10 </D><D>1 </D><D>10 </D><D>1 </D><D>10 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Site information (2502-0267) <D>885.780 </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>200 </D><D>(\1\) </D><D>(\1\) </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Request for direct loan processing (2502-0267) <D>885.800 </D><D>150 </D><P>50 </P><D>1 </D><P>1 </P><D>150 </D><P>50 </P><D>11.2 </D><P>8.2 </P><D>1680 </D><P>410 </P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Request for loan disbursement (2502-0187) <D>885.820 </D><D>200 </D><D>12 </D><D>2,400 </D><D>.5 </D><D>1,200 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cost certification (2502-0044) <D>885.825 </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>200 </D><D>56 </D><D>11,200 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Project Assistance Contract <D>885.900 </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>200 </D><D>5 </D><D>1,000 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Leasing to eligible families (2502-0371) <D>885.915 </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>200 </D><D>.1 </D><D>20 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Notice upon PAC expiration <D>885.930 </D><D>0 </D><D>(\2\) </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D><D>0 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">FHEO marketing plan and requirements (2502-0371) <D>885.940(a)(2) </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>200 </D><D>.75 </D><D>150 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">List of leased and unleased units and justification (2502-0371) <D>885.940(a)(3) </D><D>200 </D><D>12 </D><D>2,400 </D><D>.25 </D><D>600 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">HUD approval of contract for services (2502-0037) <D>885.940(c)(1) </D><D>50 </D><D>1 </D><D>50 </D><D>1 </D><D>50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Promotion of minority and women's business enterprises (2502-0371)<D>885.940(c)(2) </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>200 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Audited financial statements (2502-0371) <D>885.940(d) </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>200 </D><D>2 </D><D>400 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Maintenance of records of racial, ethnic, gender and place of previousresidency (2502-0371) <D>885.940(f) </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>200 </D><D>.75 </D><D>50 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Administration of reserve (2502-0371) <D>885.945(d) </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>200 </D><D>.5 </D><D>100 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Application for admission (2502-0371) <D>885.950(e) </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>3,600 </D><D>.25 </D><D>900 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Waiting list (2502-0371) <D>885.950(b)(2) </D><D>200 </D><D>12 </D><D>2,400 </D><D>.25 </D><D>600 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Notification of rejection due to ineligibility and review (2502-0371)<D>885.950(b)(3) </D><D>50 </D><D>1 </D><D>50 </D><D>.25 </D><D>12.5 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Reexamination of family income (2502-0371) <D>885.950(c) </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>3,600 </D><D>.25 </D><D>900 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Obligation of family (2502-0371) <D>885.955 </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>3,600 </D><D>.1 </D><D>360 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Lease (2502-0371) <D>885.965 </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>3,600 </D><D>.1 </D><D>360 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Security deposits (2502-0371) <D>885.972 </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>3,600 </D><D>.1 </D><D>360 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Justification for rent adjustment (2502-0371) <D>885.975 </D><D>20 </D><D>1 </D><D>20 </D><D>2 </D><D>40 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Analysis of utility cost increase (2502-0371) <D>885.980 </D><D>200 </D><D>1 </D><D>200 </D><D>2</D><D>400 </D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Conditions for release of vacancy payments (2502-0371) <D>885.985 </D><D>10 </D><D>1 </D><D>10 </D><D>.5 </D><D>5</D><R>n,n,sandCx.3;</R></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="3">Total annual burden </ITAG><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D> </D><D>33,187.5 </D><F>The annual reporting burden itemized for OMB clearance numbers (2502-0267),(2502-0187), (2502-0044), and (2502-0371) on this table was included inthe calculation of annual burden at the most recent approval of each, andtherefore does not represent an increase in the HUD information collectioninventory. The burden hours for the items marked (\1\) are included underapplication submission requirements. The burden hours for the item marked(\2\) will not be incurred until the end of the 20 year PAC contract.</F></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects</ITAG>24 CFR Part 812Low and moderate income housing.24 CFR Part 813Low and moderate income housing.24 CFR Part 885Aged, Grant programs, housing and community development, Handicapped, Loanprograms: housing and community development, Low- and moderate-income housing.24 CFR Part 912Low and moderate income housing.24 CFR Part 913Public housing.For the reasons set forth in the preamble, Title 24 of the Code of FederalRegulations is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 812_DEFINITION OF FAMILY AND OTHER RELATED TERMS; OCCUPANCY BYSINGLE PERSONS</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 812_Definition of Family and Other RelatedTerms; Occupancy by Single Persons, continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 3, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C.1437a); sec. 7(d); Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>2. The definition of disabled person in andSection;812.2 is revised to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;812.2</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Disabled person.</T3> A person who is under a disability as definedin section 223 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 423), or who has adevelopmental disability as defined in section 102(7) of the DevelopmentalDisabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act (42 U.S.C. 6001(7)).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 813_DEFINITION OF INCOME, INCOME LIMITS, RENT AND REEXAMINATIONOF FAMILY INCOME FOR SECTION 8 HOUSING ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS PROGRAMS ANDRELATED PROGRAMS</ITAG>3. The authority citation for Part 813_Definition of Income, Income Limits,Rent and Reexamination of Family Income for the Section 8 Housing AssistancePayments Programs and Related Programs, is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 3, 5(b), 8, 16, United States Housing Act of1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437a, 1437c, 1437f, 1437n); sec. 7(d), Department of Housingand Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>4. Section 813.101 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 813.101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and applicability.</ITAG>This part establishes definitions, policies and procedures related to incomelimits and the determination of eligibility, income and rent for applicantsand tenants in housing assisted under section 8 of the United States HousingAct of 1937 (``the 1937 Act''). However, andSection;813.107 and the definitionsof Tenant Rent, Total Tenant Payment, Utility Allowance and Utility Reimbursementfound in andSection;813.102 do not apply to families assisted under the HousingVoucher Program (24 CFR Part 887). The definitions, policies and proceduresalso apply to projects that are assisted with loans under section 202 ofthe Housing Act of 1959 and that receive housing assistance payments undersection 8 of the 1937 Act (see 24 CFR Part 885, Subpart B) or project assistancepayments under section 202(h) of the Housing Act of 1959 (see 24 CFR Part885, Subpart C). (See 24 CFR Part 913 for the analogous rule applicableto the Public Housing and Indian Housing Programs.)5. In andSection;813.102, the definitions of disabled person, owner and utilityallowance are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;813.102</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Disabled person.</T3> A person who is under a disability as definedin section 223 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 423), or who has adevelopmental disability as defined in section 102(7) of the DevelopmentalDisabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act (42 U.S.C. 6001(7)).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Owner.</T3> The meaning ascribed to such term in the pertinent programregulations. As used in this part, where appropriate, Owner shall alsoinclude a Borrower, as defined in 24 CFR Part 885.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Utility Allowance.</T3> If the cost of utilities (except telephone)and other housing services for an assisted unit is not included in theContract Rent but is the responsibility of the Family occupying the unit,an amount equal to the estimate made or approved by a PHA or HUD underapplicable sections of these regulations (see 24 CFR Parts 880, 881, 882,883, 884, 885, and 886) of the monthly costs of a reasonable consumptionof such utilities and other services for the unit by an energy-conservativehousehold of modest circumstances consistent with the requirements of asafe, sanitary, and healthful living environment. (In the case of sharedhousing, the amount of the Utility Allowance for an assisted Family iscalculated by multiplying the Utility Allowance for the entire unit bythe ratio derived by dividing the number of bedrooms in the Assisted Family'sprivate space by the number of bedrooms in the entire unit. In the caseof an assisted individual sharing a one-bedroom unit with another person,the amount of the Utility Allowance for the assisted individual is one-halfof the Utility Allowance for the entire unit).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>6. Section 813.109(a) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;813.109</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Initial determination, verification, and reexamination of Family incomeand composition.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Responsibility for initial determination and reexamination.</T3> TheOwner or PHA shall be responsible for determination of eligibility foradmission, for determination of Annual Income, Adjusted Income and TotalTenant Payment, and for reexamination of Family income and compositionat least annually, as provided in pertinent program regulations and handbooks(see, <T3>e.g.</T3>, Part 880, Subpart F and Part 881, Subpart F, which, forthe purposes of this Part shall apply, as appropriate, to projects developedunder Part 885, Subpart B; Part 882, Subparts B and E; Part 883, SubpartG; Part 884, Subpart B; Part 885, Subpart C; Part 886, Subparts A and C;and Part 887, Subpart H). As used in this part, the ``effective date''of an examination or reexamination refers to (1) in the case of an examinationfor admission, the effective date of initial occupancy, and (2) in thecase of a reexamination of an existing tenant, the effective date of theredetermined Total Tenant Payment.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 885_LOANS FOR HOUSING FOR THE ELDERLY OR HANDICAPPED</ITAG>7. The authority citation for 24 CFR Part 885 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Sec. 202, Housing Act of 1959 (12 U.S.C. 1701q); sec.8, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437f); sec. 7(d), Departmentof Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>8. Section 885.1 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.1</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose and policy.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Purpose.</T3> The program under this part provides direct Federal loansunder section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 (42 U.S.C. 1701q) for housingprojects serving elderly or handicapped families and individuals. The housingprojects shall provide the necessary services for the occupants which mayinclude, but are not limited to: Health, continuing education, welfare,informational, recreational, homemaking, meal and nutritional services,counseling, and referral services, as well as transportation where necessaryto facilitate access to these services.(b) <T3>General policy.</T3> A loan made under this part shall be used to financethe construction or the substantial rehabilitation of projects for elderlyor handicapped families, or for the acquisition with or without moderaterehabilitation of existing housing and related facilities for group homesfor nonelderly handicapped individuals.(c) <T3>Applicability.</T3> (1) Subpart B of this part applies to projectsfor elderly or handicapped families that receive loans under section 202of the Housing Act of 1959 and housing assistance payments under section8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937. No project for handicapped(primarily nonelderly) families is eligible for loans or housing assistancepayments under Part B, except under a reservation of loan and contractauthority made before October 1, 1988.(2) Subpart C of this part applies to projects for nonelderly handicappedfamilies receiving loans under section 202 and project assistance paymentsunder section 202(h) of the Housing Act of 1959. Subpart C may also applyto projects for handicapped families that received a reservation of loanauthority under Subpart B under the circumstances described in andSection;885.775.9. In andSection;885.5, the definition of ``Elderly or Handicapped Family''is removed; the definitions of ``Acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation'',``Application'', ``Handicapped person'' and ``Housing and Related Facilities''are revised; and definitions for ``Elderly Family'', ``Field Office'',``Handicapped Family'', ``Independent Public Accountant'' and ``NonelderlyHandicapped Families'' are added, in alphabetical order, to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.5</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><T3>Acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation</T3> means theacquisition of existing housing and related facilities to be used as grouphomes for the nonelderly handicapped. The development cost of such grouphomes may not include moderate rehabilitation costs (including expendituresfor the rehabilitation alteration, conversion, or improvement of the housingand related facilities) in excess of 15 percent of the loan amount.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Application</T3> means the application for a section 202 fund reservation,including all required forms and exhibits submitted in response to an invitationfor such applications, or a request for admission to a project made bya family on a form prescribed by HUD.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Elderly family</T3> means:(a) Families of two or more persons the head of which (or his or her spouse)is 62 years of age or older; (b) The surviving member or members of any family described in paragraph(a) of this definition living in a unit assisted under this part with thedeceased member of the family at the time of his or her death;(c) A single person who is 62 years of age or older; or(d) Two or more elderly persons living together, or one or more such personsliving with another person who is determined by HUD, based upon a licensedphysician's certificate provided by the family, to be essential to theircare or well being.<T3>Field office</T3> means any HUD Area, Insuring or Regional Office whichis delegated authority to process applications under the section 202 program.<T3>Handicapped family</T3> means:(a) Families of two or more persons the head of which (or his or her spouse)is handicapped;(b) The surviving member or members of any family described in paragraph(a) of this definition living in a unit assisted under this part with thedeceased member of the family at the time of his or her death;(c) A single handicapped person over the age of 18; or(d) Two or more handicapped persons living together, or one or more suchpersons living with another person who is determined by HUD, based upona licensed physician's certificate provided by the family, to be essentialto their care or well being.<T3>Handicapped person or individual</T3> means any adult having an impairmentwhich is expected to be of long-continued and indefinite duration, is asubstantial impediment to his or her ability to live independently, andis of a nature that such ability could be improved by more suitable housingconditions. A person shall also be considered handicapped if he or sheis developmentally disabled, <T3>i.e.,</T3> if he or she has a severe chronic disability that (a) isattributable to a mental or physical impairment or combination of mentaland physical impairments; (b) is manifested before the person attains agetwenty-two; (c) is likely to continue indefinitely; (d) results in substantialfunctional limitations in three or more of the following areas of majorlife activity: (1) Self-care, (2) receptive and responsive language, (3)learning, (4) mobility, (5) self-direction, (6) capacity for independentliving, and (7) economic self-sufficiency; and (e) reflects the person'sneed for a combination and sequence of special, interdisciplinary, or genericcare, treatment, or other services which are of lifelong or extended durationand are individually planned and coordinated. A person shall also be consideredto be handicapped if he or she has a chronic mental illness, <T3>i.e.,</T3> if he or she has a severe and persistent mental or emotionalimpairment that seriously limits his or her ability to live independently(<T3>e.g.,</T3> by limiting functional capacities relative to primary aspectsof daily living such as personal relations, living arrangements, work,recreation, etc.), and whose impairment could be improved by more suitablehousing conditions. A person whose sole impairment is alcoholism or drugaddition will not be considered to be handicapped for the purposes of thesection 202 program.<T3>Housing and related facilities</T3> means rental or cooperative housingstructures constructed or substantially rehabilitated as permanent residencesfor use by elderly or handicapped families, or acquired with or withoutmoderate rehabilitation for use by nonelderly handicapped families as grouphomes. The term includes structures suitable for use by families residingin the project or in the area, such as cafeterias or dining halls, communityrooms, or buildings, or other essential service facilities. In the caseof acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation, at least threeyears must have elapsed from the later of the date of completion of theproject or the beginning of occupancy to the date of the application fora section 202 fund reservation. Except for intermediate care facilitiesfor the mentally retarded and individuals with related conditions (seeandSection;885.710(b)(4)(vii)), this term does not include nursing homes,hospitals, intermediate care facilities, or transitional care facilities.<T3>Independent public accountant</T3> means a certified public accountantor a licensed or registered public accountant, having no business relationshipwith the Borrower or Sponsor except for the performance of audit, systemswork and tax preparation. If not certified, the independent public accountantmust have been licensed or registered by a regulatory authority of a Stateor other political subdivision of the United States on or before December31, 1970. In States that do not regulate the use of the title ``publicaccountant'', only certified public accountants may be used.<T3>Nonelderly handicapped family</T3> means a handicapped family wherethe head of the family (and spouse, if any) is less than 62 years of ageat the time of the family's initial occupancy of a project.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.7 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Removed]</ITAG>10. Section 885.7 is removed.11. The heading of Subpart B is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart B_Section 202 Projects for the Elderly or Handicapped_Section8 Assistance </ITAG>12. In andSection;885.200, the introductory text in paragraph (b), and paragraph(c), are revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.200 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Allocation of loan fund authority.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) Field Office Directors will determine the amount of section 202 loanauthority available under this subpart to be allocated to each allocationarea in accordance with 24 CFR 791.404. In determining the number of unitsto be allocated to a specific allocation area, the Field Office Directormust consider the three-year goals set forth in Housing Assistance Plansand the proportionality requirements with respect to housing type and householdtype. Where loan fund authority allocated to an allocation area would notbe adequate for a feasible project, the Field Office Director may either:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(c) Field Office Directors will set aside sufficient contract authorityfor the Section 8 Housing Assistance Payments Program for use in connectionwith projects to be financed under this subpart.13. In andSection; 885.205, paragraph (b) is revised; paragraph (c)(3) isremoved; and paragraphs (c)(4), (5) and (6) are redesignated as (c)(3),(4) and (5). Revised paragraph (b) reads as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.205</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Announcement of fund availability and invitations for applicationsfor section 202 fund reservations. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) Each field office shall publish a single invitation in newspapers ofgeneral circulation serving the allocation areas in which the housing isdesired at least once a week for two consecutive weeks. The field officeshall also notify minority media, minority organizations involved in housingand community development, and groups with a special interest in housingfor the elderly and physically handicapped. Copies of the invitation shallbe available in the field office. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>14. In andSection;885.210, paragraph (b)(22) is removed; paragraphs (b)(23)and (24) are redesignated as paragraphs (b)(22) and (b)(23) respectively;the reference to andSection; 885.205(c)(6) in undesignated paragraph afterparagraph (b)(13) is revised to refer to andSection; 885.205(c)(5); and paragraphs(b)(5), (b)(6), (b)(13)(i), (b)(19), the introductory text to the redesignatedparagraph (b)(22), and redesignated paragraph (b)(22)(iv) and (vii) arerevised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.210</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Contents of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(b) * * * (5) A narrative description of the anticipated occupancy (elderly and physicallyhandicapped). (6) A statement whether the Borrower (or Sponsor) has submitted or is planningto submit other applications under this part during the current fiscalyear. The Borrower must indicate the city and State where any other proposedproject will be located, the number of units requested, and the field officewhere the proposal was or will be submitted. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(13) * * * (i) Have the necessary legal authority to finance, construct or substantiallyrehabilitate and maintain the project and to apply for and receive theproposed loan. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(19) A description of the Borrower's capability to sponsor, develop, own,manage and provide appropriate services in connection with the proposedproject. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(22) The following specific information with respect to the proposed project:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(iv) Evidence that the proposed construction or substantial rehabilitationis permissible under applicable zoning ordinances or regulations, or astatement of the proposed action to make the construction or substantialrehabilitation permissible and the basis for belief that the proposed actionwill be completed successfully before the receipt of the conditional commitmentfor direct loan financing (<T3>e.g., </T3>a summary of the results of any recent requests for rezoningon land in similar zoning classifications and the time required for suchrezoning, preliminary indications of acceptability from zoning bodies,etc.). <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(vii) A statement that gross rents (contract rents plus any utility allowance)will not exceed the applicable fair market rents by more than the amountallowed under andSection;880.204(b)(1) or andSection;881.204(b)(1). The applicablefair market rents are those published in accordance with andSection;888.105.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>15. The introductory paragraph to andSection;885.215 is revised to read asfollows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.215</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Limitation on number of units. </ITAG>No organization shall participate as Sponsor, Cosponsor, or Borrower inthe filing of an application or applications for a reservation of section202 funds under this Subpart in a single region in a single fiscal yearin excess of that necessary to finance the construction or substantialrehabilitation of 300 units of housing and related facilities. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>16. In andSection;885.220, paragraph (f) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.220</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review of application for fund reservation. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>(f) The ranking list developed under paragraph (e) of this section maybe modified by the Field Office Director if selection solely on the basisof the ranking would result in a violation of site and neighborhood standards.17. In andSection;885.225, paragraph (a)(1) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.225</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of applications. </ITAG>(a) * * * (1) The amount of the Section 202 Fund Reservation, the number and mixof units, and the location of the proposed project. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG>18. Section 885.230 is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.230</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duration of section 202 fund reservations. </ITAG>The Field Office Manager, subject to the approval of the Assistant Secretary,may cancel a fund reservation at any time if it can be established thatthe Borrower is not making satisfactory progress toward the start of constructionor substantial rehabilitation and shall cancel any reservations of Section202 loan funds for projects for which the construction or substantial rehabilitationis not begun within 18 months after the notice of section 202 fund reservationis issued, unless an extension of time, not to exceed six months is requestedof and granted by the Field Office Manager. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 885.400-885.425</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Added to Subpart B; Subpart D heading removed]</ITAG>19. Sections 885.400, 885.405, 885.410, 885.412, 885.415, 885.416, 885.420,and 885.425 retain their current section designations and are moved fromSubpart D and are added to Subpart B; the heading of Subpart D is removed.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;andSection; 885.410</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended] </ITAG>20. In andSection; 885.410, paragraphs (b) (4) and (5) and paragraphs (c)(4) and (5) are removed.21. In andSection; 885.415, paragraphs (m), (n), and (p) are revised to readas follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.415</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements prior to initial loan closing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(m) Construction or Substantial Rehabilitation Contract between the Borrowerand General Contractor. See andSection; 885.416 for contract award requirements.(n) Assurance of Completion of Construction or Substantial RehabilitationContract in the form of corporate surety bond for payment and performance,each in the amount of 100 percent of the amount of the HUD-estimated constructionor substantial rehabilitation cost, or a cash escrow in the amount of 25percent of the HUD-estimated construction or substantial rehabilitationcost. All surety companies issuing bonds must be satisfactory to the AssistantSecretary.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(p) Contractor's and Subcontractor's Certifications Concerning Labor Standardsand Prevailing Wage Requirements.22. The heading of Section 885.425 is revised and paragraph (a) of thesection is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.425</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Completion of construction and substantial rehabilitation, executionof HAP contract, and cost certification and approvals by HUD.</ITAG>(a) The Borrower must satisfy the requirements for completion of constructionand substantial rehabilitation and approvals by HUD before submission ofa final requisition for disbursement of loan proceeds.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>23. A new andSection; 885.427 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.427</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Federal preferences.</ITAG>The provisions of andSection; 880.613 of this chapter are applicable to projectsassisted under this Subpart B.24. Subpart C is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="76">Subpart C_Section 202 Projects for Nonelderly Handicapped Familiesand Individuals_Section 162 Assistance</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.700 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Application Procedures and Program Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.702 Allocation of authority.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.705 Announcement of fund availability and invitation for applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.710 Application contents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.717 Project standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.720 Project size limitations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.725 Cost containment and modest design standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.727 Prohibited facilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.730 Site and neighborhood standards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.735 Prohibited relationships.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.740 Other Federal requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Selection of Applications and Duration of Fund Reservation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.750 Review of applications for fund reservation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.755 Approval of applications.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.770 Duration of section 202 fund reservation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.775 Transition.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Direct Loan Financing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.780 Submission of site information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.800 Request for direct loan processing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.805 Approval of requests for direct loan financing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.807 Operating cost standard.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.810 Amount and terms of financing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.812 Prepayment of loans.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.815 Requirements prior to initial loan closing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.816 Requirements for awarding construction contracts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.820 Loan disbursement procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.825 Completion of cost certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Project Assistance Contract</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.900 Project Assistance Contract.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.905 Term of PAC.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.910 Maximum annual commitment and project account.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.915 Leasing to eligible families.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.920 PAC administration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.925 Default by Borrower.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.930 Notice upon PAC expiration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Project Management</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.940 Responsibilities of Borrower.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.945 Replacement reserve.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.950 Selection and admission of tenants.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.955 Obligations of the family.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.960 Overcrowded and underoccupied units.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.965 Lease requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.970 Termination of tenancy and modification of lease.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.972 Security deposits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.975 Adjustment of rents.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.980 Adjustment of utility allowances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">885.985 Conditions for receipt of vacancy payments for assisted units.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Subpart C_Section 202 Projects for Nonelderly Handicapped Familiesand Individuals_Section 162 Assistance</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Definitions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.700 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>As used in this Subpart C:<T3>Agreement to enter into project assistance contract (PAC) </T3>meansthe agreement between the Borrower and HUD which provides that, upon satisfactorycompletion of the project, HUD will enter into the PAC with the Borrower.<T3>Annual income </T3>is defined in Part 813 of this chapter. In the caseof an individual residing in an intermediate care facility for the mentallyretarded that is assisted under Title XIX of the Social Security Act andthis part, the annual income of the individual shall exclude protectedpersonal income as provided under that Act. For the purposes of determiningthe total tenant payment, the income of such individuals shall be imputedto be the amount that the family would receive if assisted under TitleXVI of the Social Security Act.<T3>Assisted unit </T3>means a dwelling unit that is eligible for assistanceunder a PAC.<T3>Contract rent </T3>means the total amount of rent specified in thePAC as payable by HUD and the family to the Borrower for an assisted unitor residential space.<T3>Family (eligible family) </T3>means a handicapped family (as definedin andSection;885.5) that meets the project occupancy requirements approvedby HUD and, if the family occupies an assisted unit, meets the lower-incomerequirements described in andSection;813.102 of this chapter, as modifiedby the definition of annual income in this section.<T3>Gross rent </T3>is defined in Part 813 of this chapter.<T3>Group home </T3>means a single family residential structure designedor adapted for occupancy by nonelderly handicapped individuals.<T3>Housing for handicapped families </T3>means housing and related facilitiesoccupied by handicapped families that are primarily nonelderly handicappedfamilies.<T3>Independent living complex </T3>means a project designed for occupancyby nonelderly handicapped families in separate dwelling units where eachdwelling unit includes a kitchen and a bath.<T3>Operating costs </T3>means expenses related to the provision of housingand excludes expenses related to administering, or managing the provisionof, supportive services. Operating costs include:(a) Administrative expenses, including salary and management expenses relatedto the provision of shelter.(b) Maintenance expenses, including routine and minor repairs and groundskeeping.(c) Security expenses.(d) Utilities expenses, including gas, oil, electricity, water, sewer,trash removal, and extermination services. Operating costs exclude telephoneservices for families.(e) Taxes and insurance.(f) Allowances for reserves.<T3>Project account </T3>means a specifically identified and segregatedaccount for each project which is established in accordance with andSection;885.910(b)out of the amounts by which the maximum annual commitment exceeds the amountactually paid out under the PAC each year.<T3>PAC </T3>(project assistance contract) means the contract entered intoby the Borrower and HUD setting forth the rights and duties of the partieswith respect to the project and the payments under the PAC.<T3>Project assistance payment </T3>means the payment made by HUD to theBorrower for assisted units as provided in the PAC. The payment is thedifference between the contract rent and the tenant rent. An additionalpayment is made to a family occupying an assisted unit in an independentliving complex when the utility allowance is greater than the total tenantpayment. A project assistance payment, known as a ``vacancy payment'',may be made to the Borrower when an assisted unit (or residential spacein a group home) is vacant, in accordance with the terms of the PAC.<T3>Rent, </T3>in the case of a unit in a cooperative project, means thecarrying charges payable to the cooperative with respect to occupancy ofthe unit.<T3>Tenant rent </T3>means the monthly amount defined in, and determinedin accordance with Part 813 of this chapter.<T3>Total tenant payment</T3> means the monthly amount defined in, anddetermined in accordance with Part 813 of this chapter.<T3>Utility allowance </T3>is defined in Part 813 of this chapter and isdetermined or approved by HUD.<T3>Utility reimbursement </T3>is defined in Part 813 of this chapter.<T3>Vacancy payment </T3>means the project assistance payment made to theBorrower by HUD for a vacant assisted unit (or residential space in a grouphome) if certain conditions are fulfilled, as provided in the PAC. Theamount of the vacancy payment varies with the length of the vacancy periodand is less after the first 60 days of any vacancy.<ITAG tagnum="84">Application Procedures and Program Requirements</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.702 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Allocation of authority.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Headquarters Reserve. </T3>Up to 15 percent of the section 202 loanauthority made available for the development costs of housing for handicappedfamilies under this section may be retained by the Assistant Secretaryfor subsequent allocation to specific areas and communities under section213(d)(4) of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974.(b) <T3>Allocations. </T3>The Assistant Secretary will allocate the amountsavailable for development costs of housing for handicapped families, lessany amounts made available for the Headquarters Reserve under paragraph(a) of this section and amendments under andSection;885.755(e), to allocationareas. The size of the allocation area will depend on the amount of loanauthority available for allocation and the number of feasible projectsthe loan authority will support. The amount of the allocations will bebased on the relative needs of the allocation areas as reflected in availablecensus data on the number of the handicapped individuals in the areas andwill be adjusted to take into consideration the relative differences betweenthe areas in the costs of providing housing. Funds allocated to an allocationarea may be reallocated to another area under the circumstances describedat andSection;885.750(d)(2).(c) <T3>Availability of loan authority for housing for the elderly. </T3>Ifthe approvable applications under this Subpart require less than the loanauthority that is made available for development costs of housing underthis Subpart, the remaining loan authority shall be made available forhousing for the elderly under Subpart B of this part, to the extent thathousing assistance under section 8 of the United States Housing Act of1937 is available in connection with such loan authority.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.705 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Announcement of fund availability and invitation for applications.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Announcement of fund availability. </T3>Following an allocation ofauthority under andSection;885.700 above, HUD will publish an announcementof fund availability in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The announcement will indicate:(1) The amount of loan authority (and approximate number of units) madeavailable for housing for handicapped families within each allocation area;(2) The deadline for receipt of applications; and(3) Other appropriate guidance to prospective Sponsors.(b) <T3>Invitation for applications. </T3>Each field office shall publish aninvitation for applications for section 202 fund reservation in newspapersof general circulation serving the field office jurisdiction. The fieldoffice shall also notify minority media, minority organizations involvedin housing and community development, and groups with special interestin housing for handicapped families. Copies of the invitation will be availablein the field office.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.710 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Application contents.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Application. </T3>Each application must include all of the information,materials, forms, and exhibits listed in paragraph (b) of this section.In addition, the application may include site information specified underandSection;885.780. HUD will review applications and make selections underandSection;885.750 based on information provided in the application.(b) <T3>Application contents. </T3>Each application must include:(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the Sponsor.(2) The name, title, address, and telephone number of the officer or memberof the board of directors of the Sponsor to whom communications shouldbe addressed.(3) The dollar amount of the section 202 direct loan requested.(4) A narrative description of the proposed housing, consistent with requirementsof andSection;andSection;885.717 through 885.727, including:(i) The name of the locality in which the proposed project is to be developed;(ii) The development method proposed to be used (new construction, substantialrehabilitation, or, if a group home, acquisition with or without moderaterehabilitation). If the project will be developed using innovative constructionor rehabilitation methods or technologies that promote construction efficiencies,the proposed methods or technologies should be identified;(iii) Number and types of structures;(iv) Number of stories;(v) Number of units by size (number of bedrooms) for an independent livingcomplex, or the number of bedrooms and the number of residents housed ineach group home;(vi) Special amenities or features. If the narrative description indicatesthat the housing would not comply with the cost containment and modestdesign standards of andSection;885.725 (a) through (c), the Sponsor mustsubmit evidence demonstrating that the proposed housing is eligible foran exception from these standards under andSection;885.725(d).(vii) For intermediate care facilities that are funded by the Health CareFinancing Administration that serve the mentally retarded and individualswith related conditions, evidence demonstrating that the proposed projectwill primarily provide housing rather than medical facilities, is or willbe licensed by appropriate State agencies, and will receive funding fromsources other than HUD for a rent contribution and for the costs of theintermediate care, and such other information as HUD may require to determinethe feasibility of the intermediate care facility.(5) A narrative description of the anticipated occupancy. The Sponsor mustpropose project occupancy requirements that limit occupancy to one or moreof the following categories: Persons with chronic mental illness, developmentaldisabilities, or physical handicaps. The Sponsor must demonstrate a capacityto serve the proposed occupancy group or groups.(6) A service plan description that includes:(i) A description of the range of supportive services proposed to be providedto the families in the occupancy category identified by the Sponsor underandSection;885.710(b)(5) above, including:(A) The name(s) of the agency(s) will be responsible for providing supportiveservices and, if an agency is not the Sponsor, a letter of intent fromthe agency indicating its willingness and ability to provide the services;(B) The manner in which such services will be provided;(C) The services that will be provided on- and off-site; and(D) The staffing plan including residential supervision (if any) and otherstaff necessary to provide the proposed supportive services.(ii) Evidence of funding sources for the supportive services that willbe provided for compensation, including State and local funds availableto assist in the provision of such services, or evidence of commitmentto provide the supportive services from agencies that will not be compensated.If State and local funds will be used, the application must demonstratethat the proposal does not conflict with State or local plans and policiesgoverning the development and operation of facilities to serve handicappedindividuals meeting the proposed project occupancy requirements.(7) Evidence demonstrating that there is an effective demand for the proposedhousing in the areas to be served by the project and demonstrating thatthis demand is likely to continue through the term of the loan.(8) A statement whether the Sponsor or any affiliated entity has submittedor is planning to submit other applications as a Sponsor or Cosponsor underthis part during the current fiscal year. The Sponsor must also indicatethe city and State where any other proposed project will be located, thenumber of units requested, and the field office where the proposal wasor will be submitted.(9) A request for preliminary determination of eligibility as a nonprofitSponsor, on a form prescribed by HUD.(10) A statement describing the Sponsor's ties to the community includingany statements of support for the project by members of the community inwhich the project is to be located and State and local organizations familiarwith the needs of handicapped individuals meeting the proposed occupancyrequirements.(11) The names and addresses of the officers and directors of the Sponsor,and such other information as required by HUD, together with a resolution,on a form prescribed by HUD, adopted by the Sponsor's board of directors,agreeing that all officers and directors of the Sponsor and the Borrowerwill be required to submit conflict of interest certifications.(12) Satisfactory evidence that the Sponsor: (i) Has the necessary legalauthority to sponsor the project and to assist the Borrower to finance,acquire (with or without moderate rehabilitation), construct or substantiallyrehabilitate and maintain the project, and to apply for and receive theproposed loan; (ii) has an effective tax exemption ruling from the InternalRevenue Service, is a nonprofit corporation organized in the Commonwealthof Puerto Rico that is exempt from income taxation under Puerto Rican law,or is a nonprofit consumer cooperative that is exempt from income taxationunder State law, has never been liable for the payment of Federal incometaxes, and does not pay patronage dividends; and (iii) will form a Borrower(as defined in andSection; 885.5) after the issuance of the section 202 fundreservation, will cause the Borrower to file a request for determinationof eligibility and a request for direct loan financing under andSection;885.800, and will provide sufficient resources to the Borrower to ensurethe development and long-term operation of the project.(13) Evidence of previous participation in HUD programs, if any, by theSponsor, its officers or directors, on such form as may be prescribed byHUD, and identification of all section 202 fund reservations issued tothe Sponsor or any entity affiliated with the Sponsor since May 1, 1976.(14) A description of any other rental housing projects or any medicalfacilities sponsored, owned or operated by the Sponsor.(15) A description of the Sponsor's past or current involvement in anyprograms other than housing (including its provision of services) thatdemonstrates the Sponsor's management capabilities and experience, includinga description of the Sponsor's experience in contracting for services withminority business enterprises or minority groups.(16) A description of any financial default, modification of terms andconditions of financing, or legal action taken or pending against the Sponsoror its officers, directors, or trustees in their corporate capacity.(17) A description of the Sponsor's ability and willingness to sponsorand to assist the Borrower to develop, own, manage, and provide appropriateservices in connection with housing for the nonelderly handicapped.(18) An estimate of start-up expenses and the source of funds to meet theseexpenses. If the Sponsor plans to use section 106(b) seed money loans,an application for such loan must be submitted, with required attachments.(19) Evidence of the Sponsor's financial ability and willingness to fundthe minimum capital investment under andSection; 885.810(i) and to ensurethe development and long-term operation of the project, including copiesof balance sheets and statements of income and expenses for each of thepast three years that the Sponsor has operated.(20) The housing consultant's resume and a copy of the consultant contract(if consultant services have been used by the Sponsor).(21) Evidence that the Sponsor has notified the State single point of contactof the application for review and comment under 24 CFR Part 52 and ExecutiveOrder No. 12372_Intergovernmental Review of Federal Programs.(22) A signed certification of the Sponsor's intention to comply with thenondiscrimination and equal opportunity requirements of andSection; 885.740(a).(23) A demonstration that the Sponsor meets all other requirements imposedby HUD. Notice of such requirements will be made available to Sponsorsbefore submission of their applications. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.717 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Project standards. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Property standards. </T3>Projects under this Subpart must comply withHUD Minimum Property Standards. (b) <T3>Minimum group home standards. </T3>Each group home must provide a minimumof 290 square feet of pro rated space for each resident, including a minimumarea of 80 square feet for each resident in a shared bedroom (with no morethan two residents occupying a shared bedroom) and a minimum area of 100square feet for a single occupant bedroom; at least one full bathroom forevery four residents; space for recreation at indoor and outdoor locationson the project site; and sufficient storage for each resident in the bedroomand other storage space necessary for the operation of the home. (c) <T3>Accessibility requirements. </T3>(1) Projects under this Subpart mustcomply with the Uniform Federal Accessibility Standards (24 CFR Part 40,Appendix A), HUD's regulations implementing section 504 of the RehabilitationAct of 1973 (24 CFR Part 8) and HUD's regulations implementing the FairHousing Act (24 CFR Part 100) (2) All entrances, common areas, units to be occupied by a residentialsupervisor, and amenities must be readily accessible to and usable by personswith physical handicaps. (3) In projects for chronically mentally ill individuals, a minimum often percent of all dwelling units in an independent living complex (orten percent of all bedrooms and bathrooms in a group home), but at leastone of each such space, must be designed to be accessible or adaptablefor persons with physical handicaps. (4) In projects for developmentally disabled or physically handicappedindividuals, all dwelling units in an independent living complex (or allbedrooms and bathrooms in a group home) must be designed to be accessibleor adaptable for persons with physical handicaps. A project involving substantialrehabilitation or an acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitationmay provide a lesser number if: (i) The cost of providing full accessibilitymakes the project financially infeasible; (ii) less than one-half of theintended occupants have mobility impairments; and (iii) the project complieswith the requirements of 24 CFR 8.23. (5) For the purposes of paragraphs (c) (2), (3) and (4) of this section,``Accessible'' and ``adaptable'' are defined in 24 CFR Part 40, AppendixA. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.720 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Project size limitations. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Maximum project size. </T3>Projects under this subpart are subjectto the following project size limitations: (1) Group homes may not be designed to serve more than 15 persons on onesite; (2) Independent living complexes for chronically mentally ill individualsmay not be designed to serve more than 20 persons on one site; and (3) Independent living complexes for handicapped families in developmentaldisability or physically handicapped occupancy categories may not havemore than 24 units nor more than 24 households on one site. For the purposesof this section, household has the same meaning as handicapped family,except that unrelated handicapped individuals sharing a unit (other thana handicapped person living with another person who is essential to thehandicapped person's well-being) are counted separate households. For independentliving complexes for handicapped families in the developmental disabilityor physically handicapped occupancy categories, units with three or morebedrooms may only be developed to serve handicapped families of one ortwo parents with children. (b) <T3>Additional limitations. </T3>Based on the amount of loan authorityappropriated for a fiscal year, HUD may impose additional limitations onthe number of units or residents that may be proposed under an applicationfor section 202 loan fund reservation. This unit limitation will be publishedin the annual announcement of fund availability or the invitation for section202 fund reservation under andSection; 885.705. (c) <T3>Exemptions. </T3>On a case-by-case basis, HUD may approve independentliving complexes that do not comply with the project size limitations prescribedin paragraphs (a)(2), (a)(3) or (b) of this section. HUD may approve suchprojects if the Sponsor demonstrates: (1) The increased number of units is necessary for the economic feasibilityof the project; (2) A project of the size proposed is compatible with other residentialdevelopment and the population density of the area in which the projectis to be located; (3) A project of the size proposed can be successfully integrated intothe community; and (4) A project of the size proposed is marketable in the community. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.725 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Cost containment and modest design standards. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Restrictions on amenities. </T3>Projects must be modest in design.Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this section below, amenities mustbe limited to those amenities, as determined by HUD, that are generallyprovided in unassisted decent, safe and sanitary housing for lower incomefamilies in the market area. Amenities not eligible for HUD funding includebalconies, atriums, decks, bowling alleys, swimming pools, saunas and jacuzzis.Dishwashers, trash compactors, and washers and dryers in individual unitswill not be funded in independent living complexes. The use of durablematerials to control or reduce maintenance, repair and replacement costsis not an excess amenity. (b) <T3>Unit sizes. </T3>For independent living complexes, HUD will establishlimitations on the size of units and number of bathrooms, based on thenumber of bedrooms that are in the unit. (c) <T3>Special spaces and accommodations. </T3>The costs of construction ofspecial spaces and accommodations may not exceed 10 percent of the totalcost of construction, except as provided in paragraph (d) of this sectionbelow. Special spaces and accommodations include multipurpose rooms; gamerooms; libraries; lounges; and, in independent living complexes, centralkitchens and dining rooms. Special spaces and accommodations exclude offices,halls, mechanical rooms, laundry rooms, and parking areas, and (1) dwellingunits and lobbies in independent living complexes; and (2) bedrooms, livingrooms, dining and kitchen areas, shared bathrooms, and resident staff dwellingunits in group homes. (d) <T3>Exceptions. </T3>HUD may approve a project that does not comply withthe cost containment and modest design standards of paragraphs (a) through(c) of this section if: (1) The Sponsor demonstrates a willingness and ability to contribute theincremental development cost and continuing operating costs associatedwith the additional amenities or design features; or (2) The proposed project involves substantial rehabilitation or acquisitionwith or without moderate rehabilitation, the additional amenities or designfeatures were incorporated into the existing structure before the submissionof the application, and the total development cost of the project withthe additional amenities or design features does not exceed the cost limitsdescribed in andSection; 885.810.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.727 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibited facilities. </ITAG>Project facilities may not include commercial spaces, infirmaries, nursingstations, spaces dedicated to the delivery of medical treatment or physicaltherapy, padded rooms, or space for respite care or sheltered workshops.Except for office space used by the Borrower exclusively for the administrationof the project, project facilities may not include office space. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.730 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Site and neighborhood standards. </ITAG>(a) The site must be adequate in size, exposure and contour to accommodatethe number and type of units proposed, and adequate utilities (water, sewer,gas and electricity) and streets must be available to service the site.(b) The site and neighborhood must be suitable from the standpoint of facilitatingand furthering full compliance with the applicable provisions of TitleVI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, Title VIII of the Civil Rights Actof 1968, Executive Order 11063 and implementing HUD regulations. (c) New construction sites must meet the following requirements. (1) The site must not be located in an area of minority concentration exceptas permitted under paragraph (c)(2) of this section, and must not be locatedin a racially mixed area if the project will cause a significant increasein the proportion of minority to non-minority residents in the area. (2) A project may be located in an area of minority concentration onlyif: (i) Sufficient, comparable opportunities exist for housing for minorityfamilies, in the income range to be served by the proposed project, outsideareas of minority concentration (see paragraph (c)(3) of this section forfurther guidance on this criterion); or (ii) The project is necessary to meet overriding housing needs that cannototherwise feasibly be met in that housing market area (see paragraph (c)(4)of this section for further guidance on this criterion). (3)(i) ``Sufficient'' does not require that in every locality there bean equal number of assisted units within and outside of areas of minorityconcentration. Rather, application of this standard should produce a reasonabledistribution of assisted units each year which over a period of severalyears will approach an appropriate balance of housing opportunities withinand outside areas of minority concentration. An appropriate balance inany jurisdiction must be determined in light of local conditions affectingthe range of housing choices available for lower income minority familiesand in relation to the racial mix of the locality's population. (ii) Units may be considered to be ``comparable opportunities'' if theyhave the same household type and tenant type (owner/renter); require approximatelythe same tenant contribution towards rent; serve the same income group;are located in the same housing market; and are in standard condition.(iii) Application of this sufficient, comparable opportunities standardinvolves assessing the overall impact of HUD assisted housing on the availabilityof housing choices for lower income minority families in and outside areasof minority concentration, and must take into account the extent to whichthe following factors are present, along with any other factor relevantto housing choice. (A) A significant number of assisted housing units are available outsideareas of minority concentration. (B) There is significant integration of assisted housing projects constructedor rehabilitated in the past ten years, relative to the racial mix of theeligible population. (C) There are racially integrated neighborhoods in the locality. (D) Programs are operated by the locality to assist minority families whowish to find housing outside areas of minority concentration. (E) Minority families have benefitted from local activities (e.g., acquisitionand write-down of sites, tax relief programs for homeowners, acquisitionsof units for use as assisted housing units) undertaken to expand choicefor minority families outside of areas of minority concentration. (F) A significant proportion of minority households have been successfulin finding units in non-minority areas under the Section 8 Certificateand Housing Voucher programs. (G) Comparable housing opportunities have been made available outside areasof minority concentration through other programs. (4) Application of the ``overriding housing needs'' criterion, for example,permits approval of sites that are an integral part of an overall localstrategy for the preservation or restoration of the immediate neighborhoodand of sites in a neighborhood experiencing significant private investmentthat is demonstrably changing the economic character of the area (a ``revitalizingarea''). An ``overriding housing need'', however, may not serve as thebasis for determining that a site is acceptable if the only reason theneed cannot otherwise be feasibly met is that discrimination on the basisof race, color, creed, sex, or national origin renders sites outside areasof minority concentration unavailable or if the use of this standard inrecent years has had the effect of circumventing the obligation to providehousing choice. (d) The site must promote greater choice of housing opportunities and avoidundue concentration of assisted persons in areas containing a high proportionof low-income persons. (e) The neighborhood must not be one which is seriously detrimental tofamily life or in which substandard dwellings or other undesirable conditionspredominate, unless there is actively in progress a concerted program toremedy the undesirable conditions. (f) The housing must be accessible to social, recreational, educational,commercial, and health facilities and services, and other municipal facilitiesand services that are at least equivalent to those typically found in neighborhoodsconsisting largely of unassisted, standard housing of similar market rents.(g) Travel time and cost via public transportation or private automobile,from the neighborhood to places of employment providing a range of jobsfor lower-income workers, must not be excessive. (h) Projects must be located in neighborhoods where other family housingis located. Except as provided below, projects may not be located adjacentto the following facilities, or in areas where such facilities are concentrated:schools or day-care centers for handicapped persons, workshops, medicalfacilities, or other housing primarily serving handicapped persons. Projectsmay be located adjacent to other housing primarily serving handicappedpersons if the projects together do not exceed the project size limitationsunder andSection; 885.720(a). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.735 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibited relationships. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Conflicts of interest. </T3>Officers, directors, trustees, members,stockholders and authorized representatives of the Borrower, and officersand directors of the Sponsor may not have any financial interest in anycontract in connection with the rendition of services, the provision ofgoods or supplies, project management, procurement of furnishings or equipment,construction of the project, procurement of the site or other matters relatedto the development and operation of the project. Management contracts (includingassociated management fees) entered into by the Borrower with the Sponsoror the Sponsor's nonprofit affiliate will not constitute a conflict ofinterest if no more than two persons salaried by the Sponsor or managementaffiliate serve as nonvoting members on the Borrower's board of directors.(b) <T3>Interest in earnings. </T3>No part of the net earnings of the Borroweror Sponsor may inure to the benefit of any private shareholder, contributor,or individual.(c) <T3>Control of Borrower or Sponsor. </T3>Neither the Borrower nor the Sponsormay be controlled by, or under the direction of, persons or entities seekingto derive profit or gain as a result of activities undertaken by the Borroweror Sponsor.(d) <T3>Provision of services. </T3>A person or an entity (including an affiliatedentity) may not provide services to a project in more than one of the followingcapacities: attorney, architect, contractor, housing consultant, managementagent, or seller of the site for the project, except that the same personor entity may serve a project as management agent and housing consultant.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.740</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other Federal requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Nondiscrimination and equal opportunity. </T3>Participation in thisprogram requires compliance with:(1) The requirements of Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (42U.S.C. 3601-19) (Fair Housing Act) and its implementing regulations; ExecutiveOrder No. 11063 (Equal Opportunity in Housing) and implementing regulationsat 24 CFR Part 107; and Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C.2000d) (Nondiscrimination in Federally Assisted Programs) and implementingregulations at 24 CFR Part 1.;(2) The prohibitions against discrimination on the basis of age under theAge Discrimination Act of 1975 (42 U.S.C. 6101-07) and implementing regulationsat 24 CFR Part 146, and the prohibitions against discrimination againstotherwise qualified individuals with handicaps under section 504 of theRehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. 794) and implementing regulationsat 24 CFR Part 8.(3) The requirements of Executive Order No. 11246 (Equal Employment Opportunity)and the regulations issued under the Order at 41 CFR Chapter 60;(4) The requirements of section 3 of the Housing and Urban DevelopmentAct of 1968 (12 U.S.C. 1701u) (Employment Opportunities for Lower IncomePersons in Connection with Assisted Projects) and the implementing regulationsat 24 CFR Part 135;(5) The requirements of Executive Order Nos. 11625, 12432, and 12138 (Minorityand Women's Business Enterprises);(6) The affirmative fair housing marketing requirements of 24 CFR Part200, Subpart M and the implementing regulations at 24 CFR Part 108.(7) The fair housing advertising and poster guidelines, 24 CFR Parts 109and 110.(b) <T3>Environmental. </T3>The National Environmental Policy Act of 1969,HUD's implementing regulations at 24 CFR Part 50, including the relatedauthorities described in 24 CFR 50.4, and the Coastal Barrier ResourcesAct of 1982 (16 U.S.C. 3601) apply to this program. For the purposes ofExecutive Order No. 11988, Floodplain Management, all applications forintermediate care facilities for the mentally retarded and individualswith related conditions (see andSection; 885.710(b)(4)(vii)) shall be treatedas critical actions requiring consideration of the 500-year flood plain.(c) <T3>Flood insurance. </T3>The Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973 (42U.S.C. 4001) applies to this program.(d) <T3>Labor standards. </T3>(1) For projects that are designed for dwellinguse by 12 or more handicapped families (other than projects acquired withoutrehabilitation), participation in this program is subject to the followingrequirements.(i) Not less than the wages prevailing in the locality, as determined bythe Secretary of Labor under the Davis-Bacon Act (40 U.S.C. 276a-276a-5),must be paid to all laborers and mechanics employed in the constructionor rehabilitation of the project. HUD may waive the Davis-Bacon requirementsif laborers or mechanics voluntarily donate their services without fullcompensation for the purposes of lowering the costs of construction orrehabilitation; the laborers or mechanics are not otherwise employed inthe construction or rehabilitation of projects that are assisted underthis part and designed for dwelling use by 12 or more families; and HUDdetermines that any amounts saved are fully credited to the Borrower undertakingthe construction or rehabilitation.(ii) Except where the Davis-Bacon requirements have been waived under paragraph(c)(1) of this section, contracts involving employment of laborers andmechanics shall be subject to the provisions of the Contract Work Hoursand Safety Standards Act (40 U.S.C. 327-333).(iii) Sponsors, Borrowers, contractors and subcontractors must comply withall related rules, regulations, and requirements.(2) For the purposes of this paragraph (d), an independent living complexis designed for use by 12 or more families if the complex includes 12 ormore units. This paragraph (d) does not apply to group homes.(e) <T3>Displacement and relocation assistance. </T3>(1) The Uniform RelocationAssistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 (42 U.S.C.4601) as amended by the Uniform Relocation Assistance Amendments of 1987,Title IV of the Surface Transportation and Uniform Relocation AssistanceAct of 1987 (Pub. L. 100-17, approved April 2, 1987) (URA) and government-wideimplementing regulations at 49 CFR Part 24 set forth relocation assistancerequirements that apply to the displacement of any person (family, individual,business, nonprofit organization or farm) as a direct result of acquisition,rehabilitation or demolition for a project assisted under this part.(2) For projects involving applications that are submitted without evidenceof control of an approvable site, a displacement from the real propertyis covered by the URA if it occurs on or after the date that the Sponsorobtains control of an approvable site. For projects involving applicationsthat are submitted with evidence of control an approvable site, a displacementfrom the real property is covered by the URA if it occurs on or after thedate that the application is submitted. Displacements occurring on or afterthese dates, however, may not be covered if:(i) The person has been evicted for cause based upon a serious or repeatedviolation of the material terms of the lease or occupancy agreement andHUD determines that the eviction was not undertaken for the purpose ofevading the obligation to provide relocation assistance;(ii) The person moved into the real property after the date specified above,but received prior written notice of the expected displacement;(iii) The person is an owner-occupant and has been informed that the realproperty will not be acquired for the project under the threat of eminentdomain; or(iv) The Sponsor (Borrower) determines that the displacement did not occuras a direct result of acquisition, rehabilitation, or demolition for theproject, and HUD concurs in that determination.(3) If a person is displaced from the real property before the date specifiedabove and either HUD or the Sponsor (Borrower) determines that the displacementresulted from acquisition, rehabilitation, or demolition, the person shallbe eligible for relocation assistance as a displaced person.(4) The Sponsor (Borrower) may, at any time, request a HUD determinationwhether a displacement will be covered by the URA and the implementingregulations.(5) A displaced person's eligibility for relocation assistance is subjectto the requirements in 49 CFR Part 24.(f) <T3>Lead-based paint.</T3> (1) The requirements of the Lead-Based PaintPoisoning Prevention Act (42 U.S.C. 4821-4846) and implementing regulationsat 24 CFR Part 35 (except as superseded in paragraph (f)(2) of this section)apply to the dwellings (except zero-bedroom dwelling units) in housingassisted under this subpart which (i) was constructed or substantiallyrehabilitated before 1978 and (ii) in which any child under seven yearsof age resides or is expected to reside.(2)(i) This paragraph implements the provisions of section 302 of the Lead-BasedPaint Poisoning Prevention Act, 42 U.S.C. 4822, by establishing proceduresto eliminate, as far as practicable, the hazards of lead-based paint poisoningwith respect to covered structures for which assistance is provided underthis program. This paragraph is promulgated under 24 CFR 35.24(b)(4) andsupersedes, with respect to the program, the requirements prescribed inSubpart C of 24 CFR Part 35.(ii) The following definitions apply to this paragraph (f):<T3>Applicable surface</T3> means all intact and nonintact painted interiorand exterior surfaces of a residential structure.<T3>Chewable surface</T3> means all chewable protruding painted surfacesup to five feet from the floor or ground, which are readily accessibleto children under seven years of age, e.g., protruding corners, windowsillsand frames, doors and frames, and other protruding woodworks.<T3>Defective paint surfaces</T3> means paint on applicable surfaces thatis cracking, scaling, chipping, peeling, or loose.<T3>Elevated blood lead level or EBL</T3> means excessive absorption oflead: that is, a confirmed concentration of lead in whole blood of 25 mg/dl(micrograms of lead per deciliter of whole blood) or greater.<T3>Lead-based paint surface</T3> means a paint surface, whether or notdefective, identified as having a lead content greater than or equal to1 mg/cm2.(iii) In the case of a structure constructed before 1978 or substantiallyrehabilitated prior to 1978, the Sponsor must inspect the structure fordefective paint surfaces before it submits site information under andSection;885.780. If defective paint surfaces are found, treatment in accordancewith 24 CFR 35.24(b)(2)(ii) is required. Correction of defective surfacesfound during the initial inspection must be completed before initial occupancyof the project. Correction of defective paint conditions discovered atperiodic inspection must be completed within 30 days of their discovery.When weather conditions prevent completion of repainting of exterior surfaceswithin the 30-day period, repainting may be delayed, but covering or removalof the defective paint must be completed within the prescribed period.(iv) In the case of a structure constructed before 1978 or substantiallyrehabilitated prior to 1978, if the Borrower is presented with test resultsthat indicate that a child under the age of seven years occupies the structureand has an elevated blood lead level (EBL), the Borrower must cause theunit to be tested for lead-based paint on chewable surfaces. Testing mustbe conducted by a State or local health or housing agency, by an inspectorcertified or regulated by a State or local health or housing agency, oran organization recognized by HUD. Lead content shall be tested by usingan X-ray fluorescence analysis (XRF) or other method approved by HUD. Testreadings of 1 mg/cm2 or higher using an XRF shall be considered positivefor presence of lead-based paint. Where lead-based paint on chewable surfacesis identified, covering or removal of the paint surface in accordance with24 CFR 35.24(b)(2)(ii) is required.(v) Where abatement will result from rehabilitation activities planned(<T3>i.e.,</T3> where all applicable surfaces will be replaced, coveredor otherwise abated as described in this part), these surfaces need notbe tested.(vi) In lieu of the procedures set forth in the preceding clause, the Borrowermay, at its discretion, abate all interior and exterior chewable surfacesin accordance with the methods set out at 24 CFR 35.24(b)(2)(ii).(vii) The Borrower must take appropriate action to protect tenants fromhazards associated with abatement procedures.(viii) The Borrower must keep a copy of each inspection report for at leastthree years. If a unit requires testing, or treatment of chewable surfacesbased on the testing, the Borrower must keep the test results, and, ifapplicable, the certification of treatment indefinitely. The records mustindicate which chewable surfaces in the units have been tested or treated.If records establish that certain chewable surfaces were tested, or testedand treated, in accordance with the standards prescribed in this section,these surfaces do not have to be tested or treated at any subsequent time.(g) <T3>Intergovernmental review.</T3> The requirements for intergovernmentalreview in Executive Order No. 12372 and the implementing regulations at24 CFR Part 52 are applicable to this program.<ITAG tagnum="84">Selection of Applications and Duration of Fund Reservation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.750</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Review of applications for fund reservation.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Preliminary evaluation.</T3> (1) HUD will perform a preliminary reviewof every application. To be eligible for technical review, the applicationmust meet each of the criteria described below.(i) The application must be received by HUD at the appropriate addresswithin the time period specified in the invitation, and must be complete.If an application is determinated to be missing documents, however, theSponsor shall be advised in writing of the omissions and that additionswill be accepted if they are received on or before a specified date.(ii) The Sponsor must be eligible to participate in the program.(iii) The proposed facilities and proposed occupancy requirements mustbe eligible under the program.(iv) The application must include a supportive services plan meeting therequirements of andSection; 885.710(b)(6).(2) Following the completion of the preliminary evaluation of all applications,HUD will notify Sponsors of applications that are found to be unapprovable.The notification will be in writing and will explain the reasons for HUD'saction.(b) <T3>Technical review processing.</T3> (1) HUD will perform a technicalreview of each application that is found to be acceptable under the preliminaryevaluation. Technical review processing will consist of the following:(i) HUD will review the application to determine if:(A) The Sponsor has demonstrated financial and management capability tocarry the project through to completion.(B) The Sponsor has previous experience in developing or operating housing,medical, or other facilities, or experience in providing supportive servicesto individuals of the disability group(s) proposed to be housed.(C) The Sponsor has made a commitment and will be able to provide the preliminarydevelopment costs and the minimum capital investment.(D) The narrative description submitted under andSection; 885.710(b)(4) isappropriate for handicapped individuals meeting the proposed project occupancyrequirements, and indicates that the proposed project is likely to complywith the project standards described in andSection; 885.717, the projectsize limitations of andSection; 885.720, the modest design and cost containmentstandards, of andSection; 885.725, and the facility prohibitions of andSection;885.727.(E) The locality (or the site, if the Sponsor has submitted evidence underandSection; 885.780) is likely to meet the site and neighborhood standardsof andSection; 885.730. If the Sponsor has submitted evidence of site controlwith the application, HUD will also determine if the site is acceptableunder andSection; 885.780, including environmental review and flood hazardrequirements. If a Sponsor has provided evidence of site control and HUDdetermines that the site is unacceptable, HUD will process the applicationas if no site evidence has been submitted provided the Sponsor has indicateda willingness to develop on another site.(F) The service plan description under andSection; 885.710(b)(6) is directedto the needs of individuals with the type of disability the project proposesto serve, and demonstrates the Sponsor's ability to provide or assure theprovision of the proposed supportive services to such individuals.(G) To the extent that supportive services will be funded by State or localagencies, the proposed project does not conflict with State or local plansand policies governing the development and operation of facilities to serveindividuals with the type of disability the project proposes to serve.(H) There is evidence of effective demand for the proposed project.(I) The Sponsor is in compliance with nondiscrimination and equal opportunityrequirements.(J) The application is otherwise responsive to the invitation for applicationsand the requirements of this part.(ii) During technical review processing, HUD will also review the comments(if any) received from the State single point of contact, and will determineif the proposed project is located in a locality that is acceptable underandSection; 885.780(c)(3)(i).(2) Based on the factors set forth in this paragraph (b), HUD will determinewhich applications are approvable. Selections will be made in accordancewith paragraphs (c) and (d) of this section.(c) <T3>Ranking.</T3> (1) HUD will assign a rating to each application foundto be approvable under technical review processing, based upon HUD's assessmentof:(i) The degree to which the Sponsor has demonstrated, relative to otherproposals: (A) (Its capacity and commitment to assist the Borrower to carrythe project through to long-term operation; (B) the Sponsor's ability andcommitment to provide the Borrower with the financial resources to establishand ensure the long-term operation of the proposed project; (C) the needin the locality for a project serving handicapped individuals meeting theproposed project occupancy requirements; (D) support for the proposed projectfrom the local community, including State and local organizations familiarwith the needs of handicapped individuals meeting the proposed projectoccupancy requirements; and (E) the Sponsor's ability to provide or facilitatethe provision of the proposed supportive services to handicapped individualsmeeting the proposed project occupancy requirements (including experienceserving minority handicapped persons).(ii) The degree to which the application meets unforeseeable housing needs,especially those brought on by natural disasters or special relocationrequirements; supports minority enterprise; involves a small research ordemonstration project; meets lower-income housing needs described in housingassistance plans; or provides an innovative housing program or alternativemethod of meeting lower income housing needs.(2) HUD may also assign additional rating points to applications that includesatisfactory evidence of control of an approvable site (see andSection; 885.780)or, for group homes, that also propose to use acquisition with or withoutmoderate rehabilitation as the development method. If additional pointsfor these factors will be awarded, the announcement of funds availabilityunder andSection; 885.705 will include the maximum number of points thatmay be awarded under each factor.(3) Within each allocation area, HUD shall rank all approvable applicationsin order of their rating scores.(d) <T3>Selection.</T3> (1) Based on the ranking under paragraph (c) of thissection, HUD shall select applications in the descending order of fundingpriority that most closely approximates the loan authority provided tothe allocation area.(2) If the amount of loan authority allocated to an area exceeds the amountnecessary to fund all approvable applications in that area, the Departmentshall transfer the unused loan authority from the area to another areaor areas in which there is insufficient loan authority for all approvableapplications.(3) After selection of applications that can be funded with the loan authorityallocated to the allocation areas, HUD may select unfunded but otherwiseapprovable applications for funding from amounts in the Headquarters Reserve.(4) Following the selection of applications, HUD will notify the Sponsorsof applications that are not approvable after technical review processingunder paragraph (b) of this section, and the Sponsors of applications thatare not selected for funding under this paragraph (d). The notificationwill be in writing and will explain the reasons for HUD's action.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.755</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of applications.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Notice of fund reservation.</T3> A Sponsor whose application is approvedwill be issued a notice of section 202 fund reservation in a format prescribedby HUD. The notice of fund reservation will specify:(1) The number and mix of units for an independent living complex or thenumber of residents approved for a group home, the locality of the proposedproject (or, where the Sponsor presented satisfactory evidence of controlof an approvable site, the location of the site), and the project occupancyrequirements approved by HUD;(2) The amount of the section 202 fund reservation based on the developmentcost limit computed under andSection;885.810(c);(3) The amount of annual project assistance reserved for the project equalto the sum of the operating cost standard developed under andSection;885.807plus the annual debt service on the amount of the section 202 fund reservation(computed at an annual interest rate equal to the loan interest rate underandSection;885.810(f)(1) in effect on the date the notice is issued);(4) The deadline for the Sponsor to return a copy of the notification toHUD with an indication of its acceptance;(5) If the Sponsor did not submit the site information required under andSection;885.780with the application or if the Sponsor submitted the site information butHUD determined that the site was not approvable, the deadline for the Sponsorto submit such information and the reasons for the rejection of any proposedsite;(6) The deadline for the Borrower to submit a request for direct loan financingand a request for determination of Borrower eligibility under andSection;885.800;and(7) Other guidance to Sponsors and Borrowers (including any additionalevidence required under andSection;885.800(b)(2)(vii)).(b) <T3>Withdrawal of approval.</T3> If the Sponsor does not accept the notificationby the date specified in the notice of fund reservation, HUD may notifythe Sponsor that approval of the application is withdrawn.(c) <T3>Transfer of reservation.</T3> Except for a transfer of loan fund reservationfrom the Sponsor to the HUD-approved borrower established by the Sponsor,no part of the loan fund reservation may be transferred.(d) <T3>Use of loan funds.</T3> A section 202 fund reservation may be usedonly for the project that has been approved under the application.(e) <T3>Amendments.</T3> Subject to the availability of funds, HUD may amendthe amount of a fund reservation approved under paragraph (a)(1) of thissection at any time before the final closing of a loan.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.770 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duration of section 202 fund reservations.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Extension and cancellation of fund reservation.</T3> The duration ofthe initial fund reservation is 18 months from the date of issuance ofthe notice under andSection;885.755. Subject to the approval of the AssistantSecretary:(1) The field office may, at any time, issue a notice of loan cancellationif the field office determines that the Borrower is not making satisfactoryprogress toward the start of construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition.(2) The field office shall issue a notice of loan cancellation if the construction,substantial rehabilitation, or acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitationof a project is not begun within 18 months after the notice of section202 fund reservation under andSection;885.755(a) is issued. This 18-monthtime period may be extended if HUD determines that the Borrower is makingsatisfactory progress toward the start of construction, rehabilitationor acquisition with or without rehabilitation. HUD may extend this timeperiod up to 24 months after the notice of section 202 fund reservationis issued. A fund reservation extension may affect the interest rate tobe paid on the section 202 loan if the Borrower has made an election ofthe optional rate (see andSection;885.810(f)(2)(iv)).(b) <T3>Notification procedures.</T3> (1) If HUD determines that a fund reservationmust be cancelled under paragraph (a) of this section, the field officeshall mail a notice of loan cancellation to the Borrower by certified mail,return receipt requested. The notice of loan cancellation must:(i) Describe the reasons for the cancellation of the loan authority; and(ii) Advise the Borrower that it may file an appeal of the cancellationwith the field office within 30 days of the receipt of the cancellationnotice, and that the failure to file an appeal will result in the cancellationof the fund reservation upon the expiration of the 30-day period.(2) If the Borrower fails to file an appeal of the loan cancellation within30 days of the receipt of the cancellation notice, the field office shallcancel the fund reservation and provide a written notice of the cancellationto the Borrower.(3) If the Borrower files an appeal within 30 days of the receipt of thecancellation notice, HUD Headquarters will review the appeal and will issuea decision on the appeal within 45 days of the receipt of the appeal. HUDwill approve the appeal if the Borrower demonstrates that it is makingsatisfactory progress toward the start of construction, rehabilitation,or acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation.(i) If HUD approves the appeal, it shall provide a written notificationof the approval to the Borrower. The notification shall indicate the durationof the extended fund reservation.(ii) If HUD disapproves the appeal, it shall notify the Borrower in writingof the determination, and cancel the fund reservation. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.775</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Transition.</ITAG>At any time before intitial loan closing, a Sponsor or Borrower that receiveda reservation of loan authority under section 202 of the Housing Act of1959 and a reservation of contract authority for housing assistance paymentsunder section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 for a projectfor nonelderly handicapped families may submit a request to HUD to substituteproject assistance payments under this Subpart C for the section 8 housingassistance payments. After HUD completes its selections for funding ina fiscal year and to the extent that funds are available for the substitutionof project assistance, HUD may approve a request if: (a) The project iseligible for assistance under the requirements of this Subpart C; and (b)the project is financially infeasible with contract rents limited by thesection 8 Fair Market Rents or the substitution would otherwise facilitatethe development of the project in a timely manner.<ITAG tagnum="85">Director Loan Financing Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.780</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Submission of site information.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Required information. </T3>The following information with respect tothe proposed project is not required with the application, but must beprovided within the time period specified in andSection; 885.755(a)(5).(1) Documentary evidence that the Sponsor has control of the site.(2) A map showing the location of the site and the racial composition ofthe neighborhood, with any area of racial concentration delineated.(3) Evidence that the proposed acquisition, construction or rehabilitationis permissible under applicable zoning ordinances or regulations, or adescription of the actions required to make the acquisition, constructionor rehabilitation permissible under such laws and ordinances and the basisfor the Sponsor's belief that proposed actions will be completed successfullybefore the receipt of commitment for direct loan financing (e.g., a summaryof the results of any recent requests for rezoning classifications andthe time required for such rezoning, preliminary indications of acceptabilityfrom zoning bodies, etc.).(4) A statement whether the proposed project will displace site occupants.If so, the proposal must state the number of families, individuals, andbusiness concerns to be displaced (identified by race or minority group,and status as owners of renters); must demonstrate that relocation is feasible;and must explain how necessary relocation payments, if any, will be funded.Relocation payments may not be funded from loan proceeds. (5) A showing that the proposal meets any special requirements or restrictionsnecessary for compliance with the local HAP.(b) <T3>HUD review of site information.</T3> HUD will review the Sponsor'ssubmission under paragraph (a) of this section. A site may be approvedif it meets the additional site requirements described in paragraph (c)of this section below, and:(1) The site meets the site and neighborhood standards of andSection; 885.730.(2) The Sponsor has demonstrated that the development of the site is permissibleunder applicable local zoning ordinances or regulations or will be permissibleunder such ordinances and regulations before the receipt of the commitmentfor direct loan financing;(3) The site is suitable for its intended use;(4) Any proposed relocation is feasible and necessary relocation paymentswill be funded from sources other than section 202 loan proceeds.(c) <T3>Additional site requirements._</T3>(1)<T3> HAP consistency. </T3> (i) When site-specific information is receivedfor a project involving more than 12 units, HUD will forward (if not previouslysubmitted by the Sponsor) a notification, in the form prescribed by HUD,to the chief executive officer (or such persons as that office may designate)of the unit of general local government in which the proposed housing isto be located, and shall invite a response within 30 calendar days fromthe date of the notification letter.(ii) HUD will analyze the proposal and review the comments, if any, receivedduring the response period from the appropriate unit of general local governmentto determine if the proposed site for the project is approvable under section213 of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974. (2) <T3>Environmental review. </T3>HUD will complete an environmental reviewin compliance with the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 and therelated authorities in 24 CFR Part 50.(3) <T3>Flood insurance. </T3>Assistance will not be provided for the acquisition,construction, reconstruction, repair, or improvement of a building locatedin an area that has been identified by the Federal Emergency ManagementAgency (FEMA) as having special flood hazards unless (i)(A) the communityin which the area is situated is participating in the National Flood InsuranceProgram in accordance with 44 CFR Parts 59-79, or (B) less than a yearhas passed since FEMA notification to the community regarding such hazards;and (ii) flood insurance on the structure is obtained in accordance withsection 102(a) of the Flood Disaster Protection Act of 1973 (42 U.S.C.4001).(4) <T3>Coastal barriers. </T3>Assistance will not be provided for projectsin an undeveloped coastal barrier designated under the Coastal BarrierResources Act of 1982 (16 U.S.C. 3601).(d) <T3>HUD approval. </T3>(1) If HUD determines that a site is approvableunder this section, HUD will notify the Sponsor of the approval, includinga statement of any specific environmental conditions that must be met asa condition of HUD approval. The Sponsor must obtain site approval underthis section before it applies for conditional commitment under andSection;885.800(c).(2) If HUD determines that a site is not approvable under this section,HUD will notify the Sponsor of the disapproval and the reasons for disapproval.If a site is disapproved, the Sponsor may, consistent with its applicationunder andSection; 885.710, obtain a new site and resubmit a request for siteapproval under this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.800</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Request for direct loan financing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Request for direct loan financing.</T3> A Borrower established by aSponsor receiving a fund reservation must submit a request for direct loanfinancing within the time limit specified in the notice of section 202fund reservation to the field office serving the area in which the proposedproject will be located.(b) <T3>Request for determination of Borrower eligibility. </T3>Simultaneouslywith the request for direct loan financing, the Borrower must submit arequest for determination of eligibility, on a form or forms prescribedby HUD.(1) The Borrower will be required to submit the information required ofSponsors under andSection;andSection; 885.710(b) (1), (2), (11), (12) (ii)and (iii), (13) and (16), as modified by this paragraph:(i) Borrowers may omit the board of director's resolution required underandSection; 885.710(b)(11), but will be required to submit certificationssigned by all officers and directors of the Sponsor and the Borrower certifyingthat they have not had and will not have any financial interest in anycontract, or in any firm or corporation that has a contract, with the Borrowerin connection with the rendition of services, the provision of goods orsupplies, procurement of furnishings and equipment, construction of theproject, procurement of the site, or other matters whatsoever. In the caseof officers and directors of the Sponsor, this certification does not applyto management contracts as described in andSection; 885.735(a).(ii) A Borrower will meet the requirements for a tax exemption ruling underandSection; 885.710(b)(12)(ii) if it demonstrates that it applied for a taxexemption ruling under section 501(c) (3) or (4) before filing the requestfor determination of Borrower eligibility.(2) Borrowers will be required to submit sufficient evidence to demonstrate:(i) The Borrower is a nonprofit corporation incorporated separately fromthe Sponsor;(ii) The Borrower has the necessary legal authority to finance, acquire(with or without moderate rehabilitation), construct, or substantiallyrehabilitate and maintain the project, and to apply for and receive thesection 202 loan.(iii) The Borrower meets all corporate organization requirements that HUDmay impose, including requirements that: (A) The purposes of the Borrowerinclude the promotion of the welfare of handicapped families; (B) the articlesof incorporation and by-laws do not include any references to religionor religious purposes; (C) the articles of incorporation must provide thatupon the dissolution of the Borrower, its assets remaining after paymentof all debts and liabilities will be conveyed or distributed only to anorganization created and operated for nonprofit purposes similar to theBorrower, other than one created for a religious purpose; and (D) the articlesof incorporation must permit the Sponsor to appoint and remove a majorityof the voting members of the Borrower's board of directors.(iv) The Borrower has not engaged and is not authorized to engage in anyother business or activity (including the operation of another rental property),and has not incurred and is not authorized to incur any liability or obligationnot related to the project.(v) The Sponsor has fulfilled its commitment to provide resources to theBorrower, as described in the Sponsor's application under andSection; 885.710(b)(12)(iii) and (19).(vi) The Borrower has submitted a request for preliminary determinationof eligibility as a mortgagor, on a form prescribed by HUD.(vii) The Borrower has submitted such additional evidence as HUD may requirein the notice of section 202 fund reservation under andSection; 885.755.(3) If housing consultant services were used by the Sponsor, the Borrowermust execute the housing consultant contract. The contract and an Identityof Interest and Disclosure Certificate signed by the housing consultantmust be submitted with the request for determination of Borrower eligibility.(c) <T3>Conditional commitment processing. </T3>The request for conditionalcommitment processing must be on a form or forms prescribed by HUD andmust include all required exhibits. During conditional commitment processing,HUD will:(1) Determine whether the Borrower has established its eligibility underparagraph (b) of this section.(2) Establish the amount of the initial contract rents and any initialutility allowances to be provided in independent living complexes.(i) The amount of the initial contract rent plus any utility allowancesshall not exceed the annual reasonable and necessary operating costs ofthe project plus the debt service on the amount of the section 202 loan.(ii) Operating cost standards developed under andSection; 885.807 are usedto evaluate the reasonableness of the operating costs of the proposed project.HUD may approve operating costs that exceed the applicable operating coststandard (including adjustments under andSection; 885.807(a)).(iii) If the cost of utilities (except telephone) and other housing servicesare not included in the initial contract rent for an independent livingcomplex, HUD will establish initial utility allowances for the projectbased on the monthly cost of a reasonable consumption of utilities andother services for the unit by an energy-conservative household of modestcircumstances consistent with the requirements of a safe, sanitary, andhealthful living environment. The cost of utilities and other housing servicesfor group homes will be included in the initial contract rent.(3) Review the site and project design to determine if the Borrower haspresented adequate evidence of site control, and the proposed project complieswith the project standards described in andSection; 885.717, the projectsize limitations of andSection; 885.720, the modest design and cost containmentstandards of andSection; 885.725, and the facility prohibitions of andSection;885.727. To assist in this review, Borrowers will be required to submitthe following information with their request for conditional commitment:(i) A sketch of the site plan showing the general development of the siteincluding the location of the proposed buildings, streets, parking areasand drives, service areas, and unusual site features, and architecturalsketches of typical unit plans (including the square feet per unit), floorplans for typical units, floor plans showing special spaces, accommodationsand common areas, and the main elevation of each building.(ii) If the proposed housing does not comply with the cost containmentand modest design standards of andSection; 885.725 (a)-(c), evidence demonstratingthat the proposed housing is eligible for an exception from these standardsunder andSection; 885.725(d).(4) Establish land value.(5) Evaluate the overall financial feasibility of the project.(6) Evaluate the adequacy of the Borrower's affirmative fair housing marketingplan.(d) <T3>Firm commitment processing. </T3>The request for firm commitment processingmust be on a form or forms prescribed by HUD and must include all requiredexhibits. Processing of a request for a firm commitment will include reviewof the final plans and specifications, review of environmental conditionsto site approval, review of the contractor/Borrower's cost estimate, anda review of the conclusions reached during conditional commitment processing.HUD will perform firm commitment processing without previous conditionalcommitment processing if HUD has issued architectural and engineering approvalof the preliminary designs. HUD may also permit the Borrower to submita request for firm commitment processing without previous conditional commitmentprocessing under certain other circumstances (e.g., where the project involvesan acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation, or constructionprojects utilizing designs that have been previously submitted to and approvedby HUD). Where single-step commitment processing is permitted, the stepsset forth in paragraph (c) of this section, will be performed during firmcommitment processing.(e) <T3>Loan interest rate. </T3>When the request for conditional or firm commitmentfor direct loan financing is submitted, the Borrower may request that theloan interest rate be computed at the optional interest rate as providedunder andSection; 885.810(f)(2). If the Borrower makes such a request, theloan interest rate used for the processing of the request for conditionalor firm commitment under paragraph (c) or (d) of this section shall bethe optional loan interest rate. If the Borrower does not make a requestfor the optional rate, the interest rate used for processing the requestshall be the interest rate computed under andSection; 885.810(f)(1).(f) <T3>Modification of contract rents. </T3>Contract rents proposed by a Borrowermay be modified by HUD at any time before execution of the agreement toenter into a project assistance contract.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.805</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of requests for direct loan financing.</ITAG>HUD will review the request for direct loan financing (including the requestfor determination of Borrower eligibility) and all required exhibits andwill notify the Borrower of its approval by issuance of a conditional orfirm commitment, as appropriate, or of its disapproval of the request.(a) <T3>Issuance of conditional commitment. </T3>A conditional commitment willinclude the following:(1) The estimated cost of the project;(2) The land value fully improved (with offsite improvements installed)and, if the proposal involves the rehabilitation of a project, the ``asis'' value of the site;(3) The detailed estimates of operating expenses;(4) The financial requirements;(5) The loan amount;(6) The interest rate used in processing the request;(7) The approved contract rents and utility allowances; and(8) The deadline for the submission of the Borrower's request for a firmcommitment for direct loan financing.(b) <T3>Issuance of firm commitment. </T3>A firm commitment will include thefollowing:(1) Approval of the final plans and specifications;(2) A statement that the contractor/Borrower's cost estimates have beenreviewed;(3) Reaffirmation of the conclusions reached during conditional commitmentprocessing or a statement describing the approved changes to earlier conclusions;(4) The interest rate used in the processing of the request.If the Borrower was permitted to apply for a firm commitment without goingthrough conditional commitment processing, the items listed in paragraph(a) of this section shall be included in the issuance of the firm commitmentfor direct loan financing. Issuance of a firm commitment evidences HUD'sapproval of the request for direct loan financing, and sets forth the termsand conditions upon which the loan shall be made and the loan proceedsdisbursed.(c) <T3>Cancellation. </T3>If a request for Borrower eligibility or a requestfor conditional or firm commitment for direct loan financing is not submittedwithin the time periods specified in the notice of section 202 fund reservationor in the conditional commitment (as appropriate), HUD may cancel the fundreservation under andSection; 885.770.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.807</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Operating cost standard.</ITAG>At least annually, HUD shall establish operating cost standards based onthe average annual operating cost of comparable housing for handicappedfamilies in each field office. The operating cost standards shall be developedfor group homes based on the number of residents, and for independent livingcomplexes based on the number of units. HUD may adjust the operating coststandard applicable to an approved project to reflect such factors as differencesin costs based on location within the field office jurisdiction. The operatingcost standard will be used to determine the amount of the project assistancereserved for a project under andSection; 885.755(a)(3) and to review theresonableness of operating costs for the establishment of initial contractrents at the time of issuance of the conditional commitment under andSection;885.800(a).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.810</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amount and terms of financing.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Amount of financing. </T3>The amount of financing approved shall bethe amount stated in the notice of fund reservation, including any increaseapproved by HUD before the final closing of a loan. The amount of financingmay not exceed the smallest of the amounts provided in paragraphs (b) through(e) of this section.(b) <T3>Estimated development cost. </T3>The amount of the loan may not exceedthe total estimated development cost of the project (as determined by HUD),less the incremental development cost and capitalized operating costs associatedwith excess amenities and design features to be paid for by the Sponsorunder andSection; 885.725(d)(1).(c) <T3>Development cost limit. </T3>(1) For independent living complexes,the total development cost of the property or project attributable to dwellinguse (less the incremental development cost and capitalized operating costsdescribed in paragraph (b) of this section may not exceed:(i) For independent living complexes without elevators:(A) $28,032 per family unit without a bedroom;(B) $32,321 per family unit with one bedroom;(C) $38,979 per family unit with two bedrooms;(D) $49,893 per family unit with three bedrooms;(E) $55,583 per family unit with four or more bedrooms.(ii) For independent living complexes with elevators:(A) $29,500 per family unit without a bedroom;(B) $33,816 per family unit with one bedroom;(C) $41,120 per family unit with two bedrooms;(D) $53,195 per family unit with three bedrooms;(E) $58,392 per family unit with four or more bedrooms.(2) For group homes, the total development cost of the project (less theincremental development cost and capitalized operating costs describedin paragraph (b) of this section may not exceed the cost limit for theproject. HUD will periodically establish cost limits for various sizesof group homes by publishing a notice of the cost limits in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The cost limits will reflect those costs reasonableand necessary to develop a project of modest design that complies withHUD minimum property standards; the minimum group home requirements ofandSection; 885.717(b); the accessibility requirements of andSection; 885.717(c);cost containment and modest design standards of andSection; 885.725 and otherdesign requirements applicable to group homes under this part. HUD willprovide factors for adjusting the group home standard to reflect such factorsas the design requirements of the specific handicapped population to beserved and State and local requirements. To develop the cost limit forgroup homes, HUD will use commercially available construction cost indicesand construction cost data for recently completed comparable group homes.(3) Increased mortgage limits.(i) The Assistant Secretary may increase the cost limits set forth in paragraphs(c) (1) and (2) of this section by up to 110 percent in any geographicarea where the cost levels require, and may increase the cost limits byup to 140 percent on a project-by-project basis.(ii) If the Assistant Secretary finds that high construction costs in Alaska,Guam or Hawaii make it infeasible to construct dwellings, without the sacrificeof sound standards of construction, design, and livability, within thecost limits provided in this paragraph (c), the principal amount of mortgagesmay be increased to compensate for such costs. The increase may not exceedthe limitations established under this section (including any high costarea adjustment) by more than 50 percent.(d) <T3>Rehabilitation projects_additional limits. </T3>A loan that involvesa project to be rehabilitated is subject to the following additional limitations:(1) Property held in fee. If the Sponsor is the fee simple owner of a propertyunencumbered by a mortgage, the maximum loan amount may not exceed 100percent of the cost of the proposed rehabilitation.(2) Property subject to existing mortgage. If the Sponsor owns the propertysubject to an outstanding indebtedness that is to be refinanced with partof the section 202 loan, the maximum loan amount may not exceed the costof rehabilitation plus the portion of the outstanding indebtedness thatdoes not exceed the fair market value of the land and improvements beforethe rehabilitation, as determined by HUD.(3) Property to be acquired. If the property is to be acquired by the Borrowerfrom an entity other than the Sponsor, and the purchase price is to befinanced with a part of the section 202 loan, the maximum loan amount maynot exceed the cost of the rehabilitation plus the portion of the purchaseprice that does not exceed the fair market value of such land and improvementsbefore the rehabilitation, as determined by HUD.(e) <T3>Leaseholds. </T3>If a loan is secured by a leasehold estate ratherthan by a fee simple estate, the amount of the loan attributable to thecost of the property may not exceed the value of the leasehold estate.(f) <T3>Loan interest rate.</T3> The loan is made on the date of the initialloan closing under andSection; 885.815. Loans shall bear interest at a ratedetermined by HUD in accordance with this section.(1) Annual interest rate. Except as provided under paragraph (f)(2) ofthis section, loans shall bear interest at the rate in effect at the timethe loan is made. The loan interest rate shall not exceed:(i) The average yield on the most recently issued 30-year marketable obligationsof the United States during the three-month period immediately precedingthe fiscal year in which the loan is made (adjusted to the nearest one-eighthof one percent), plus an allowance to cover administrative costs and probablelosses under the program; and(ii) Any applicable statutory ceiling on the loan interest rate includingthe allowance to cover administrative costs and probable losses.(2) Optional interest rate. The Borrower may elect an optional loan interestrate. To elect the optional rate, the Borrower must request that HUD determinethe loan interest rate at the time of the Borrower's request for conditionalor firm commitment for direct loan financing under andSection; 885.800.(i) If the Borrower elects the optional loan interest rate, the loan interestrate shall not exceed:(A) The average yield on the most recently issued 30-year marketable obligationsof the United States during the three-month period immediately precedingthe fiscal year in which the request for commitment is submitted (adjustedto the nearest one-eighth of one percent), plus an allowance to cover administrativecosts and probable losses under the program;(B) The average yield on the most recently issued 30-year marketable obligationsof the United States during the one-month period immediately precedingthe month in which the request for commitment is submitted (adjusted tothe nearest one-eighth of one percent), plus an allowance to cover theadministrative costs and probable losses under the program; and(C) Any applicable statutory ceiling on the loan interest rate includingan allowance to cover administrative costs and probable losses under theprogram.(ii) The date of submission of a request for conditional or firm commitmentis the date that the Borrower submits the complete and acceptable requestto HUD under andSection; 885.800. The date of the submission of a requestfor commitment will not be affected by any subsequent resubmission of therequest by the Borrower or by any reprocessing of the request by HUD.(iii) The Borrower may withdraw its election of the optional interest rateat any time before initial loan closing. If the Borrower elected the optionalinterest rate with its request for conditional commitment and withdrawsits election, the loan will bear interest at the rate determined underparagraph (f)(1) of this section, unless the Borrower elects an optionalinterest rate with its request for firm commitment. If the Borrower withdrawsits election after the date of submission of its request for firm commitment,the loan will bear interest at the rate determined under paragraph (f)(1)of this section.(iv) If initial loan closing has not occurred within 18 months after theNotice of Section 202 Fund Reservation is issued, the Borrower's electionof the optional rate will be cancelled and the loan will bear interestat the rate determined under paragraph (f)(1) of this section.(3) Allowance for administrative costs and probable losses. For the purposeof computing the loan interest rate under paragraphs (f) (1) and (2) ofthis section, the allowance to cover administrative costs and probablelosses under the program is one-fourth of one percent (.25%) per annumfor both the construction and permanent loan periods.(g) <T3>Announcement of interest rates.</T3> (1) HUD will annually announcethe loan interest rate determination under paragraph (f)(1) of this sectionby publishing notice of the rate in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>. The <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice will include a statement explaining thebasis for the interest rate determination.(2) Upon the Borrower's request, HUD will provide available current informationconcerning the determination of the interest rate under paragraph (f)(2)of this section.(h) <T3>Security for loan.</T3> The loan will be secured by a first mortgageon real estate in fee simple or a long-term leasehold. The mortgage willbe repayable during a term not to exceed 40 years and will be subject tosuch terms and conditions as HUD may prescribe.(i) <T3>Minimum capital investment.</T3> Borrowers must provide a minimum capitalinvestment of one-half of one percent (0.5%) of the mortgage amount committedto be disbursed, not to exceed $10,000. Loans made under section 106 ofthe Housing Act of 1968 may not be used to meet the minimum capital investmentrequirement. The minimum capital investment will be placed in escrow atthe initial closing of the section 202 loan and will be held by HUD orby a HUD-approved escrow agent. HUD or the escrow agent will hold escrowedfunds for not less than three years following the date of initial occupancy.The escrow account may be used for operating expenses or deficits as maybe directed by HUD. Any unexpended balance remaining in the minimum capitalinvestment account at the end of the escrow period will be returned tothe Borrower.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.812</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prepayment of loans</ITAG>(a) <T3>Prepayment prohibition.</T3> the prepayment (whether in whole or inpart) or the assignment or transfer of physical and financial assets ofany section 202 project is prohibited, unless the Assistant Secretary givesprior written approval.(b) <T3>HUD-approved prepayment.</T3> Approval for prepayment or transfer willnot be granted unless HUD determines that the prepayment or transfer ofthe loan is a part of a transaction that will ensure the continued operationof the project until the original maturity date of the loan in a mannerthat will provide rental housing for the handicapped families on termsat least as advantageous to existing and future tenants as the terms requiredby the original section 202 loan agreement and any other loan agreementsentered into under other provisions of law.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.815</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements prior to initial loan closing.</ITAG>Before the initial loan closing, the Borrower must furnish such executeddocuments in such form as HUD may require, including the following:(a) Agreement to enter into a project assistance contract.(b) Certificate of incorporation of the Borrower as required by applicableState or local law.(c) Internal Revenue Service Section 501(c)(3) or (4) tax exemption ruling.(d) Certification of relationships and nonprofit motives of the Borrower.(e) Attorney's opinion as to the legal status of the Borrower, buildingpermit, and compliance with zoning laws and requirements.(f) Regulatory agreement for nonprofit section 202 Borrowers.(g) Borrower's oath that the project will not be used for hotel or transientpurposes.(h) Agreement and certification to certify actual costs and as to any financialand family relationships between the Borrower, the architect, general contractorand subcontractors.(i) Assurance of compliance with nondiscrimination and equal opportunityrequirements (see andSection;885.740(a)).(j) Note and first mortgage or deed of trust.(k) A title policy insuring that the mortgage constitutes a first lienon the project.(l) Building loan agreement setting forth the conditions for loan disbursement.(m) Construction, moderate rehabilitation or substantial rehabilitationcontract between the Borrower and the general contractor (see andSection;885.816for contract award requirements).(n) Assurance of completion of construction, moderate rehabilitation orsubstantial rehabilitation contract in the form of corporate surety bondsfor payment and performance, each in the amount of 100 percent of the amountof the HUD-estimated construction or rehabilitation cost, or a cash escrowin the amount of 25 percent of the HUD-estimated construction or rehabilitationcost. The corporate surety bond must be issued by a surety company thatis satisfactory to HUD.(o) Escrow agreement in the amount of the cost of any off-site facilitiesfunded by a cash deposit or letter of credit to assure completion of thefacilities.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.816</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Requirements for awarding construction contracts.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Construction contract award.</T3> Awards shall be made only to responsiblecontractors that possess the potential ability to perform successfullyunder the terms and conditions of a proposed construction contract. Considerationshall be given to such matters as contractor integrity, compliance withpublic policy, record of past performance, and financial and technicalresources.(b) <T3>Negotiated noncompetitive construction contracts.</T3> Competitivelybid contracts are not required. Negotiated noncompetitive contracts mustbe cost-reimbursement contracts with a ceiling price, and may provide anincentive payment to the contractor for early completion.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.820</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Loan disbursement procedures.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> Disbursements of loan proceeds shall be made directlyby HUD to or for the account of the Borrower and may be made through anapproved lender, mortgage servicer, title insurance company, or other agentsatisfactory to the Borrower and HUD.(b) <T3>Timing and amount of disbursement.</T3> Disbursements to the Borrowerwill be made on a periodic basis, and in amounts not to exceed the HUD-approvedcost of the portions of construction or rehabilitation work complete andin place (except as modified in paragraph (d) of this section), minus theappropriate holdback, as determined by HUD.(c) <T3>Content of disbursement requisition.</T3> Requisitions for loan disbursementsmust be submitted by the Borrower on forms prescribed by HUD and must beaccompanied by such additional information as HUD may require in orderto approve loan disbursements under this part, including but not limitedto evidence of compliance with the labor standards described at andSection;885.740(d),Department of Labor regulations, all zoning, building and other governmentalrequirements, and such evidence of continued priority of the Borrower'smortgage as HUD may prescribe.(d) <T3>Disbursements for building components stored off-site.</T3> In loandisbursements for building components stored off-site, the term ``buildingcomponent'' will mean any manufactured or pre-assembled part of a structureas defined by HUD and which HUD has designated for off-site storage becauseit is of such size or weight that storage of the components required fortimely construction progress at the construction site is impracticable,or because weather damage or other adverse conditions prevailing at theconstruction site would make storage at the site impracticable or undulycostly. Each building component must be specifically identified for incorporationinto the property as provided under paragraph (d)(1)(ii) of this section.(1) <T3>Storage.</T3> (i) A loan disbursement may be made for up to 90 percentof the invoice value (to exclude cost of transportation and storage) ofthe building components stored off-site if the components are stored ata location approved by HUD.(ii) Each building component shall be adequately marked to be readily identifiablein the inventory of the off-site location. It shall be kept together withall other building components of the same manufacturer intended for usein the same project for which loan disbursements have been made and separateand apart from similar units not for use in the project.(iii) Storage costs, if any, shall be borne by the general contractor.(2) <T3>Responsibility for transportation, storage and insurance of off-sitebuilding components.</T3> The general contractor of the project shall havethe responsibility for (i) insuring the components in the name of the Borrowerwhile in transit and storage; and (ii) delivering or contracting for thedelivery of the components to the storage area and to the constructionsite, including the payment of freight.(3) <T3>Loan disbursements.</T3> (i) Before a loan disbursement for a buildingcomponent stored off-site is made, the Borrower shall:(A) Obtain a bill of sale for the component;(B) Provide HUD with a security agreement pledged by a first lien on thebuilding components with the exception of such other liens or encumbrancesas may be approved by HUD; and(C) File a financing statement in accordance with the Uniform CommercialCode.(ii) Before each loan disbursement for building components stored off-siteis made, the manufacturer and the general contractor shall certify to HUDthat the components, in their intended use, comply with HUD-approved contractplan and specifications.(iii) Loan disbursements may be made only for components stored off-sitein a quantity required to permit the uninterrupted installation on thesite.(iv) The outstanding amount of advances for building components storedoff-site may not exceed 50 percent of the total estimated constructioncost for the project as specified in the construction contract.(v) Payments for building components stored off-site will not be approvedunless the contractor has a corporate surety bond for payment and performanceeach in the amount of 100 percent of the amount of the construction contract.(vi) No single loan disbursement shall be made in an amount less than $10,000.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.825</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Completion of cost certification.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Requisition for final disbursement.</T3> The Borrower must satisfythe requirements for completion of construction, substantial rehabilitation,or acquisition with or without moderate rehabilitation and receive allrequired approvals from HUD before submitting a final requisition for disbursementof loan proceeds.(b) <T3>Cost certification.</T3> The Borrower shall submit to the field officeall documentation required for final disbursement of the loan includingthe following cost certifications.(1) If the construction contract was a cost-reimbursement contract witha ceiling price:(i) The Borrower must certify, on a form prescribed by HUD, as to the actualcost to the Borrower of the construction contract, architectural, legal,organizational, off-site costs, and all other items of eligible expense;and(ii) The general contractor (and such subcontractors, material suppliers,and equipment lessors as HUD may require) must certify, on a form prescribedby HUD, as to the actual cost paid for labor, materials, and subcontractwork under the general contract.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The certificate shall not include as actual costs any kickbacks, rebates,trade discounts, or other similar payments to the Borrower or to any ofits officers, directors, or members. For projects with a mortgage of $750,000or more, the certifications shall be verified by an independent publicaccountant acceptable to the field office.(2) If the construction contract required the contractor to furnish alllabor, materials, equipment, and services required to construct and completethe project for a specified and firm price, the Borrower will be requiredto submit a simplified short-form cost certification on a form prescribedby HUD. For projects with a mortgage of $750,000 or more, the certificationsshall be verified by an independent public accountant acceptable to thefield office.(c) <T3>Reduction of loan amount and contract rents.</T3> If the certifiedcosts provided under paragraph (b) of this section and approved by HUDare less than the loan amount established under andSection;885.805, the loanamount and the contract rents will be reduced accordingly.(d) <T3>Recovery of overpayment.</T3> If the contract rents are reduced underparagraph (c) of this section, the maximum annual commitment under thePAC will be reduced. If contract rents are reduced based on cost certificationsmade after PAC execution, any overpayment after the effective date of thecontract will be recovered from the Borrower by HUD.<ITAG tagnum="84">Project Assistance Contract</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.900</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Project assistance contract.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Project assistance contract (PAC).</T3> The PAC sets forth rights andduties of the Borrower and HUD with respect to the project and the projectassistance payments.(b) <T3>PAC execution.</T3> (1) Upon satisfactory completion of the project,the Borrower and HUD shall execute the PAC on the form prescribed by HUD.(2) The effective date of the PAC may be earlier than the date of execution,but no earlier than the date of HUD's issuance of the permission to occupy.(3) If the project is completed in stages, the procedures of this paragraph(b) shall apply to each stage.(c) <T3>Project assistance payments to owners under the PAC. </T3>The projectassistance payments made under the PAC are:(1) Payments to the Borrower to assist eligible families leasing assistedunits. The amount of the project assistance payment made to the Borrowerfor an assisted unit (or residential space in a group home) that is leasedto an eligible family is equal to the difference between the contract rentfor the unit (or pro rata share of the contract rent in a group home) andthe tenant rent payable by the family.(2) Payments to the Borrower for vacant assisted units (``vacancy payments'').The amount of and conditions for vacancy payments are described in andSection;885.985.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The project assistance payments are made monthly by HUD upon properrequisition by the Borrower, except payments for vacancies of more than60 days, which are made semiannually by HUD upon requisition by the Borrower.(d) <T3>Payment of utility reimbursement. </T3>Where applicable, a utilityreimbursement will be paid to a family occupying an assisted unit in anindependent living complex as an additional project assistance payment.The PAC will provide that the Borrower will make this payment on behalfof HUD. Funds will be paid to the Borrower in trust solely for the purposeof making the additional payment. The Borrower may pay the utility reimbursementjointly to the family and the utility company, or, if the family and utilitycompany consent, directly to the utility company.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.905</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Term of PAC.</ITAG>The term of the PAC shall be 20 years. If the project is completed in stages,the term of the PAC for each stage shall be 20 years. The term of the PACfor stages of a project shall not exceed 22 years.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.910</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Maximum annual commitment and project account.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Maximum annual commitment. </T3>The maximum annual amount that maybe committed under the PAC is the total of the initial contract rents andutility allowances for all assisted units in the project.(b) <T3>Project account. </T3>(1) HUD will establish and maintain a specificallyidentified and segregated project account for each project. The projectaccount will be established out of the amounts by which the maximum annualcommitment exceeds the amount actually paid out under the PAC each year.HUD will make payments from this account for project assistance paymentsas needed to cover increases in contract rents or decreases in tenant incomeand other payments for cost specifically approved by the Secretary.(2) If the HUD-approved estimate of required annual payments under thePAC for a fiscal year exceeds the maximum annual commitment for that fiscalyear plus the current balance in the project account, HUD will, withina reasonable time, take such steps authorized by section 202(h)(4)(A) ofthe Housing Act of 1959, as may be necessary, to assure that payments underthe PAC will be adequate to cover increases in contract rents and decreasesin tenant income.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.915</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Leasing to eligible families.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Availability of assisted units for occupancy by eligible families.</T3>During the term of the PAC, a Borrower shall make all units (or residentialspaces in a group home) available for eligible families. For purposes ofthis section, making units or residential spaces available for occupancyby eligible families means that the Borrower (1) is conducting marketingin accordance with andSection; 885.940(a); (2) has leased or is making goodfaith efforts to lease the units or residential spaces to eligible andotherwise acceptable families, including taking all feasible actions tofill vacancies by renting to such families; and (3) has not rejected anysuch applicant family except for reasons acceptable to HUD. If the Borroweris temporarily unable to lease all units or residential spaces to eligiblefamilies, one or more units or residential spaces may, with the prior approvalof HUD, be leased to otherwise eligible families that do not meet the incomerequirements of Part 813, as modified by andSection; 885.5. Failure on thepart of the Borrower to comply with these requirements is a violation ofthe PAC and grounds for all available legal remedies, including an actionfor specific performance of the PAC, suspension or debarment from HUD programs,and reduction of the number of units (or in the case of group homes, reductionof the number of residential spaces) under the PAC as set forth in paragraph(b) of this section.(b) <T3>Reduction of number of units covered by the PAC. </T3>HUD may reducethe number of units (or in the case of group homes, the number of residentialspaces) covered by the PAC to the number of units or residential spacesavailable for occupancy by eligible families if:(1) The Borrower fails to comply with the requirements of paragraph (a)of this section; or(2) Notwithstanding any prior approval by HUD, HUD determines that theinability to lease units or residential spaces to eligible families isnot a temporary problem. (c) <T3>Restoration. </T3>HUD will agree to an amendment of the PAC to providefor subsequent restoration of any reduction made under paragraph (b) ofthis section if: (1) HUD determines that the restoration is justified by demand; (2) The Borrower otherwise has a record of compliance with the Borrower'sobligations under the PAC; and (3) Contract and budget authority is available. (d) <T3>Occupancy by families that are not handicapped. </T3>HUD may relievethe Borrower of the requirement that all units in the project (or residentialspaces in a group home) must be leased to handicapped families if: (1)The Borrower has made reasonable efforts to lease to eligible families;(2) the Borrower has been granted HUD approval under paragraph (a) of thissection; and (3) the Borrower is temporarily unable to achieve or maintaina level of occupancy sufficient to prevent financial default and foreclosureunder the section 202 loan documents. HUD approval under this paragraphwill be of limited duration. HUD may impose terms and conditions to thisapproval that are consistent with program objectives and necessary to protectits interest in the section 202 loan. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.920</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">PAC administration. </ITAG>HUD is responsible for the administration of the PAC. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.925</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Default by Borrower. </ITAG>(a) <T3>PAC provisions. </T3>The PAC will provide: (1) That if HUD determines that the Borrower is in default under the PAC,HUD will notify the Borrower of the actions required to be taken to curethe default and of the remedies to be applied by HUD including an actionfor specific performance under the PAC, reduction or suspension of projectassistance payment and recovery of overpayments, where appropriate; and(2) That if the Borrower fails to cure the default, HUD has the right toterminate the PAC or to take other corrective action. (b) <T3>Loan provisions. </T3>Additional provisions governing default underthe section 202 loan are included in the regulatory agreement and otherloan documents described in andSection; 885.215. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.930</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice upon PAC expiration. </ITAG>The PAC will provide that the Borrower will, at least 90 days before theend of the PAC contract term, notify each family occupying an assistedunit (or residential space in a group home) of any increase in the amountthe family will be required to pay as rent as a result of the expiration.The notice of expiration will contain such information and will be servedin such manner as HUD may prescribe. <ITAG tagnum="84">Project Management </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.940</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Responsibilities of Borrower. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Marketing. </T3>(1) The Borrower must commence and continue diligentmarketing activities not later than 90 days before the anticipated dateof availability for occupancy of the group home or the anticipated dateof availability of the first unit in an independent living complex. Marketactivities shall include the provision of notices of the availability ofhousing under the program to operators of temporary housing for the homelessin the same housing market. (2) Marketing must be done in accordance with the HUD-approved affirmativefair housing marketing plan and all fair housing and equal opportunityrequirements. The purpose of the plan and requirements is to achieve acondition in which eligible families of similar income levels in the samehousing market have a like range of housing choices available to them regardlessof their race, color, creed, religion, sex or national origin. (3) At the time of PAC execution, the Borrower must submit to HUD a listof leased and unleased assisted units (or in the case of a group home,leased and unleased residential spaces) with a justification for the unleasedunits or residential spaces, in order to qualify for vacancy payments forthe unleased units or residential spaces. (b) <T3>Management and maintenance. </T3>The Borrower is responsible for allmanagement functions. These functions include selection and admission oftenants, required reexaminations of incomes for families occupying assistedunits or residential spaces, collection of rents, termination of tenancyand eviction, and all repair and maintenance functions (including ordinaryand extraordinary maintenance and replacement of capital items). All functionsmust be performed in compliance with equal opportunity requirements. (c) <T3>Contracting for services. </T3>(1) With HUD approval, the Borrowermay contract with a private or public entity for performance of the servicesor duties required in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this section. However,such an arrangement does not relieve the Borrower of responsibility forthese services and duties. All such contracts are subject to the restrictionsgoverning prohibited contractual relationship described in andSection; 885.735(These prohibitions do not extend to management contracts entered intoby the Borrower with the Sponsor or its non-profit affiliate). (2) Consistent with the objectives of Executive Orders 11625, 12432 and12138, the Borrower will promote awareness and participation of minorityand women's business enterprises in contracting and procurement activities.(d) <T3>Submission of financial and operating statements. </T3>The Borrowermust submit to HUD: (1) Within 60 days after the end of each fiscal year of project operations,financial statements for the project audited by an independent public accountantand in the form required by HUD, and (2) Other statements regarding project operation, financial conditionsand occupancy as HUD may require to administer the PAC and to monitor projectoperations. (e) <T3>Use of project funds. </T3>The Borrower shall maintain a project fundaccount in a HUD-approved depository and shall deposit all rents, charges,income and revenues arising from project operation or ownership to thisaccount. Project funds must be used for the operation of the project (includingrequired insurance coverage), to make required principal and interest paymentson the section 202 loan, and to make required deposits to the replacementreserve under andSection; 885.945, in accordance with HUD-approved budget.Any remaining project funds account following the expiration of the fiscalyear shall be deposited in an interest-bearing residual receipts account.Withdrawals from this account may be made only for project purposes andwith the approval of HUD. (f) <T3>Reports. </T3>The Borrower shall submit such reports as HUD may prescribeto demonstrate compliance with applicable civil rights and equal opportunityrequirements. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.945 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Replacement reserve. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Establishment of reserve. </T3>The Borrower shall establish and maintaina replacement reserve to aid in funding extraordinary maintenance, andrepair and replacement of capital items. (b) <T3>Deposits to reserve. </T3>The Borrower shall make monthly depositsto the replacement reserve. The amount of the deposits for the initialyear of operation shall be an amount equal to 0.6 percent of the cost ofthe total structures (for new construction projects), 0.4 percent of thecost of the initial mortgage amount (for all other projects), or such higherrate as required by HUD. For the purposes of this section, total structuresinclude main buildings, accessory buildings, garages and other buildings.The amount of the deposits will be adjusted each year by the amount ofthe annual adjustment factor as described in Part 888 of this chapter.(c) <T3>Level of reserve. </T3>The reserve must be built up to and maintainedat a level determined by HUD to be sufficient to meet projected requirements.Should the reserve reach that level, the amount of the deposit to the reservemay be reduced with the approval of HUD. (d) <T3>Administration of reserve. </T3>Replacement reserve funds must be depositedwith HUD or in a HUD-approved depository in an interest-bearing account.All earnings including interest on the reserve must be added to the reserve.Funds may be drawn from the reserve and used only in accordance with HUDguidelines and with the approval of, or as directed by, HUD. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;885.950 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Selection and admission of tenants. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Application for admission. </T3>The Borrower must accept applicationsfor admission to the project in the form prescribed by HUD. Applicant familiesapplying for assisted units (or residential spaces in a group home) mustcomplete a certification of eligibility as part of the application foradmission. Both the Borrower and the applicant family must complete andsign the application for admission. On request, the Borrower must furnishcopies of all applications for admission to HUD. (b) <T3>Determination of eligibility and selection of tenants. </T3>The Borroweris responsible for determining whether applicants are eligible for admissionand for the selection of families. To be eligible for admission, an applicantfamily must be a handicapped family as defined in andSection;885.5, mustmeet any project occupancy requirements approved by HUD under andSection;885.755(a)(1),and must be a lower income family as defined in andSection;813.102, as modifiedunder andSection;885.5. Under certain circumstances, HUD may permit the leasingof units (or residential space in a group home) to ineligible familiesunder andSection;885.915. (1) Local residency requirements are prohibited. Local residency preferencesmay be applied in selecting tenants only to the extent that they are notinconsistent with affirmative fair housing marketing objectives and theBorrower's HUD-approved affirmative fair housing marketing plan. Preferencesmay not be based on the length of time the applicant has resided in thejurisdiction. With respect to any residency preference, persons expectedto reside in the community as a result of current or planned employmentwill be treated as residents. (2) If the Borrower determines that the family is eligible and is otherwiseacceptable and units (or residential spaces in a group home) are available,the Borrower will assign the family a unit or residential space in a grouphome. If the family will occupy an assisted unit the Borrower will assignthe family a unit of the appropriate size in accordance with HUD standards.If no suitable unit (or residential space in a group home) is available,the Borrower will place the family on a waiting list for the project andnotify the family when a suitable unit or residential space may becomeavailable. If the waiting list is so long that the applicant would notbe likely to be admitted for the next 12 months, the Borrower may advisethe applicant that no additional applications for admission are being consideredfor that reason. (3) If the Borrower determines that an applicant is ineligible for admissionor the Borrower is not selecting the applicant for other reasons, the Borrowerwill promptly notify the applicant in writing of the determination, thereasons for the determination, and that the applicant has a right to requesta meeting to review the rejection, in accordance with HUD requirements.The review, if requested, may not be conducted by a member of the Borrower'sstaff who made the initial decision to reject the applicant. The applicantmay also exercise other rights if the applicant believes the applicantis being discriminated against on the basis of race, color, creed, religion,sex, handicap or national origin. (4) Records on applicants and approved eligible families, which provideracial, ethnic, gender and place of previous residency data required byHUD, must be maintained and retained for three years.   (c) <T3>Reexamination of family income and composition</T3>_(1) <T3>Regular reexaminations. </T3>If the family occupies an assisted unit(or residential space in a group home), the Borrower must reexamine theincome and composition of the family at least every 12 months. Upon verificationof the information, the Borrower shall make appropriate adjustments inthe total tenant payment in accordance with Part 813, as modified by andSection;885.5 and determine whether the family's unit size is still appropriate.The Borrower must adjust tenant rent and the project assistance paymentand must carry out any unit transfer in accordance with HUD standards.(2) <T3>Interim reexaminations. </T3>If the family occupies an assisted unit(or residential space in a group home) the family must comply with provisionsin the lease regarding interim reporting of changes in income. If the Borrowerreceives information concerning a change in the family's income or othercircumstances between regularly scheduled reexaminations, the Borrowermust consult with the family and make any adjustments determined to beappropriate. Any change in the family's income or other circumstances thatresults in an adjustment in the total tenant payment, tenant rent and projectassistance payment must be verified.(3) <T3>Continuation of project assistance payment. </T3>(i) A family occupyingan assisted unit (or residential space in a group home) shall remain eligiblefor project assistance payment until the total tenant payment equals orexceeds the gross rent (or a pro rata share of the gross rent in a grouphome). The termination of subsidy eligibility will not affect the family'sother rights under its lease. Project assistance payment may be resumedif, as a result of changes in income, rent or other relevant circumstancesduring the term of the PAC, the family meets the income eligibility requirementsof Part 813 (as modified in andSection; 885.5) and project assistance isavailable for the unit or residential space under the terms of the PAC.The family will not be required to establish its eligibility for admissionto the project under the remaining requirements of paragraph (b) of thissection.(ii) A family's eligibility for project assistance payment also may beterminated in accordance with HUD requirements for such reasons as failureto submit requested verification information.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.955</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Obligations of the family.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Requirements. </T3>The family shall:(1) Pay amounts due under the lease directly to the Borrower.(2) Supply such certification, release, information or documentation asthe Borrower or HUD determines to be necessary. (For families occupyingassisted units (or residential spaces in a group home), this will includesubmissions required for an annual or interim reexamination of family incomeand composition.)(3) Allow the Borrower to inspect the dwelling unit or residential spaceat reasonable times and after reasonable notice.(4) Notify the Borrower before vacating the dwelling unit or residentialspace.(5) Use the dwelling unit or residential space solely for residence bythe family, and as the family's principal place of residence.(b) <T3>Prohibitions. </T3>The family shall not:(1) Assign the lease or transfer the unit or residential space.(2) Occupy, or receive assistance for the occupancy of, a unit or residentialspace governed under this part while occupying, or receiving assistancefor occupancy of, another unit assisted under any Federal housing assistanceprogram, including any section 8 program.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.960</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Overcrowded and underoccupied units.</ITAG>If the Borrower determines that because of change in family size, an assistedunit is smaller than appropriate for the eligible family to which it isleased, or that the assisted unit is larger than appropriate, project assistancepayment with respect to the unit will not be reduced or terminated untilthe eligible family has been relocated to an appropriate altenate unit.If possible, the Borrower will, as promptly as possible, offer the familyan appropriate alternate unit. The Borrower may receive vacancy paymentsfor the vacated unit if the Borrower complies with the requirements ofandSection; 885.985.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.965</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Lease requirements.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Term of lease. </T3>The term of the lease may not be less than oneyear. Unless the lease has been terminated by appropriate action, uponexpiration of the lease term, the family and Borrower may execute a newlease for a term not less than one year, or may take no action. If no actionis taken, the lease will automatically be renewed for successive termsof one month.(b) <T3>Termination by the family. </T3>All leases may contain a provisionthat permits the family to terminate the lease upon 30 days advance notice.A lease for a term that exceeds one year must contain such provision.(c) <T3>Form. </T3>The form of lease must contain all required provisions,and none of the prohibited provisions specified in HUD handbooks. In additionto required provisions in the handbook governing the Borrower's entry ontothe leased premises during tenancy, the Borrower may include a provisionin the lease permitting the Borrower to enter the leased premises, at anytime, without advance notice where there is reasonable cause to believethat an emergency exists or that health or safety of a family member isendangered.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.970</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Termination of tenancy and modification of lease.</ITAG>The provisions of Part 247 of this title apply to all decisions by a Borrowerto terminate the tenancy or modify the lease of a family residing in aunit (or residential space in a group home).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.972</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Security deposits.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Collection of security deposit. </T3>At the time of the initial executionof the lease, the Borrower: (1) Will require each family occupying an assistedunit (or residential space in a group home) to pay a security deposit inan amount equal to one month's total tenant payment or $50, whichever isgreater; and (2) may require each family occupying an unassisted unit (orresidential space in a group home) to pay a security deposit equal to onemonth's rent payable by the family. The family is expected to pay the securitydeposit from its own resources and other available public or private resources.The Borrower may collect the security deposit on an installment basis.(b) <T3>Security deposit provisions applicable to assisted and unassisted units.</T3>_(1)<T3>Administration of security deposit. </T3>The Borrower must place thesecurity deposits in a segregated interest-bearing account. The Borrowershall maintain a record of the amount in this account that is attributableto each family in residence in the project. Annually for all families,and when computing the amount available for disbursement under paragraph(b)(3) of this section, the Borrower shall allocate to the family's balance,the interest accrued on the balance during the year. Unless prohibitedby State or local law, the Borrower may deduct for the family, from theaccrued interest for the year, the administrative cost of computing theallocation to the family's balance. The amount of the administrative costadjustment shall not exceed the accrued interest allocated to the family'sbalance for the year. The amount of the segregated, interest-bearing accountmaintained by the Borrower must at all times equal the total amount collectedfrom the families then in occupancy plus any accrued interest and lessallowable administrative cost adjustments. The Borrower must comply withany applicable State and local laws concerning interest payments on securitydeposits.(2) <T3>Family notification requirement. </T3>In order to be considered forthe refund of the security deposit, a family must provide the Borrowerwith a forwarding address or arrange to pick up the refund.(3) <T3>Use of security deposit. </T3>The Borrower, subject to State and locallaw and the requirements of this paragraph, may use the family's securitydeposit balance as reimbursement for any unpaid family contribution orother amount which the family owes under the lease. Within 30 days (orshorter time if required by State or local law) after receiving notificationunder paragraph (b)(2) of this section the Borrower must:(i) Refund to a family owing no rent or other amount under the lease thefull amount of the family's security deposit balance;(ii) Provide to a family owing rent or other amount under the lease a listitemizing any unpaid rent, damages to the unit, and estimated costs forrepair, along with a statement of the family's rights under State and locallaw. If the amount which the Borrower claims is owed by the family is lessthan the amount of the family's security deposit balance, the Borrowermust refund the excess balance to the family. If the Borrower fails toprovide the list, the family will be entitled to the refund of the fullamount of the family's security deposit balance.(4) <T3>Disagreements. </T3>If a disagreement arises concerning reimbursementof the security deposit, the family will have the right to present objectionsto the Borrower in an informal meeting. The Borrower must keep a recordof any disagreements and meetings in a tenant file for inspection by HUD.The procedures of this paragraph do not preclude the family from exercisingits rights under State or local law.(5) <T3>Decedent's interest in security deposit. </T3>Upon the death of a memberof a family, the decedent's interest, if any, in the security deposit willbe governed by State or local law.(c) <T3>Reimbursement by HUD for assisted units. </T3>If the family's securitydeposit balance is insufficient to reimburse the Borrower for any unpaidtenant rent or other amount which the family owes under the lease for anassisted unit or residential space and the Borrower has provided the familywith the list required by paragraph (b)(3)(ii) of this section, the Borrowermay claim reimbursement from HUD for an amount not to exceed the lesserof:(1) The amount owed the Borrower, or(2) One month's contract rent, minus the amount of the family's securitydeposit balance. Any reimbursement under this section will be applied firsttoward any unpaid tenant rent due under the lease. No reimbursement maybe claimed for unpaid rent for the period after termination of the tenancy.The Borrower may be eligible for vacancy payments following a vacancy inaccordance with the requirements of andSection; 885.985.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.975</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Adjustment of rents.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Contract rents. </T3>HUD will calculate contract rent adjustments basedon the sum of the project's operating costs and debt service (as calculatedby HUD), with adjustments for vacancies, the project's non-rental income,and other factors that HUD deems appropriate. The calculation will be madeon the basis of information provided by the Borrower on a form prescribedby HUD.(b) <T3>Rent for unassisted units. </T3>The rent payable by families occupyingunits or residential spaces that are not assisted under the PAC shall beequal to the contract rent computed under paragraph (a) of this section.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.980</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Adjustment of utility allowances.</ITAG>In connection with adjustments of contract rents as provided in andSection;885.975(a), the Borrower must submit an analysis of any utility allowancesapplicable in an independent living complex. Such data as changes in utilityrates and other facts affecting utility consumption should be providedas part of this analysis to permit appropriate adjustments in the utilityallowances for assisted units. In addition, when approval of a utilityrate change would result in a cumulative increase of 10 percent or morein the most recently approved utility allowances, the Borrower must adviseHUD and request approval of new utility allowances. Whenever a utilityallowance for an assisted unit is adjusted, the Borrower will promptlynotify affected families and make a corresponding adjustment of the tenantrent and the amount of the project assistance payment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 885.985</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conditions for receipt of vacancy payments for assisted units.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Vacancy payments under the PAC will not be made unlessthe conditions for receipt of these project assistance payments set forthin this section are fulfilled.(b) <T3>Vacancies during rent-up. </T3>For each unit (or residential spacein a group home) that is not leased as of the effective date of the PAC,the Borrower is entitled to vacancy payments in the amount of 80 percentof the contract rent (or pro rata share of the contract rent for a grouphome) for the first 60 days of vacancy, if the Borrower:(1) Conducted marketing in accordance with andSection; 885.940(a) and otherwisecomplied with andSection; 885.940;(2) Has taken and continues to take all feasible actions to fill the vacancy;and(3) Has not rejected any eligible applicant except for good cause acceptableto HUD.(c) <T3>Vacancies after rent-up. </T3>If an eligible family vacates an assistedunit (or residential space in a group home) the Borrower is entitled tovacancy payments in the amount of 80 percent of the contract rent (or prorata share of the contract rent in a group home) for the first 60 daysof vacancy if the Borrower:(1) Certifies that it did not cause the vacancy by violating the lease,the PAC, or any applicable law;(2) Notified HUD of the vacancy or prospective vacancy and the reasonsfor the vacancy immediately upon learning of the vacancy or prospectivevacancy;(3) Has fulfilled and continues to fulfill the requirements specified inandSection; 885.940(a) (2) and (3) and andSection; 885.985(b) (2) and (3);and(4) For any vacancy resulting from the Borrower's eviction of an eligiblefamily, certifies that it has complied with andSection; 885.970.(d) <T3>Vacancies for longer than 60 days</T3>. If an assisted unit (or residentialspace in a group home) continues to be vacant after the 60-day period specifiedin paragraph (b) or (c) of this section, HUD may approve additional vacancypayments for 60-day periods up to a total of twelve months in an amountequal to the principal and interest payments required to amortize thatportion of the debt service attributable to the vacant unit (or, in thecase of group homes, the residential space). Such payments may be approvedif:(1) The unit was in decent, safe and sanitary condition during the vacancyperiod for which payment is claimed;(2) The Borrower has fulfilled and continues to fulfill the requirementsspecified in paragraph (b) or (c) of this section, as appropriate; and(3) The Borrower has demonstrated to the satisfaction of HUD that:(i) For the period of vacancy, the project is not providing the Borrowerwith revenues at least equal to project expenses (exclusive of depreciation)and the amount of payments requested is not more than the portion of thedeficiency attributable to the vacant unit (or residential space in a grouphome) and(ii) The project can achieve financial soundness within a reasonable time.(e) <T3>Prohibition of double compensation for vacancies</T3>. If the Borrowercollects payments for vacancies from other sources (tenant rent, securitydeposits, payments under andSection; 885.972(c), or governmental paymentsunder other programs), the Borrower shall not be entitled to collect vacancypayments to the extent these collections from other sources plus the vacancypayment exceed contract rent.25. Appendix A is added to Part 885 to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="84">Appendix A_Handicapped Person or Individual</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">HUD adopted the definition of handicapped person or individual containedin section 202. Several commenters urged HUD to adopt the definition ofhandicapped person contained in section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of1973 (29 U.S.C. 794). The commenters argued: (1) The section 504 definitionwould help the Department to avoid the overly narrow admission criteriaapplied in the section 202/8 program (e.g., the exclusion of mentally handicappedand developmentally disabled persons from elderly section 202 projects);(2) nothing in section 202 requires the definition of developmentally disabledperson to exclude others with disabilities; and (3) the use of the section504 definition would ensure a consistency of approach among the variousagencies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">HUD's regulation implementing section 504 prohibits discriminationagainst qualified individuals with handicaps. While the definition of individualwith handicaps is broader than the proposed definition of handicapped personor individual, the section 504 definition of ``qualified individual withhandicaps'' recognizes that persons with handicaps may be denied benefits,such as occupancy of a dwelling unit in a HUD-assisted housing project,on the basis of failure to meet basic requirements that govern eligibilityfor admission, care or service. The preamble to the section 504 regulationspecifically addressed commenter's arguments objecting to the exclusionof handicapped persons from elderly housing under the section 202 program.At 53 FR 20218-19, HUD stated, ``For example, in a section 202 projecta person is ineligible for housing for elderly persons if the person doesnot meet the age requirement for admission to the program.'' The proposedchange has not been made.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">HUD has consistently denied applications for projects solely for personswho are alcoholics or drug addicts. In recognition of this policy, theproposed rule stated that alcoholism and drug addiction are not includedwithin the definition of chronic mental illness. HUD is concerned thatthe language of the proposed rule could be misinterpreted to permit theexclusion of individuals otherwise qualified for admission to a project,based solely on their status as alcoholics or drug addicts. A handicappedperson suffering from alcoholism or drug addiction may be excluded froma project based on behavior that would exclude any other individual, evenif the behavior is related to the person's drug addiction or alcoholism(e.g., the illegal sale or use of drugs).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Borrowers must make decisions on each applicant's qualifications ona case-by-case basis during the course of ordinary eligibility determinations.Because HUD believes that the language in the proposed rule might havemisled some Borrowers into excluding all persons suffering from a drugaddiction or from alcoholism without an examination of each individual'squalifications for the program, the language excluding alcoholism and drugaddiction from the definition of chronic mental illness has been deleted.A new provision has been substituted stating that a person whose sole impairmentis alcoholism or drug addiction will not be considered to be handicappedfor the purposes of the section 202 program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 912_DEFINITION OF FAMILY AND OTHER RELATED TERMS; OCCUPANCY BYSINGLE PERSONS</ITAG>26. The authority citation for Part 912_Definition of Family and OtherRelated Terms; Occupancy by Single Persons, continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Sec. 3, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C.1437a); sec. 7(d) Department of Housing and Urban Development Act (42 U.S.C.3535(d)).</ITAG>27. The definition of disabled person in andSection; 912.2 is revised toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 912.2 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89"> Definitions.</ITAG><T3>Disabled person. </T3>A person who is under a disability as definedin section 223 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 423), or who has adevelopmental disability as defined in section 102(7) of the DevelopmentalDisabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act (42 U.S.C. 6001(7)).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * * </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 913_DEFINITION OF INCOME, INCOME LIMITS, RENT AND REEXAMINATIONOF FAMILY INCOME FOR THE PUBLIC HOUSING AND INDIAN HOUSING PROGRAMS</ITAG>28. The authority citation for Part 913_Definition of Income, Income Limits,Rent and Reexamination of Family Income for the Public Housing and IndianHousing Programs, is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"> <T4>Authority:</T4> Secs. 3, 6, 16, United States Housing Act of 1937 (42U.S.C. 1437a, 1437d, 1437n); sec. 7(d), Department of Housing and UrbanDevelopment Act (42 U.S.C. 3535(d)).</ITAG>29. The definition of disabled person in andSection; 913.102 is revised toread as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 913.102 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Disabled person. </T3>A person who is under a disability as definedin section 223 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 423), or who has adevelopmental disability as defined in section 102(7) of the DevelopmentalDisabilities Assistance and Bill of Rights Act (42 U.S.C. 6001(7)).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Date: June 13, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Jack Kemp,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Secretary.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-14435 Filed 6-19-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68"> BILLING CODE 4210-32</ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>